Authors
James Brundage
Number of Reviews
246

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
I'm a font man. I love seeing the nice things I can do with the text. I like
Comic Sans MS, Garamond, Lucida Handwriting. I also like to use Subscript,
Superscript, Strikethrough, Italics, and Bold. Maybe that's why I like this
year of film so much, because it's BOLD. In a decade of cinema mediocrity,
of people unwilling to take risks outside of the independent art film world,
the studios have only recently come back to the liberal, arty and
intelligent cinema that SCREAMS at you: I'M GOOD.
Since the beginning of this year, we've seen risk takers coming out of the
studios: New Line's "Dark City", a sci-fi flick with a David Lynch look,
Paramount's "The Truman Show", an Orwellian look towards the future of
television, "Saving Private Ryan", a bloody portrait of what World War Two
was really like, and, now, "Pleasentville", a movie that can smile and
satire at the same time.
A massive allegory and satire from frame one, where we flip channels while
looking for the previews for the "Pleasentville", where everything's just
swell... on the outside. On the inside, it seems devoid of the freedoms we
hold dear.
Everything seems picture perfect, but then things go wrong when Jenniffer
(Renee Witherspoon) starts to mess with the order of the universe, asking
"What lies beyond Pleasentville?". When she goes further, taking someone up
to lover's lane for more than just nothing, people start turning colors from
black and white. Change is coming, and no one likes it.
The film, as I said, is an allegory of the late fifties and early sixties, a
political agenda "change is good" motion picture that often screams its
metaphors in your face, but in such fun ways that you can't help but smile.
It's a film for the baby boomers in all of us, the ones who think back to
that time and remember as the change was coming and coming fast, and how it
took the world by storm with a fight.
It's a change from the normal for me, too. A bold film that you can relax
and enjoy the complexity without having it drown you. And, unlike films like
Saving Private Ryan, which made you face the horror of the day, and The
Truman Show, which had a dismal view of the future, this one lets you smile,
lets you come out happier than you came in, and feeling more intelligent to
boot.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Starship Troopers may win the war, but looses the battle.
Lets take movies from the side that they really are. The side that almost no
one ever sees that isn't in the business. The side that lacks the glamour of
the interest or the entertainment. The side of a bunch of lawyers, CPAs and
rich kids all gathered together to make more money. Its a side that doesn't
really have much to show, that isn't anything more than people in Armani in
a room deciding the entertainment of a nation.
Think of them as car dealers, brokering to you a beat up Pinto that's been
repainted and is going for pretty cheap, and you have a good idea of what
Starship Troopers is like.
Picture the conversation : "What does this movie have to offer you? Its fun,
its sci-fi. The human race fighting for survival, that sorta thing. It has
relationships. Its based on the 1959 classic. Its has something for
everyone."
Okay, you think, the movie sounds okay so far, but what about when he begins
the next bit, talking to you dressed in a cheap suit and a K-Mart tie, arms
spread out in a hug and pot belly accented.
"And, free of extra charge, we've got some goodies for you. It comes with
plenty of violence for all you gore-hounds out there, with a human and alien
body count close to 5,000 shown. And, of course, millions more die behind
the scenes. We torture one scared alien. Like unnecessary nudity? We've got
that too.
"And we've got this wonderful old-fashioned new negative utopia angle for
you to try. You have to serve in the military to be a citizen. We've got a
bug shooting things out of its but. We've got cockroaches being smashed to
little-itty bitty bits for all those city-dwellers. We've got psychics for
all those watches of the Sci-Fi channel. We've got cheap relationships for
you who don't want to get too deep into the movie. But, for those who try to
get deep into the movie, we try (no promises) to give you a nice bit of
humanity with our impossibly drawn-out death scenes (but they're terribly
faked for all you conservative parents). Not a lot of profanity, but, hey,
you can't win them all.

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
Written and Directed by Darren Aronofsky
Starring Sean Guilette, Mark Magolis, Benny Sheckman, Pamela Hart, Samai
Shoaib
    "Personal Note: When I was a kid my mother told me not to stare into the
sun, so when I was six, I did.  The doctor's didn't know if my eyes would
ever heal.  I was scared, alone in that darkness, but slowly, light began to
creep through the bandages. But something in me changed that day.  That day
I had my first headache."
    Thus bgegins Darren Aronofsky's 1998 independent trek into the surreal
Pi, an incredibly complex and ambigous film filled with both incredible
style and subtance.  To get an idea of the director in case you have never
seen him before, imagine the cinematography originality of Jim Jarmush's
Stranger than Paradise mixed with the perfect dialouge of Kevin Smith's
Clerks and the bizarre and cryptic storyline of David Lynch's Eraserhead.
Any surprise that all three of the aforementioned films are black and white?
It shouldn't be.  Pi uses an 8mm for the majority of its duration and film
in a grainy black and white, giving the impression that you are watching a
nightmare.
    The first large challenge of reviewing this throughly intriguing movie
is describing its plot.  Max Cohen (Sean Guilette) is a brilliant number
theorist.  He has three assumptions about the universe, one of which is that
all things have an underlying pattern, an order.  The hypothesis that he
creates out of this is that he can predict anything, given enough variables
and knowing the underlying pattern.  His place to test this hypothesis: the
stock market.  In his search for answers in the stock market, he discovers a
216-digit number that seems to be the key to it all: it predicts Black
Monday.  Jewish mystics (Ben Shenkman) believe it to be the real name of
God.  Market manipulators (Pamela Hart) believe it to be the key to a
fortune.  A brillaint mathematician (Sol (Mark Margolis)) believes it to be
a bug caused when a computer becomes conscious in the instants before it
dies.  Max is quickly launched into a world so paranoid it makes the
Orwelian works of Andrew Niccol look safe.
    Max is also plauged by headaches.  These headaches, strong enough to
force him unconscious at regular intervals, have him taking a cocktail of
painkillers in order to subdue.  As he creeps closer and closer to the
answer, the headaches increase in their intensity.
    I think the best way to interperet this massively cryptic film would be
as a single man's search for peace.  Through the movie, Max is gripped by a
violent obsession with numbers and a complete phobia of social interaction.
He constantly shuns the advances of his neighbor Devi (Samai Shoaib).  He
finds himself unable to take a break from anything and, as a consequence,
finds himself inside of a complete nightmare.  The only way to get away from
this nightmare is to give up the one thing that has been his lifelong
passion: numbers.
The suspense of the film is helped along with an elecritc score by Clint
Mansell, a soundtrack that keeps you on the edge with its razor-sharp notes.
Also helping is the cinematographer Matthew Libatique, who gives us an
infectious feeling of paranoia with the black and white film and the
constant use of an unsteady camera to show the fast movement of Max.
    The film, although making numerous references to number theory, is
fairly easy to understand with no mathematical knowledge: not to say that it
doesn't help to know how to add and subtract.  What is difficult is to view
this film without a mind seeking to be intrigued, because, if you don't want
intrigue, you shouldn't be watching Pi.

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
Written, Directed, and Produced by Todd Solondz (Happiness)
Starring:
 Heather Matarazzo (The Devil's Advocate, 54) as Dawn Weiner
 Brendon Sexton III (Empire Records, Pecker) as Brandon McCarthy
Being a previous New Jersey resident who went as a different person during
the long, boring years of Junior High School, WWPMS (West Windsor Plainsboro
Middle School: the PMS was the but of constant jokes), this movie holds a
special place in my heart (or lack thereof).
Welcome to the Dollhouse tells the story of Dawn Weiner, nicknamed Weinerdog
by her classmates.  Dawn Weiner, just like most New Jersey youths, lives as
one of three children of which the parents only wanted one the baby.  The
older brother is a nerd destined for the Ivy League and the younger sister
is a little girl stereotype who takes ballet lessons all the time.  All of
the other students at her middle school hate her.  All the girls call her a
lesbo, she's a pariah to all the guys.  And, like every other person living
in a vastly superficial world, she just wants to be popular.
Her plan to be popular is as devious and darkly comic as Solondz's script:
seduce a high school senior who will sleep with anything that moves.  Sadly,
as admittedly unattractive as Dawn is, she's just not equipped for the task.
Be that as it may, she puts all her energy into trying to act nice, while
the school bully, Brandon, is falling in love with her.
On one level the movie is devilishly funny, with creative, interesting lines
like the following: Dawn: Do you think about girls?  Mark:  Are you kidding?
I want to get into a good school!  On another level it earns the 1996
Sundance Grand Jury Prize by taking on the harsh issues of being picked on,
kidnapping, jealousy, love, and the other issues of youth in suburbia.
It's not a film for a conservative to watch, though.  In fact, if you're a
conservative, BACK OFF.  The film's either weakest or strongest aspect is
its willingness to have lines like "I don't mean to be a c*nt" and the
threat of rape into the movie.  The same applies for ultra-liberals, who
have to deal with the standard conservative American parents.  Everyone in
between, and everyone who loves independent movies, however, should run down
to the video store and pick this one up.  I mean buy, not rent, by the way.
The Movie Critic's Heaven
http://members.tripod.com/~criticsheaven/

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Written by Duncan Kennedy, Donna Powers, and Wayne Powers
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan Skarsgard,
LL Cool J, Michael Rappaport, and Jaqueline McKenzie
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 All right.  I have almost forgiven Village Roadshow for their fiasco of
Practical Magic.  After Analyze This and The Matrix, they were starting to
get on my good side.  Of course, when I started seeing previews for Deep
Blue Sea, I assumed that it would be a complete Jaws rip off and, because of
that, Village Roadshow would be back to bad in my book.
 Deep Blue Sea is, in fact, a complete Jaws rip off.  From start to finish,
it has not an original bone in its body.  But technically sharks don't have
bone, they have cartilage, so I guess originality doesn't have to matter as
much with this one.  Scientific explanations of why this movie can be so
technically bad (mediocre F/Xs, bad performances, no plot) and yet be so
incredibly fun aside, Deep Blue Sea is a nice fun-in-the-sun movie to watch
during the summer of 99.
 Renny Harlin, director of The Long Kiss Goodnight and Cliffhanger handles
action as well as he always did: nearly perfect.  He knows how to handle his
actors, he knows how to work with a terrible script, and he knows when it's
good to be over the top and when it's good to stick to your guns.  In sync
with Harlin's usual directorial style, we have a lot of the old fashioned
action scenes (swim from sharks, shoot at sharks, have sharks bite body
parts off) thrown at you along with some not so traditional ones (watch
sharks swim backwards, watch shark trap man in oven, watch shark make clever
use of a human body as a way to break glass).  Why is all of this?  Because,
in Deep Blue Sea, we have sharks that are as smart as human beings (and, as
shown by most of the idiots we see in everyday life, probably smarter).
 Deep Blue Sea's plot, if you can call it a plot, concerns an obsessed
scientist (Saffron Burrows), an investor that survived an avalanche in the
Himalayas (Samuel L. Jackson), various research scientists (Stellan
Skarsgard, Michael Rappaport, and Jacqueline McKenzie), a shark-wrangler
(Thomas Jane) and a wise-ass cook (LL Cool J), all of whom are being hunted
by genetically altered sharks who have larger brains than normal and are as
smart as humans.  With all of the dark glee of a B-horror film, we watch as
the sharks devour everyone in sight, manipulate the humans, and try to
outsmart them.
And, of course, we root for the sharks more than we care about the humans.
Of course the humans win anyways, and of course we have an oh so politically
correct ending.  But hey, that's not really the point of the film.  It's
summer, and the point is to have fun, no matter how idiotic the fun is.
Deep Blue Sea is worlds past the horror/comedy Lake Placid, the other
monster film involving a natural creature with unnatural characteristics,
actually going so far as to make you do more than chuckle a couple of times.
Along with my dark sense of humor, I ended up laughing as one of the people
was chomped right in the middle of a highly esoteric and idiotic speech.
Forewarnings, however, that go along with this film are that it is both
highly stupid and highly predictable.  Those in the mood for plot twists or
intelligence should seek elsewhere.  It has no literary value or
qualifications whatsoever.  It is not just not high art; it isn't even low
art.  What Deep Blue Sea undeniably is would be fun.  Take everything else
away, and Deep Blue Sea is and still will be fun.

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
Produced and Directed by Clint Eastwood.
Starring Clint Eastwood, Gene Hackman, Scott Glenn, Ed Harris, and Laura
Linney
 Let me start off saying two things to two people.  Number one, to William
Goldman: I'm not saying this because I'm supporting or defending Clinton
(which I'm NOT), but do please stop writing political thrillers.  Number
two, to Ed Harris: well, at least it was better than Stepmom.
 Number three actually would have gone to Clint Eastwood: pleas stop
starring, producing, and directing your own movies but he obviously got the
point as nary a frame of the intriguing Midnight in the Garden of Good and
Evil shows him.
 That said, let's go on to my review of Absolute Power, which is twenty
notches above Murder at 1600, which I saw being filmed, but a hundred
notches below Six Days in May, In the Line of Fire, or about any other
political thriller you can name.
 Absolute Power is pleasantly mediocre.  You don't expect much, and you
don't get much.
 It is yet another film following the Clinton chic of films, books, etc
which show our nations President as someone who's able to get laid, in
contrast to someone who couldn't get it up without Viagra (if we had Dole,
folks, NONE of this crap would be happening). Absolute Power is the story of
a President who has sex with a girl and, whoops, ends up killing her.
Unlike Murder at 1600, which shows the girl being done right in the opening
credits, Absolute Power waits a nice ten to fifteen minutes before getting
down to business.
 When it gets down to business, Luther (Clint Eastwood ) is breaking into an
estate to steal millions.  His perfect heist is interrupted by something
unplanned: the president is going to have sex with the billionaires wife.
Things get a little rough, one thing leads to another, and the girl ends up
shot by secret service agents seconds before she's going to give President
Al (Gene Hackman) a Lorraina Bobbit.
 Of course, since we live in the wonderful democracy where everyone is free
to make a dumbly plotted and cliche film as they want, the Chief of Staff
decides its for the best if the girl stumbled upon a burglary and was shot.
Forget for a second that her dress has been ripped, the President's
fingerprints are all over her, and a secret service agent (Scott Glenn) made
sure he hadn't done a Bill Clinton.
 Now, going out of the character of a jewel thief who just witnessed a
murder from a secret room and stole $5,000,000 worth of material, Clint
grows a heart, picks up the piece of evidence left behind, and leaves.  Of
course secret service agents chase him.  Of course he runs into a cop (Ed
Harris) who believes him because the facts don't add up, and of course his
daughter (Laura Linney) grows closer to the old man through a complicated
process of stocking her fridge at just the right time and saving her life.
 The only really redeeming aspects to the film, the saving graces against
terrible performances by the ensemble cast and William Goldman's piss-poor
script is the steely direction by Clint Eastwood.  Mixing in just the right
amount of light, the right tone and time of the music and working with such
a terrible script, Clint Eastwood does directing up to par with A Perfect
World and Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil.  He's as good of a
director as he always was, and that alone makes the film enjoyable.  He
gives as much that he can to a movie with such a bad script, as do the
actors.  This will be on the movie's gravestone: "They tried, they really
tried".
 Now, from all of this, you'd expect that I'm telling you to skip Absolute
Power.  I'm not.  I'm just saying don't drive to rent it.  Should Absolute
Power be on TMC or ShowTime, like it was for me, go ahead and watch it.
You'll have fun.  If you're a Clint Eastwood, Dirty Harry jag, see it.  It's
just up in the air.

Title
Review for Quick and the Dead, The (1995)
Starring Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Leonardo DiCaprio, Russell Crowe, and
Gary Sinse, Lance Henrickson
 All right, all right, I'm sorry I haven't been seeing the movies I should.
I haven't seen A Simple Plan yet, I admit it.  Everyone's been nagging me,
bothering me about it, telling me: "James, it's such a great film."  But I
haven't seen it.
 Anyway, that apology aside, I'm very glad I took time to watch Sam Ramni's
1995 film The Quick and the Dead.
 About three weeks ago, I was talking with a friend of mine after seeing the
excellent Miramax/Universal effort Shakespeare in Love.  Now I don't
remember how we got on the topic, it was something about very cliched films,
the formula that's done over and over.  Oh, yeah, it had to do with a new
version of Scrooge he had seen.  We agreed on one thing about cliched films:
There should be a law that, if you're going to make a terribly cliched film,
then you at least have to do something original in it.
 The Quick and the Dead exemplifies this.
 The Quick and the Dead is, quite naturally, the age-old Western formula
story about a gunfighter going into a lonesome town in the West, getting rid
of some evil villian, and appointing a new person to be the Sheriff.  Now,
here's the difference: the gunfighter in this film is Sharon Stone.
 Yes, you heard me right, feminism has reached a high in Hollywood to the
point that a woman has taken up the traditionally male role of a gunsligner
in the Old West.  And damn, did I love her doing it!
 Also, as far as new innovations go, Sam Ramni has perhaps the finest filmed
Western ever done on his hands.  In love with the zoom as ever, Ramni is up
to par with Shoemaker in the stylistic aspects of filmmaking, where Ramni
does what Shoemaker (sorry Joel, but it's true) always sucked at: the
substance aspects of it.
 Instead of characters as fake as the two story front to the one story town,
Ramni delivers us fully developed characters... with the exception of Gene
Hackman, who is, and always will be as far as this film is concerned, simply
THE BAD GUY.  We will never see him as human.
 Back to the stylistic aspects of the film, Ramni's repeated use of the zoom
and razor-sharp editing allows us to view each gunpoint with an infectious
tension.  Ramni will often intercut shots of each gunfighter, the worried
onlookers, the clock counting away the time, and Gene Hackman's face of pure
steely evil as we watch the fight.
 Also, once the shots are fired, we use either ultra-slow or ultra-fast pans
and zooms to view the progress of the shots through the air, and then the
effects are given to us with some of the finest fake blood outside of horror
films (should we be surprised that he is the aurtuer behind the Evil Dead
and Darkman series?).
 Also, Sharon Stone's character gives us some chance at morals with the
film, avenging a little girl's rape by doing a Bobbit with a gun, and
dealing with her own shocking inner deamons throughout the film.  And, if
that weren't enough, we have LA Confidential's Russell Crowe giving his
usual excellent as a preacher who is forced to return to gunslinging.
 Back to the matter of A Simple Plan, I will make a point to see it now that
I have tasted my first sample of the incredibly stylistic Ramni.  As far as
something new in a cliche genre: thank god.  If the Premium channels didn't
get real good during January and February, I would hate having to deal with
most of the films of the months, which are either Quick or Dead.

Title
Review for Original Sin (2001)
Depending on who you ask, the original sin was either the eating of the
apple, the act of disobedience against God, or the act of betrayal.  But
in case you didn't know this, don't bother remembering it... the words
"original sin" never come up in the movie of the same name, let alone
the concept of it.  The closest the film even gets to Catholicism is in
its narrative (the story is told by Angelina Jolie to her priest while
on death row in Cuba, circa 1900).
Regardless of its senseless title, Original Sin does actually have a
plot (albeit one of the most mangled acts of screenwriting since The Art
of War, based on the book Waltz Across Darkness).  Boy (Antionio
Banderas) places personal ad sometime around 1900, searching for a
wife.  Since this is a century ago, we narrowly dodge a remake of Green
Card, only to find that the Girl (Jolie) faked her photo and is actually
beautiful.  Skipping a few moderately useless sex scenes (getting the
question out of the way, yes, we get to see Angelina Jolie's breasts
again), the Girl turns out to be a con artist, swindles Boy for his
money, and heads for the hills.
Original Sin then briefly tries to be a thriller.  We see Boy go
whore-chasing, saying he wants to find Girl and kill her.  But as soon
as Boy actually finds Girl, instead of following what might have been a
promising (or at least not completely fucking boring) thriller, the film
degenerates into the worst dissection of the virgin/whore complex since
Milk Money.  Girl toys with the idea of reforming her con-girl past, all
the while avoiding the "other man," a lover that keeps making her start
these scams in the first place.
Add insult to injury with some of the worst stylistic choices in
cinematic history (literally half of the film is either in slow motion
or uses a strobe effect), and acting roughly the caliber of a B.B. gun,
and Original Sin is one of the most torturous films of the summer,
definitely front running to make my bottom ten of the year.
Don't even bother with Original Sin, but if you do go, be honest with
yourself and admit its pure sex appeal.  Just keep in mind that although
this film may not be the most original on the block, it's much worse
than a sin.  This is sacrilege.
Director: Michael Cristofer
Producer: Carol Lees, Denise Di Novi, Kate Guinzburg
Writer: Michael Cristofer
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Angelina Jolie, Thomas Jane, Jack Thompson
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
It's just your basic romantic comedy. It's also an eighties film (so if you
hated the eighties ) On the overall the film is all right, not too good,
not too bad. But, watching in dejected calm, staring as the screen threatens
epilepsy at 24 frames per second, I realize that this is so much the same
movie I had seen time and time again in my life. One out of a hundred within
the past sixteen years. Yet somehow I keep going back. Mindlessly, numbly
heading into the movie theater to see yet another movie, not entirely sure
of the title yet certain as to an inevitable memory of the details.
As far as this one goes, it tries to take off of the success of last years
very offbeat dark romantic action comedy, Grosse Point Blank, another 80's
movie about a hitman who has become dissatisfied with his professional life
and returns to his high school reunion to try to rekindle an old flame
(remember the tag line : Even a Hitman Deserves a Second Chance). Not that
it [Wedding Singer] is in any way a sick comedy or nearly as good, but it
still serves as a romantic comedy. You sympathize with the characters (like
you sympathize with the people on "Friends"), you like the sweet romances,
you know the ending as you go into the movie. Sure, it serves up well for
jokes but, as was once the focus of a Seinfeld episode 

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
I promised myself I'd go on vacation. I promised myself I wouldn't watch a
single film while I was away. Come to think of it, I also promised myself I
wouldn't write a single movie review. Yet somehow here I am, typing away.
This is because, of course, of Truth About Life #196: Not Rules, but
Resolutions are meant to be broken. Now nine times out of ten I end up
regretting promises I break to myself, but this time just happens to be
different. Case in point: The Spanish Prisoner.
I guess I could describe the Spanish Prisoner as the ghost of Alfred
Hitchcock (alive and well inhabiting the body of director David Mamet) come
back to haunt us with an insane dark wit, a smart enigmatic mystery, and a
surreal game of murder and falsehood. I needed my vacation. I needed a
thriller I could enjoy without wanting to tear to shreds on the first try.
In the words of the little girl in Poltergeist "It's he-re!"
I'd like to give you an opinion on the performance of Steve Martin in his
first serious role. I'd like to give you an opinion on the innards of its
plot. And, you know what, I'd really like to give you my ideas on the exacts
of what happened, let you in on the little tricks. But that's just mean.
And, as a critic, I'm supposed to be mean to the film... not to you. I can't
tell you anything. Or rather I could, but then I'd have to kill you. Come
on, it's a breech of rules: like holding up the peace sign all through the
movie Scream or talking during the picture. You just don't do it.
I guess vacation would have to have the prerequisite of relaxation, which
this movie isn't, keeping you smartly on the edge of your seat with
something different each second, taking you in directions that you didn't
really know existed and still ending up the same place half of the time.
It's a ride. And not only is it a ride: It's a ride you take at Six Flags,
travelling super-fast and not knowing where you are. But then you hit the
end, and it's all explained. Or is it?
You know what? Why don't you find out?

Title
Review for Batman Returns (1992)
Directed by Tim Burton (Mars Attacks)
Starring: Michael Keaton (Jackie Brown) as Batman/Bruce Wayne, Michelle
Pfeiffer (Prince of Egypt) as Catwoman/Selina Kyle, Danny DeVito (LA
Confidential) as The Penguin/Oswald Cobblepot, Christopher Walken (Antz) as
Max Shreck
As reviewed by James Brundage
It was the end of an era. The year was 1992 and the movie was Batman
Returns. It marked the end of the Batman franchise as a series of good
movies. It was, friends, the last great Batman.
Gotham was dark and so was the script. Darkly comic, darkly romantic, and
darkly dramatic. This tale told of Michael Keaton as Batman in a love/hate
relationship with Catwoman, of a freak raised by penguins, of a power hungry
industry giant who sought to leave the legacy of a polluting power plant.
The Penguin: a man raised by what became his namesake, seeks to discover the
identity of his parents, and then exact vengeance upon the world. Selina
Kyle was a lowly secretary who got pushed out of a window for opening her
mouth: exhausting one of nine lives, and then becoming Catwoman. And Bruce
Wayne was a man haunted by his past and compelled to fight crime at night as
Batman.
Bruce Wayne's and Selina Kyle's lives intersect twice, once as two normal
people falling in love and again as Batman and Catwoman, trying to decide
whether to sleep together or kill each other. The dark comedy that ensues by
this is only the beginning. A smartly written script care of Daniel Waters
(Demolition Man) also gives us such scenes as the Batmobile being driver
from the campaign trailer of Oswald Cobblepot/The Penguin right into every
civilian in sight.
On the action level, this film exceeds its sequels and matches its
predecessor, having good old Batman go for the gut with every punch. On the
plotline, the same occurs. The performances are the fine things we expect to
see from Tim Burton. The directing: the same darkly satiric motif we have
always known with him.
But what makes Batman Returns worth watching, aside from all of this, is the
foreknowledge of what happened after. Joel Shumaker took over the Batman
franchise and turned Gotham into a bright, sunny place. After Batman
Returns, the franchise turned to crap. So, if you're a current Batman fan,
see it for a glimpse of the better past, and, if you haven't seen it, see it
for the opportunity to show why its so much better than the modern day sunny
Jewel-on-the-soundtrack Batman.

Title
Review for Serial Mom (1994)
Starring Kathleen Turner, Sam Waterson, Ricki Lake, Matthew Lillard, Scott
Wesley Morgan, Walt MacPherson, Justin Whalin, and Patricia Dumnock
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 In famous words: they don't make em like they used to.
 When they used to make serial killer movies, the serial killers were guys.
When they used to make serial killer movies, the serial killers used an axe
or a chainsaw.  When they used to make serial killer movies, the serial
killers weren't happily married with children.
 Hey, things change, and change is good.
 Serial Mom is a serial killer so different from the norm that you have to
laugh out loud.  Sure, its got enough gore to satisfy any horror fan, but it
also has a nice satiric edge to it, one that will make anyone with a dark
sense of humor laugh.
 Taking a stab (sorry, couldn't resist) at the golden age of television, you
have Beverly Sutphin (Kathleen Turner), who appears to be a nice mother on
the surface but inside is a completely deranged serial killer.  The motives
for her crimes are silly breakings of social convention (cutting people off
in the parking lot of Jo-Anne's fabric, standing a girl up at a flea market,
eating chicken, wearing white shoes after labor day, etc.), to which she
responds with a viscous psychopathic murder spree (is there any other
kind?).
 Her son is obsessed with horror movies, her husband a mild mannered
dentist.  Her daughter is a social reject, and she is a pillar of the
community.
 The film goes incredibly fast, displaying the time periodically at the
bottom of the screen, so as you are constantly aware of how quickly the
story is progressing in the scary world that the movie creates.  As she
kills, evades police officers, and goes on car chases, Beverly acts as if it
was all a game (she's smiling and giggling all the time).
 Almost a precursor to Scream (which ironically also featured Matthew
Lillard), Serial Mom also picks on horror movies.  A trio of teenagers is
always watching them, and the movies are what initially piqued Beverly's
fascination with gore.  Of course, she only likes gore in the movies.  When
the time comes that she has to remove a bodily organ from the end of a fire
poker, she's all "ewww."
 A warning for potential viewers of this film: you must have a dark sense of
humor.  I'm not talking pseudo-dark. I'm not talking "I thought Scream was
funny" dark.  I'm talking laughed like Robert DeNiro in Cape Fear during
Very Bad Things dark.  You've got to be able to find humor in the most
pessimistic of situations, while keeping your mind open to the general gist
of the movie (the McCarthy era was that of complete repression, which has
potentially insane side effects), and that's very tough.
 Another warning, this film is not for the weak of stomach.  It's got gore
all through, and has enough violence to generate a lobbyist feeding frenzy.
 This film should also probably be seen as a warning against those that are
fascinated and deify the violence on the screen.  A highly comedic and
strangely moral story, Serial Mom is a film that makes every other horror
movie you have ever seen seem tame in comparison.  It can function as a raw
horror movie, but can only be truly appreciated outside of the realm of
campy teenage viewing.  Half of the jokes are too old for most teenagers to
get, anyway.
 Kathleen Turner shines as the psychopath, giving one of the most memorable
performances as a villain in the 90s.  Sam Waterson crawls out of his usual
"Law & Order" shell as the husband of a serial killer.  Mathew Lillard
reminds me of Nicole Kidman's character in To Die For: someone willing to
ride the hype wave of a murder for all that its worth.  Ricki Lake actually
gives a half decent performance, but she's under the skillful direction of
John Waters (Pecker).
 If you're not weak of stomach, heart, or mind, go see Serial Mom.  If you
are weak in any one of these three aspects, the film will murder you.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, and Adam Sandler
Starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Cole Sprouse, Dyland
Sprouse, Leslie Mann, and Rob Schneider
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 This is the part I love.  After seeing a slew of bad movies, the part where
I get to write a really rotten review is the most fun.  Seeing the movie is
both annoying and boring, but reviewing it is where I get my perverse
pleasure.  In taking these terrible movies out back and beating them with a
stick.
 This is what happens to movie critics after more than a year in the
business.  As soon as you get serious about your work, not just doing the
work on a whim as something you like to do for you High School newspaper or
your local paper, you begin to really enjoy the work.  You begin to love the
bad movies as much as you love the good ones, because, with the bad movies,
you get the pleasure of writing a really, really bad review.
 Big Daddy, Adam Sandler's latest proof to the world that he is an ape
wearing a man suit, is an attempt to emulate feelings.  It is an attempt to
make a sweet movie out of someone who still has a lisp at about 30 and is
always being accused of being a kid.  It is that kid's attempt to prove that
he is a responsible adult.
 Big Daddy attempts to be funny, it attempts to be romantic, and it attempts
to be touching.  What it succeeds at is being tedious.  The only good words
I can say about it are that it was better than The Wedding Singer.
 Big Daddy is one of those movies written by monkeys, directed by a monkey,
and acted in by monkeys that are mostly former members of the SNL cast.  The
ones that aren't are making serious career mistakes (i.e. Steve Buscemi and
Joey Lauren Adams, who have both done great work in independent film and
completely suck every time they go studio).  It tries to score its laughs
from appropriately juvenile humor: Hooters jokes, insults thrown to Little
Italy, roller bladers tripping over themselves, etc.  It fails.
 With a target demographic of teenagers, it spends its time having adults
that don't act like adults at all.  They just act like immature jerks.  Now
normally, when a jerk is on screen in Hollywood, if they do the scene right,
he comes off good, but in Big Daddy, the jerks are just plain jerks...
including Adam Sandler.
 I suppose I should probably be nicer to Adam Sandler.  Critics like me have
bashed so many of his movies saying that they have no point that he has
instead decided to make this one, which has way too much point.  Of course,
if I were to go nice on him, then he would still be making movies like The
Wedding Singer, and then where would we be?
 Twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse play Julian, a child who miraculously landed
on Entertainment Weekly's "IT list" following this movie.  My question is
"why?"  Normally, child actors are bad, but these two are especially bad.
They're so bad that I have to really wonder who else the director considered
for the part... and then have a shivering fit.
 As far as my comments to the leads, lemme say first to Joey Lauren Adams
that ever since you broke up with Kevin Smith (after he directed you to a
Golden Globe nomination for Chasing Amy), you have been on a downward
spiral.  Now let me say to Adam Sandler that you are not funny, you will
never be funny, and you will never be recognized as anything but a complete
idiot.  So, please, don't even try.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
There's one thing that Peter Weir (the director) does with The Truman Show
that makes it utterly brilliant, and it's something so subtle that you have
to think to notice it. The entire time you're viewing Truman, you're not
watching a movie, you're watching a show. The Truman Show, in fact. From its
opening frame, where Big Brother-esque creator Christof is explaining his
concept of The Truman Show, you are being drawn not into a film but into a
television story. In fact, as it remains strictly within the dome in which
Truman lives for the first half of the film, you are watching him not in the
conventional shot of a box shape, but instead in the shape of a human eye.
In the paranoid world of Truman, you are watching.
The Truman Show, in truth, has no truth. It's a movie about the farce of
small town reality, and when you go there, you get weird. In so many ways
this movie mirrors the darker, more industrial and film noir Best Picture
nominated "Blue Velvet" (1986), the David Lynch film in which a man walks
through a field, begins throwing stones at a small shack, and picks up a
human ear. The bittersweet small town satire in this film is coolly and
calmly apparent.
It's not a fast film. It's not a funny film. What it is is a film about
humanity, about human reactions, and about how strange our realities can be
as we accept them. Triumphant and sorrowful, the movie reminds me of 94's
Forrest Gump, another film where you had a man not quite knowing his world.
The plot is simple: the plot of any negative utopia book or movie. A man,
discovering that THEY are watching, does not like this and tries to escape.
But what is he escaping from? In reality it is paradise. Acted,
melodramatic, but still paradise. And the thing is, he's just like everyone
else in a small town: he wants to get out.
But we have people against him. The Big Brother (George Orwell's "1984") of
the establishment would rather he live in the dome, live and die on public
television. Of course this makes it a film about triumph. But it has a twist
to it: at the end, it makes it so you don't know what you want. Posed to go
out the door, part of you is cheering for him to run, and part of you wants
him to stay, to continue providing hope. He's told to say something. He
thinks. Opens his mouth and 

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
Why do titles have to be so ironic? Not to say that Practical Magic is an
oxy moron, some of the camera tricks that they have are nice and neat. But
the movie itself is neither practical nor magic, which it would so much like
us to believe. It's not a witchcraft movie, it's not a female bonding movie,
or a family movie. It's not much of a romance, it's not much of a thriller.
It's not much of a PG-13 horror, either. What it is is OK. Nothing more,
nothing less.
It's one of those movies that I kind of just sat through. I was a passive
participant. I didn't even get to make my usual comments picking on it while
I watched it (except for one). It's not a waste of your time, if you have
time to kill. It's not a bad movie to take some witches to: I can say its
religiously accurate. But what use is that?
You'd think it be great, or at least good, starring Nichole Kidman and
Sandra Bullock, directed by Giffen Dunne (Addicted to Love). But instead its
just mediocre. It's just OK. End of story. End of film. End of review.

Title
Review for Pressurecooker (1997)
Written and Produced by Christopher Null
Starring David M. Kaufman, Christopher Null, and Elizabeth Price
     I don't even know why I go to the movies anymore.  I mean, I get into
an era where three quarters of the movies out in current release are
complete crap, where I am disappointed by the medium as a whole at every
turn.  I live in an area where I have to travel a good half hour to see an
art film.  No deal has yet been struck with a videostore to allow me to rent
movies free, so that medium costs me a good $20 a month.  Cable bills are a
constant plague, and the premium channels end up showing the same old same
old.  And, thanks to the newly handed down embargo on press by Regal cinemas
(in the form of an email which they refuse to allow me to see), I am getting
frozen out of seeing movies there, too.
     Consider, on the other hand, the Internet.  Consider the short films
that are made readily available.  Like the man who has given up novels for
short stories (or, as the main character in Will Stitman's Metropolitan, for
fine literary criticism.), I am considering giving up the feature length
film for its cousin "the short".
     Available online by the dozens, this brand of film may lack the
professionalism of its 35mm counterparts, but by no means does it lack
creative merit.  Sure, half of them want to make the feature length someday,
but right now, due to the spread of the electronic world, we get to see the
early products of the next Speilbergs as they happen.
     A case in point that has been my normal crusade has been Rigormortis
productions, of which returning director Richard Ferrado is the next David
Zucker.  In the Null brothers (Director Bradley and Writer/Producer/Actor
Christopher), we find the next David Lynch.
     Christopher Null, in addition to getting my personal respect as being
the head contributor to www.filmcritic.com (one of the many sites that
harbours my reviews), is also a gifted writer capable of turning out a
script that gives a dark and mysterious atmosphere in 13:00 of film.
     For a plot synopsis: imaging Kurt Vonnegut's "Slaughterhouse Five."  In
SH5 (as it is known by Vonnegut fanatics such as myself), Billy Pilgrim is
unstuck in time.  He perpetually goes between incredibly painful and
incredibly serene periods of time in his life.
     In Pressurecooker, David is in much the same situation.  Constantly, he
goes back in time (if only in memory) to the haunting death of his mother in
an act of senseless violence.  At the present, both he and his brother Alex
(David M. Kaufman) are in a mental institution.  One is visiting the other,
although it is unclear which one.
     Through the flashbacks, the drifting back and forward in time, we are
given an overall impression of how the death has emotionally maimed the
brothers, while maintaining (through highly a highly skillful mix of black
and white and color) an eerie mystery over the event, painting the entire
sequence as if a surreal nightmare.
     On of the finest dramatic debuts since David Lynch's Six Figures
Getting Sick, Pressurecooker is a story that is successfully able to grab
you by the throat, pull you into the characters, and place you back into
reality again in the time it takes most films to introduce the plot.
     Seeing as it is both a drama and a mystery, I cannot give away the
ending.  I can, however, give a shameless sales pitch on behalf of the
creators.  The film is available on www.filmcritic.com under the NULL SET
PRODUCTIONS section.  It is available on VHS and in Realvideo.  It's worth
it.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Starring Ian Holm, Bruce Greenwood, Arsinee Khanjian, Tom McCamus, Sarah
Polley, Caerthan Banks, Stephanie Morgenstern, Gabrielle Rose
     There is a film I keep coming back to.  It is a comfort to my pain --
the shoulder of a good friend to cry on.  It has helped me through extreme
hardship -- been there for me with a reassuring message.  When I want to
blame, this film tells me to think again.  This film, friends, is Atom
Egoyan's The Sweet Hereafter.
     The film is a tour de force of mythical storytelling.  An adaptation of
Russell Banks novel, it follows the events before, during, and after an
accident in Sam Dent, New York.  This accident is one that is as tragic as
it is real: a school bus hits a patch of ice and goes off the road, killing
fourteen of the twenty two passengers and leaving one of them paralyzed from
the waist down.
     We are all familiar with these types of accidents.  In the massive
world in which we live, they are everyday occurrences. Quickly forgotten,
out of sight and out of mind, we never truly hear of the aftermath.  After
the accident, the lawyer Mitchell Stevens (Ian Holm) descends upon the town
in order to begin class-action litigation.
    An ambulance chaser by profession, his job is to assign blame to a
blameless item and attempt to give monetary compensation to an emotional
loss.  However, Mitchell Stevens is not telling these people the mantras
that someone is to blame in order to comfort them, nor in order to rile them
up for a lawsuit.  "There is no such thing as an accident" he tells people,
and himself.
    He sees himself as an avenger of wrongs, truly believing every word he
says because he repeats them to himself so often.  Ironically, his daughter,
a drug addict with AIDS, is an accident where no one is to blame.  In the
effort to console himself to counterbalance the out-of-control life of his
own, he has created a world where he is in control, where he is doing the
right thing and affixing blame.  He claims his job is to ensure moral
integrity.
Far from being the main character, Mitchell Stevens is only a part of the
myriad of stories surrounding the accident.  The Burnell family is home to
Nicole (Sarah Polley), a woman crippled in the accident and Sam (Tom
McCamus), a father coping with a power shift as his own lies and abuse turn
around and bite him.  Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose) is a bus driver
having to cope with self-guilt over believing she has caused a blameless
accident.  Billy Ansel (Bruce Greenwood) is a Vietnam vet who has now lost
everything: his two twins died in the accident and his wife died from cancer
a couple of years before.
    The story shows the severe pain of the accident, and then the incredible
need to affix blame.  Whether it be people who turn away from religion due
to their own inability to accept a God who would let this happen or the need
to believe that an act such as Nicole wearing one of Billy Ansel's late
wife's shirts brought bad luck, or the belief that the guardrail was too
weak or that someone calculated the cost variance between a ten cent bolt
and a million dollar out of court settlement, someone or something has to be
to blame.
    We are human, and as human beings blame MUST be affixed to everything.
It is impossible to accept the explanation that it simply happened.  The
film illustrates, however, not that there actually is someone to blame but
rather that the human need to affix blame is a destructive attitude.  The
town eviscerates itself as people begin to take sides, as greed begins to
take over grief and the blame becomes a deadly cancer.
    The film is hauntingly beautiful, populated with incredible images.
Like Fargo and A Simple Plan, it uses a snowy landscape to portray an
emotional bleakness.  It is also populated with extreme symbolism and grave
metaphors worthy of the greatest literary minds.  With a non-linear
narrative and  a great gift for storytelling, writer-director Atom Egoyan
manages to keep his film open to interpretation.  He also juggles in the air
multiple-character storylines and multi-layered narrative.  Augmenting the
book's simple before-and-after layering, he incorporated the Robert Browning
poem "The Pied Piper of Hamelin" as a way to make a literary parallel.
    For those who follow the newsgroup on which I publish all of my reviews,
rec.arts.movies.reviews, you may remember that in fact I have already
reviewed this movie.  I did not do this film justice, and recent events made
me think of it again.
    Currently, we live in a world that has recently been devastated by a
school shooting in Littleton, Colorado.  We are now in stage two of the
disaster: media and lawyer frenzy.  As I type, lawyers and journalists
descend upon Littleton like a plague of locusts.  Copycats have begun to
spring up everywhere (near my home, one school has had a bomb scare and
another had two people walk in wearing black trenchcoats).  Recently, a
Marilyn Manson concert in Colorado was cancelled due to the fact that the
two killers listened to industrial music.
    Fingers are being pointed.  The media is trying to fix blame to anything
they can.  Violent movies, the German band Rammstein, the media: there is
talk of lawsuits everywhere.  The computer game "Doom" is being blamed
because of its violent content.  The parents, as always, are getting more
than their share of flak.  Some people say that the killers were completely
insane.  Religious fanatics say that it is the devil's work.  Atheists will
place blame on anything in the world that they can.  Plenty of us will say
"fate."  The ACLU will argue that it was anything other than anything that
would infringe upon the bill of rights.  The NRA of course claims that it is
blameless, and the police shrug their shoulders.  As soon as the lawyers
begin their destructive reconstruction, these groups will begin to point
fingers at each other.
    On Honnsburger, a KDKA radio show run by a conservative Republican, a
girl called in to say that the other students were to blame for them
insulting the killers to no end.  Honnsburger brought the girl to tears by
telling her she needed therapy and by yelling at her for defending the
killers.  Liberal politicians are calling for more gun control. Conservative
politicians yell back "Guns don't kill people, people kill people."  The
Right Wing is exploiting this to hype the need for censorship of music,
movies, and video games.  The Left Wing is saying, "You can't legislate
responsibility."  School boards call for metal detectors, armed guards, and
higher security.  Janet Reno calls for more guidance counsellors so that we
can prevent such a tragedy from happenning again.  Everyone is saying that
this is a prime example of how our society is out of control.
  Classrooms are divided by diverging opinions.  Water cooler jokes have
turned into water cooler political discussions.  At the rate we're going,
Littleton will become a hot topic in the 2000 presidential debates.
    This insane need to affix blame is ripping the country apart.  Our anger
is taking over our grief, placing us at each other's throats instead of at
funeral parlors.  This is no longer a time of mourning, it is a time of
yelling.  The country is becoming crazier than the act that started the
insanity.
    For all of you, everyone reading this article, I am making the only
demand that I have ever made as a critic.  Go home and rent The Sweet
Hereafter.  View it with Littleton in mind.

Title
Review for Last Supper, The (1995)
What if you could go back in time to Austria, 1909, and eat lunch with an
Austrian art student named Adolf. Do you kill him? Is the death of another
for the greater good worth the act of killing? Therein lies the premise of
the dark dramity/thriller The Last Supper.
Five liberal grad students invite someone over to dinner every Sunday to
talk. About religion; about politics; about sex; about anything and
everything. But when they end up killing (in self defense) one of their
dinner guests -- a psychopath who believes that Hitler was right -- things
change. The liberals decide to stop talking and start taking action: in the
form of a series of murders of hard-line conservatives.
The five get almost addicted to the murders: they form their outlet to
political frustrations in life. They right wrongs, they prevent murders, but
is what they're doing right?
The film is obviously an essay, but is one of the beautiful essays so open
to interoperation that it is nearly impossible to not interpret towards an
outcome you desire. You could say that it is an endorsement, flat-out, of
conservatives: if liberals are killing people, then conservatives should be
the saner group by default. Others could say that the film endorses
liberals. You can believe the ones who died did so for the greater good.
On a raw critical aspect it lacks in performances or skillful direction but
makes up for it in creative genius. I have never seen a film be so political
without saying a definitive word one way or the other. Nor have I seen such
a quirky plot come off as believable. Also, never has a film crossed my eyes
that has been so satiric without screaming its metaphor in your face. It is
a world in which almost nothing is sure. One thing, however, is for sure:
the film has a definitive message, but it is sheltered so in as much
ambiguity as the plot.

Title
Review for Wrongfully Accused (1998)
    Leslie Neilson is the missing ingredient (and perhaps link) that makes
these things funny.  There's just something, the X-Factor, about him on
celluloid that we have all grown to love, that lets us accept parodies that
wouldn't fly with anyone else.  They let the inner child go free, let us
have fun, and let us laugh.  It's him, that's all.  Leslie Neilson, like a
brand name, making us laugh since 1980 (Airplane!).  Through the parody trio
of the Naked Gun films, to the bomb Spy Hard, to his series Police Squad,
the Airplane! Films, and a very little known nature special he did that
somehow ended up not making me flip the channel, he just does it perfectly.
He has a funny face; he has a funny pathos.  He's just a funny guy.
    This movie is the standard Neilson film, this time with him as Ryan
Harrison, who was wrongfully accused of murder.  You're thinking The
Fugitive, right?  Kind of.  Thrown into the mix are Mission: Impossible,
Patriot Games, The Usual Suspects, Lone Star, Clear and Present Danger, The
Day of the Jackal, 2001, The House of Yes, The Saint and Baywatch.  It
proves it, I guess, that the people who do these things actually have brains
to know the little touches in movies we've never heard of (or, at least most
of us).  There really is no plot to it, but, hell, it's fun.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Directed by John Lasseter (Toy Story), and Andrew Stanton (A Story)
Written by Andrew Stanton, Don McEnery (Hercules), and Bob Shaw (Hercules)
Featuring the voices of: Dave Foley ("Newsradio"), Kevin Spacey (LA
Confidential), Julia Louis-Dreyfus ("Seinfeld"), Hayden Panettiere (The
Object of my Affection), Phyillis Diller ("The Bold and the Beautiful"),
Richard Kind ("Spin City"), David Hyde Pierce ("Frasier"), Joe Ranft (Toy
Story), Dennis Leary (Wag the Dog), Johnathan Harris ("Lost in Space"),
Madeline Kahn (Clue), Bonnie Hunt (Jumanji)
Well, the battle of the bugs is finally over and I think, cash wise, that
Disney will come out on top once again. After all, there is such a thing a
customer loyalty when it comes to kids and animated movies and whatever they
see at McDonalds (Disney) seems to be their drug of choice. Sadly, it has to
be ours.
A Bug's Life is about a colony of Ants who refuse to give their food over to
the locusts (actually the film's main character, Flick (the Leonardo da
Vinci of Ants (he'd cut an ear off if he had one), messes things up for them
at the beginning by knocking over the altar the ants give the grasshoppers
food on). Having to meet double-quota by the end of fall, the powers that be
send Flick away on a false mission to get larger bugs to help them defeat
the grasshoppers.
So Flick's out of the way and they're working their tails (if they had em)
off to get enough food for the grasshoppers and them. But Flick ends up
mistaking some circus bugs for warriors (due to the temper of Francis
(Dennis Leary), and comes back with them. They find out what he actually
wants, decide to leave, but end up staying after saving one of the Queen
ant's daughters, Dot, from being eaten by a bird (who has a roar that sounds
like a T-rex from Jurassic Park). Why? They got applause, and they suck at
being circus bugs so they'll be narcissistic and get appreciation any way
they can.
So everyone, under the guidance of the genius ant Flick, bands together to
defeat the grasshoppers while developing characters, making cheap jokes, and
laughing all around.
The sad thing about this year's battle of the bugs was that neither film
could make it the right for both ages, like Pixar's earlier film Toy Story
and the rather intelligent short Geri's Game, which everyone got to watch as
A Bug's Life started up. This one catered specifically to the younger
generation, which is fine for them but disappoints me, because I haven't
been five for a long time. Antz catered to us but had our children staring
with a giant "huh"? Look on their faces. I'm saddened by the both of them,
as much as I personally loved Antz, because they've all gotten so caught up
in making the buck that they've forgotten that they have to appeal to both
kids and adults.
I thought both were funny, I thought both had excellent computer animation,
and I think both will do moderately well. But if they could have only
focused on their target audience (families), then they would have done a
helluva lot better.

Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
Okay, here's what I think happened with Hard Rain. The producers of Speed
(Ian Brice, Mark Gordon, Allison Lyon Segon) went out after their big hit
and partied a little too much, poured one too many drinks down the hatchet.
They figured, hey, I've got the perfect tag line for a movie: A simple plan.
An instant fortune. Just add water.
So they take this idea and put it together, just adding water (5 Million
gallons of water) and a bunch of special effects, use their success with
Speed to muster Christian Slater, Randy Quaid, Minnie Driver (what a drop
from Good Will Hunting), and Morgan Freeman on board this ill-fated voyage.
The realize at this point that they forgot a script so they get the guy who
wrote Speed off from the set of HBO's From the Earth to the Moon and have
him draft one up in, say, three or four days. They don't even ever look at
the script and just pass it on (along with money in a crumpled envelope) to
cinematographer Mikael Salamon, figuring "The last time we got a
cinematographer to direct (Jan de Bont, Speed), it was a hit."
Then, with a couple more martinis, they all began the shoot. It dragged on
forever because they kept revising the script and puking and all of them got
sea sickness so they re-titled from The Flood to Hard Rain, put a biblical
quote in front of the trailer and said: all right, we're done.
Of course by this point in time the movie was landed not only in the worst
film month of the year (January), but while James Cameroon's epic Titanic is
still on its way to the top ten movies of all time. But, hey, they're still
drinking away so they don't notice that. At the end of it all they have a
terrible movie out making next to no money and pretty soon they're going to
wake up with one huge hangover. I don't want to have to foot the bill for
their four year long party night.

Title
Review for Cupid's Mistake (2000)
We all know the feeling.  We love them, but they love someone else.  All
right, it might not even be that we love them, but we at least have a vested
interest in finding yourself snuggled next to them late at night.  It
happens all the time, and there isn't a damn thing that anyone can do about
it.  With all of the times Cupid's arrow has misfired, let's be glad he
doesn't like to do a William Tell on all of us.
In fact, Cupid may strike gold and make us love the one that loves us
everyone once in a while, but in the general he's got all of the accuracy of
a Brittney Spears song... he hits everything but the mark, get's everyone
all riled up over nothing, and makes us turn out a lot of Hollywood dribble
in the hopes of getting further in a relationship that is going nowhere.
Such is the subject of Young Man Kang's (not a typo, it's really his name)
film Cupid's Mistake, in which girl number one likes guy number one who
likes girl number two who like guy number two who likes girl number one.
Yes, we're back in geometry class studying this love rectangle, hoping that
it doesn't turn to dribble like just about every other Hollywood romance.
Filmed on a budget of $980, Cupid's Mistake works off of improvisation,
bizarre videography techniques, and incredible acting from complete nobodies
in the acting world.   Yet it still ends up keeping us from being sick to
our stomachs, only has one time that we see the reflection of the
videographer, and is romantic besides... all of which makes us wonder why
the hell we pay for a $10 million Julia Stiles/Freddie Prinze Jr vehicle
that does none of the above and makes us feel like we're going to vomit from
its utter lack of quality besides.
Kang deserves credit for conceptualizing an editing a no budget film on no
budget, finding a distributor (Pandera Cinema) despite having no budget, and
also making a film that actually entertains on said budget of zero.  The
slick videography techniques Kang uses are readily available using almost
any video editing software, and Kang edits his movie so smoothly that the 90
minutes of it fly by.
Yet I'm really not praising the emperor with no clothes because he saved
the cost of fabric... really.  The quadrangle behind Cupid's Mistake is well
set up, the story solid and the acting as solid as you would expect from
actual professionals (they are all credited actors, just none you would
recognize), and the improvisation lends a real credo to the dialogue
(although there is no "Gillian's Island" monologue, this kicks the shit out
of the Blair Witch Project's conversations).  I would go so far as to
venture that Cupid's Mistake would be a pleasant art house romance without
it being the up and coming poster boy of the digital video revolution that
it is.
Of course there are flaws.  Although the acting is solid and the
conversation real, the actors still come off as slightly fake.  At points it
becomes clear that the dialogue is attempting to reach predestined points,
and that the story has needed trimming here or there, and some of the
visuals just don't work as well on video (which tries to compensate for
natural lighting that could have served great purposes at certain points) as
they would on film, but all of these flaws would have been eliminated (at
the efficiency Kang works on) with an extra grand or two in the coffer.  All
in all it's a solid indie flick, not perfect, not bad, and definitely worth
a view.
Join James' mailing list: http://filmcritic2000.listbot.com/
Visit James' page at Epinions: http://mk2k.epinions.com/user-mk2k
Visit SHORT STUFF: http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Withdrawal. It has to be withdrawal. This is now Day 2 of my lovely vacation
and here I am thinking about it. No CNN. No printer. No Internet. And, come
to think of it, no cheesy movies. I suppose, having become accustomed to the
bad for so long, I have accepted them, learned to deal with them, and become
addicted to the destruction of them in a well thought out review. I suppose
its ironic that the film that makes me want to tear a film apart, that
should make me learn that the bad films, the suffering, is a part of my life
as a movie critic, should be one focused on Buddhism. And it's also ironic
that it should stir the violence in my blood.
The film I'm talking about is Martin Scorscese's Kundun, the Dahlia Lama
film of 1997 that was nominated for four academy awards but walked away with
none (sadly). With a cast that no one's heard of it still managed to pull
off what is becoming impossible: make a great film about a religion that is,
for the most part, misunderstood. Make you sympathize with the Tibetans, and
hate the Red Chinese, and, at the same time, illustrate the drama of the
Dahlia Lama's early life.
It wasn't bad. No, in fact, the film itself was relaxing to watch, and a
helluva lot better than Seven Years in Tibet, the other Dahlia Lama film
that came out at about the same time. Not that it wasn't good to watch: no,
sir, I'm left enjoying almost every frame, the beautiful photography of the
film, the exquisite locations and vistas that it offered. It wasn't even the
direction and acting in the film: they were fine, too. Dramatic content,
writing, miscellaneous technical aspects that I don't even know why I
bothered to learn the names of them. None of them have serious flaws. None
of them annoy me in any shape, way, or form. What annoys me is that I have
become used to, no, addicted to, the ripping apart in a film in my review.
And that's what I'm missing. I'm not just missing it; I'm aching for it. If
I keep seeing films this good, all the time, with nary a bad film, then I
will cease to function as a critic, lose my cruelty and my respect for the
great films, like Kundun, and then I'll REALLY be unable to do my job.
I'll be stuck doing nothing, and be bereft of my moviewatching experience. I
suppose it's taught me something, this movie about a religion I hardly know
outside of the cinema: not only is suffering a part of my life: as a critic,
inflicting suffering is a part of my life too.

Title
Review for Auto, L' (1998)
Written and Directed by Richard Ferrando
Starring Aaron Miller and Brad J. Tarratt
http://www.geocities.com/~yevlar//films/leauto/lauto-movie2.rm
    A word of advice to colleagues and independent film fans alike: watch
the newsgroups.  The newsgroups, the very item upon which you are most
likely reading this review, is the ultimate in the form of free press.
Anyone, even in the most oppressive totalitarian regime anywhere in the
world, can post anything they would like to a newsgroup provided they have
access to a terminal with which to do so.  Free speech exists there in its
perfect form.  On the very humble server (only 20,000 groups or so) that I
use, news.alltel.net, you can find newsgroups ranging from
alt.books.thomas-pynchon to microsoft.public.java.visualj++ to, being
tongue-in-cheek, free.sex.
    It was in search in alt.movies.cinematography that I discovered a link
to the homepage of Rigor Mortis Productions, a company that has, in the span
of three years (1997-1999), turned out 7 short films, including the
brilliant sketch L'Auto.
    Do not be scared away by its French name: this interesting little
company is completely American, filming mostly in Royal Oak, Michigan.  The
imdb user commends for L'Auto was what originally brought it to the peak of
my strange tastes an senses: A man has an interesting conversation with his
car.
    Going to the official website, I was expecting to hear something along
the lines of the objects-as-narrators voice that novelist Tom Robbins has
used, but instead was greeted by a nicely packaged, quick download (1.5 MB)
RealVideo file of the entire film.
    The free-expression artist in myself must stop to laud these people on
that measure only.
Far from worrying about making a profit off this film, it has become one of
the first to enter the public domain.  You do not have to pay to see it: all
you need is an ISP and RealVideo.  For those who do not have the internet,
going and viewing this at your public library is an option.  To see people
not as concerned with making money hand over fist is music to my
independent-film-loving ears.
    As I was saying before I embarked on my crusade towards public-domain
(long live MP3's), I expected Tom Robbins.  Tom Robbins has a quiet humor,
but nothing too over-the-top with each of his objects that he uses.  Not
only that, Tom Robbins spends countless hours inserting message into his
novels, pondering over social issues, and telling an entertaining story.
    L'Auto goes beyond entertaining and into the realm of complete hilarity
with this picturesque sketch where, when a man (John, played by Aaron
Miller) yells at his Ford one too many times, the Ford (voiced by Brad J.
Taratt) gets fed up and yells back.
    What I was reminded of watching this was not Tom Robbins, not Michner,
not anyone literary who uses objects or locations as narrators, but instead
of  (drumroll, please) MONTY PYTHON.  The entire effort seemed inspired by
the Python film And Now For Something Completely Different, a collection of
the most famous Python sketches and short collected into one long,
disjointed, and ungodly hilarious film.
    The conversation has the Ford take the upper hand, yell at its driver in
a British accent and complain about a rash the size of a Buick on its ass,
to which John responds: "Not one single part of you is the size of a Buick!"
only to have the Ford retort: "I was speaking metaphorically."
    Like Monty Python, the only legitimate gripe that I have is that the
acting isn't all that great.  It is as good as the roles require, but, hell,
its comedy, and acting normally doesn't mean shit in comedy.
    The film makes fun in all sorts of ways, showing intelligence beyond
what you would expect: who would think of a French title to an American
film, only to joke?  Not to mention it makes you think.  It may be like the
self-defense-against-a-vegetable-sketch from And Now For Something
Completely Different, but it does actually make you think.
I'm not going to say I can write a paper on this film, because I can't.  In
fact, this review is probably longer than the script, but damn, people, it's
funny.  Independent film fans, people who like off-the-wall-humor, and
fellow critics alike, view this film.  It's only ten minutes out of your
day.

Title
Review for Screwed (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/00749ece25ab063e882568de001da736?OpenDocument
Rarely does a film like Screwed come across my desk: a film so utterly
easy to insult, from its title on in, that writing the review is an
absolute piece of cake.  Somehow, the producers of this film chose the
title Screwed over such options as Ballbusted, Foolproof, and
Pittsburgh, probably hoping to attract a teenage crowd with its
would-been-risque-if-not-for-the-likes-of-S.F.W. title and its screwball
Norm-MacDonald-needs-better-work antics.  Sadly, this marketing
technique will probably succeed and result in, well, a lot of people
feeling screwed.
Screwed concerns a butler (Norm MacDonald) and a chicken wing vendor
(David Chapelle) who team up to try to, well, screw a bitter old hag out
of five million dollars.  Needless to say, the plan goes south, and the
two have to run all over Pittsburgh (which is obviously not really
Pittsburgh) to get away with their perfect crime.  Norm sleeps with some
girl in a bit part that should have been bigger, David convinces good
old Norm to fake his death with the help of a mortician (Danny DeVito),
and all the while we watch the hag bitch and gripe, not really caring
The antics in Screwed are childish, the humor pandering to a sub-human
chord that will resonate with no one with an IQ over 80.  Norm MacDonald
once again shows that the pinnacle of his career will most likely be
doing the Weekend Update on SNL (a shtick which has been stolen and
improved upon by `The Daily Show' on Comedy Central, a job Norm
MacDonald should campaign for vigorously).  David Chapelle shows that
his comedic talents lie in stand up and not physical antics.  The
pleasure that Screwed offers is in the supporting role of DeVito, which
is pretty much only a pleasure because watching DeVito in such a darkly
comic role is so very different from the average part you see him
pigeonholed into.
Screwed is the perfect title for this movie if only because, after
watching it, you feel screwed six ways from Sunday by virtue of how
absolutely wretched this pitiful excuse for a film is.  Writer-directors
Scott Alexander and Larry Karazewski, the writing team behind Milos
Forman's last two flicks, Man on the Moon and The People vs. Larry
Flynt, should probably stick to writing other peoples' movies.  Behind
the camera, they prove that directing is not their strong suit, and that
the input that others add to the script proves invaluable to the end
product.  Letting them direct, it seems, just gets a lot of people
screwed.
Director: Scott Alexander and Larry Karazewski
Writer: Scott Alexander and Larry Karazewski
Starring: Norm MacDonald, David Chapelle, and Danny DeVito

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Directed by Nora Ephron (Sleepless in Seattle)
Written by Nora Ephron and Delia Ephron (Mixed Nuts)
Starring Tom Hanks (Saving Private Ryan), Meg Ryan (When Harry Met Sally),
Parker Posey (Coneheads), Greg Kinnear (As Good as it Gets)
Some people feel the need to do something more than once (i.e. Gus Van Sant
with Psycho).  Some people feel the need to re-unite actors (i.e. Edward
Burns). Some people feel the need to re-hash a plot (take your pick of any
number of movies).  But only a select few can pull it off.
Nora Ephron, Tom Hanks, and Meg Ryan have graduated into that select cadre
with You've Got Mail.
The plot is a carbon-copy of Sleepless in Seattle, their earlier
collaboration: a man and a woman are completely in love with one another
without ever having direct contact in a romantic sense.  In Sleepless in
Seattle, it was a radio broadcast late at night that turned Meg Ryan on to
Tom Hanks.  In You've Got Mail, we have fully entered the electronic world
and this time the two meet in an AOL over 30 chatroom.  The two of them
begin corresponding via the electronic medium while hashing it out in real
life.  Tom Hanks is Joe Fox, book mogul and owner of the new Fox Books
superstore in the Upper West Side.  Meg Ryan is Kathleen Kelly, your average
Upper West Side indepdent bookstore owner challenging the conglomerates
springing up around her.
If you've seen Sleepless in Seattle, you already know where this will end
up.  In fact, it ends up just about where every other one of these romantic
comedies ends up: the boy gets the girl.  Along the way there's the radical
difference (and the differences, I remind you, are all that matter
nowadays), that the two people in love are fully using the electronic
medium: not to mention committing Internet infidelity at the same time (Tom
Hanks cheating on Parker Posey, Meg Ryan cheating on Greg Kinnear).  If that
wasn't enough to make it different, this one adds in the nice aspect of
character development.
All of us who care -- smart people, movie critics, patrons of romances
rather than action films -- will be much more pleased that we finally see a
movie where the characters are cared about and not you equation romances.
We can actually fall in love along with them.  In this aspect, because of
the fact that the two main characters are seen both inside and outside of
the context of their romance, it actually far surpasses Sleepless in
Seattle, which, to be honest, was somewhat lacking.
So, all you romantic comedy fans, go ahead and stop by the local multiplex
and get your mail.  You may just be surprised what it says.

Title
Review for Tank Girl (1995)
Staring Lori Petty, Naomi Watts, Ice-T, and Malcolm MacDowell.
 I don't know what it is.  Maybe it's just that I'm a New Jersey mallrat.
Maybe it's the fact that I'm a lifeless film geek who can fall in love with
a story about a girl and her tank.  Then again, maybe I'm just insane.
 But, really, with a movie as fun as Tank Girl, who gives a damn?
 Tank Girl could be viewed, if you want to put it intellectually, as a
parody of post-apocolyptical nightmare movies.  Hell, it's a lot more fun
that watching The Postman.  If you want to put it intellectually, Tank Girl
could be taken as an anti-facist document.  It could be taken as a warning
of the evils of greed.  It could be taken as a feminist protest, or as a
showing of lesbian idealism.  It could be the new film for the group that
boldly states "I am woman, hear me roar", whoever they are this day of the
week.
 But, you know what, that's all bullshit.  Tank Girl isn't intellectual, it
isn't literary, it isn't philosophical in any way shape or form that I could
discern.  Then why did I enjoy it?  Because I'm human and it was fun.
 Tank Girl follows (*gasp*) Tank Girl (Lori Petty) and Jet Girl (Naomi
Watts) on their battle against Water and Power, headed by an evil mad
scientist played by Malcolm MacDowell, who revives his unique insanity that
he displayed in Stanley Kubrick's A Clockwork Orange.
 The year is 2033 and, ever since a comet struck the Earth 14 years ago,
it's been a little different.  No celebrities, no cable TV, NO WATER.  But,
in the words of Tank Girl herself, "about 20 people have to shower together,
so it ain't all bad".
 Tank Girl is about like any other Gen-X heroine, sarcastic, sexy, able to
kill people using her legs without breaking a nail.  She's beer drinking,
she's boxing, she's going around as a rebel stealing water from the
notorious W&P (Water and Power).  Of course, W&P decides to take them out
and she barely survives.  She's captured, but not before seeing her
boyfriend die and killing eight W&P soldiers.  Oh, well.
 Tank Girl's put to work as a slave in W&P and still keeps her sarcasm.  The
evil scientist in charge wants her to work for him, but, being the hooker
with the heart of gold that she is, she refuses.  And, of course, she
befriends a disgruntled jet technician, Jet Girl.  Jet Girl's just fitting
in, trying not to let her supervisor get in her greasy overalls, but she's
about to fail at that goal when (*all guys cheer*) lesbian kiss!
 Ok.  Since I've laid it out in pure English with more sarcasm than Imus,
I'm only going to ASSUME you're following me.  Basically, Tank Girl steals a
Tank and Jet Girl steals a jet, and they get away from W&P.  But we're not
done yet, gotta kill the bad guy.  So the evil scientist takes a little girl
that's a friend of Tank Girl's, holds her hostage while he waits for Tank
Girl to come and save her.
 Tank and Jet, ever out of their minds and cracking jokes, get the help of
the Rippers, an army of half-kangaroo, half-man soldiers who all believe
their someone reincaranted (one of them believes he was Jack Keorack,
another believes he was a dog).
 I'll be the first to admit that Tank Girl has absolute zero as far as
redeeming value is concerned.  But, you know what, I find that if I expect a
drama each time I go to the theatre, I just get pissed off.  So, you know
what, I'm looking at Tank Girl as a comic book movie, as a sarcastic dark
comedy.  And, as far as those go, Tank Girl's an 88mm.

Title
Review for Fat Man and Little Boy (1989)
Written by Bruce Robinson and Roland Joffe
Starring Paul Newman, Dwight Schultz, John Cusack, and Laura Dern
 The trouble with true stories is a subject I like to tackle.  I really hit
it hard with Patch Adams, which was idiotic enough to use "based on a true
story" as its tag line.  Likewise, I'm not going easy on Fat Man and Little
Boy for the fact that it is based on fact.
 Fat Man and Little Boy, for anyone who has been locked up for the past
sixty years, are the two atomic bombs dropped on Japan.  The movie is
basically a humanization of the people who invented in, the team of crackpot
physicists on the Manhattan Project (led by Dr. J. Robert Oppenheimer,
played by Dwight Schultz) and the military general in charge (Leslie Groves,
played by Paul Newman).  John Cusack plays the wunderkid of the physicists,
Michael Merriman.  Laura Dern plays his girlfriend, a nurse.
 Now I like Cusack and I love Dern, but Paul Newman has gotten on my nerves
one too many times and Dwight Schultz is too much a character actor to play
the part.  He can play a nerd, he can play a funny nerd, but he can't play a
moralistic nerd.
 The movie spends about two hours talking.  The first part of it is talking
physics.  The second part of it is talking morals.  Physics is a subject you
probably don't have any interest in.  Morals are a subject that, when
applied right, push emotional buttons.
 With the way Fat Man and Little Boy was filmed, morals don't do much for
it.  To a brain, the movie is slightly fascinating to watch.  To a
philosopher, the movie might be interesting.  To Joe Schmoe from Alamo,
forget it.
 All of the plot twists can be found in the history books, so I don't
hesistate to spoil the ending: they build the impossible weapon.  And along
the way a couple of people die.  And by the time they get it done they
really didn't need it, but the cruel general wanted it so they gave it to
him.  Etc.
 The movie might actually have been good if it had been done with a little
more penance.  The characters may be real, but they are not well developed.
We do not get any reasons why for anyone.  In a normal movie this would be
OK but Fat Man and Little Boy decided it wanted not only to be a moralistic
sermon on the mount but a character drama, too.
 Even the good actors in this film perform badly.  Dern, normally one of the
finest actresses to grace the silver screen over the past 20 years, ends up
simply acting the lovestruck bimbo.  Cusack, a generally smart fellow, does
his best to act his worst.
 And don't even get me started on Paul Newman.
 I grew up in the Cold War.  I grew up with constantly being told that we
could be nuked at any moment.  I grew up with the history lessons on the
creation of the bomb.
 I don't care to watch a bad two-hour long film about it.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net
Help suppport MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/ .  Share
your opinions on books, movies, music, software, travel, and just about
anything else under the sun.

Title
Review for Rocky Horror Picture Show, The (1975)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/4650ea226b8fd7108825696b0058451e?OpenDocument
Well here we are, doing the time warp again.
Celebrating 25 years of making high-schoolers giddy with its debauchery
and high camp, The Rocky Horror Picture Show is back with a 25th
Anniversary two-disc DVD edition, complete with deleted scenes,
outtakes, interviews, and an audience participation track.
But never mind the extra scenes: Nobody sees Rocky Horror out of some
longing for a deeper meaning.  We see it because it's a messed up film,
and every once in a while its fun to just sit back, go wild, dress up in
garters and watch a messed up movie.
Um.  Forget that thing about dressing up in garters.
For those unfamiliar with Rocky Horror, the film concerns the creation
of a oversexed Frankenstein by the name of Rocky for the sole purpose of
being a lovetoy for sexually ambiguous transvestite Dr. Frank-n-Furter
(Tim Curry).  Frankie's a little crazy, so he invites motorcycle gangs
to party, murders people in public, eats food on their corpses, and
begins singing and dancing funny rock musical numbers.  Witnessing this
are Brad (Barry Bostwick) and Janet (Susan Surrandon), two
recently-engaged youngsters living in the shadow of the 70s.  This
bizarre combination leads to some of the most fucked-up musical numbers
you'll ever hear outside of the parody songs you sing to yourself in the
shower and a generally enjoyable film.
Rocky Horror was pretty purely brain candy when it came out, and it
remains that way to present day, extras or no.  If you haven't already,
you should definitely see it, if only so that you will no longer be
considered a virgin in the eyes of fanatics.  But as for all this extra
junk?  Just give me a simple sweet transvestite and forget about all the
rest of it.
Director: Jim Sharman
Producer: Michael White
Writer: Jim Sharman and Richard O'Brien
Starring: Tim Curry, Susan Surrandon, Barry Bostwick, Richard O'Brien,
Patricia Quinn, Nell Campbell, Jonathan Adams, Peter Hinwood, Meatloaf,
and Charles Gray
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
In "Loaded Weapon 1", William Shattner said : "Irony can be pretty ironic,
can't it?". Before, it was simply a statement that lodged itself in my mind
because of its utter absurdity. Now it has entered my repertoire of
quotations that can actually be used for something.
What possible use can something that stupid have? Good question, with a
mediocre answer. The only use I could come up with was to help describe my
loathing for a movie a million times more idiotic than the  unique quote.
And what idiotic movie is it that I describe? The one that evoked such pity
for having to put that on an actor's resume?
The movie, without further ado, is "Kiss The Girls", a new serial killer
movie on the market. Its just your standard killer-sees-girl,
killer-stalks-girl, killer-abducts, tortures, and murders-girl story that
we've seen a million times before, and, believe me, this ain't "Silence of
the Lambs".
Question number two : why all the irony? The fact is, I had every reason to
love this movie : I lived in the area where it was filmed, I read and loved
the book, and I respect and admire the actors, actresses, and director. But,
hey, its just the death throes of this years Summer of Irony (movies that we
all thought would be good but were really horrible). The simple fact is that
this is a movie that I wouldn't see again if it was on HBO on a summer
Saturday (and I'll watch anything on TV on a summer Saturday).
What made it so bad? Was it the cliché? The complete failure to make
characters who I cared about? The dearth of a villain I either hated or
liked? Or was it the fact that the movie was so downplayed that it annoyed
me completely? It was actually a combination of all of these wretched
attributes that made me focus my antipathy through the lens of rhetoric and
set my target sight on writing a disparaging review of this idiotic movie.
The movie opens nice, actually, giving an eerie title sequence in which the
killer talks to one of his victims about his first three murders, a sequence
so well done that you can't help feel a chill down your spine (looking back,
however, the newest preview of "Titanic" sent more of a chill, buy, what can
you do?). This single sequence, if placed in the middle of the movie, could
have turned around my opinion and made me pack up my sniper's rifle.
Sadly, this is the beginning and from there it degrades into nothingness,
going well past zero. It has great action sequences (kudos to the
cinematographer, Aaron Schnieder) and good performances from the actors
(Morgan Freeman as Alex Cross, Ashley Judd as Kate McTiernan), but that's
all it has to offer me as a viewer.
But then there was the worst part, the absolute zero of the movie. The fact
prevails that it downplays the sensationalism that ran rampant in the book:
one of the only things that just shocks you into continuing reading. That's
the final straw, the bullet loaded and the safety off. Ready. Aim. Fire.

Title
Review for Mind Games (1996)
Starring Brian Krause, Maria Ford, Soleil Moon Frye, Richard Paul, Raina
Paris
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 When I review a movie that I have seen the beginning of (and turned off)
three times, it's normally not a good sign.  It tells me that I'm too
obsessed with film to not watch a terrible movie to completion.  It also
says that the movie was terrible beyond belief.
 Mind Games, as the tile implies, deals with a horrendous set of implausible
mind games that would be nearly impossible to do.  Like almost every mystery
put out now, it contains more sex than mystery, and thus the movie, which
was already thin, has less girth than a bulimic.  It follows psychology
professor Matt Jarvis, who becomes the victim of a series of incidents
stemming from a relationship with a student at his last college (that
ultimately resulted in her suicide).  At a new college, he is nearly forced
into signing a paper stating that he will not date his students (even though
its already against the bylaws), becomes the subject of the obsessive desire
of one of his students, and ultimately ends up trying to salvage his job due
to a series of screw ups.
 All the while he is being visited by what he believes is the ghost of his
former lover.
 All right, first of all, this should tell you that Mind Games is a complete
patch work of a film.  It steals from Fatal Attraction, from dozens of
horror-mysteries, and from about every other erotic thriller ever written.
Yet, unlike the erotic thrillers that Mind Games steals from, Mind Games is
not very erotic at all.  You see, for a movie to be at all erotic, it has to
have some tension to it, some pace.  Mind Games has neither.
 Mind Games, a highly commercial film that failed to recognize that the
secret to making a movie sexy isn't just having sex and nudity in it,
decides that it should instead pour on the plot.  And it does.
 Of course, the plot that it pours on isn't original plot at all.  Its stole
n plot.  The plot twists are predictable.  The actions of the character make
you feel as if you are watching an American style soap opera with French
censors in charge.  In fact, with a little bit of editing, Mind Games could
end up as an episode of "Days of Our Lives" and hardly anyone would notice.
 The performances in this movie are atrocious.  Each member of the cast acts
as if they just graduated with a degree in theatre from a community college.
All of the women in the movie have obviously had plastic surgery.
 The small grace that Mind Games has is that it does have some bits of
conversation that sound authentic.  All of the scenes dealing with sex and
morality seem completely contrived, yet there is a single sequence of the
film between a psychologist and a writer that is pure gold.  It is whenever
those two characters are together that the writer seems to be able to pull
his dialogue off, as if he didn't truly know his other characters.
 Mind Games isn't a movie I'm going to particularly discourage you from.  I
don't really need to.  Unless you're awake late at night and watching
Showtime or The Movie Channel, you'll never see it.  You might find it at
your video store, but there wouldn't be much worth in going to search for
it.  After all, with a movie like Mind Games, why would you want to?

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
Air Force One (1997, R)
Directed by Wolfgang Peterson (In the Line of Fire)
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe (End of Days)
Starring: Harrison Ford (Star Wars), Gary Oldman (The Professional), William
H. Macy (Pleasantville), Glenn Close (Fatal Attraction), Wendy Crewson (To
Gillian on her 37th Birthday)
Let's say one thing first. Anyone who was expecting to find a really good
movie inside of something that combines Wolfgang Peterson, the director of
"In the Line of Fire" with Harrison Ford of the Star Wars Trilogy and Gary
Oldman, who played the slack-jawed sociopath in the worst movie of the
summer, "The Fifth Element", couldn't be good. Granted, "In the Line of
Fire" was one of the best assassin stories told since "Seven Days in May"
and the Star Wars Trilogy is at least a fun bunch, but the
two-out-of-three-ain't-bad rule just doesn't apply to movies.
In fact, in this movie, what you'd expect is almost reversed.
Gary Oldman is the only one who shows anything worth watching on the screen
while Peterson's copycat style and Ford's Rambo with wrinkles simply don't
work.
Air Force One is supposed to be a story about the hijacking of the
president's plane, but is really simply the hijacking of about five other
plane movies in disguise.
Having somebody go into the machinery and cause mischief? Sound like
"Executive Decision"? Having people being pulled from one plane to another
by a wire? The robbery sequence in "Cliffhanger". Having a kills quick and
never dies superman on the plane? An obvious shoot off of Passenger 57. And
having a demented sociopath in control of a flight? "Turbulence" or "Con
Air", take your pick.
For me this was one of those movies in which I was wondering why I saw it in
the first place as I came out of the theater. That and it was one of the
movies in which you know exactly what is going to happen makes those two
hours ones in which I wish life had a return policy on it.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/96080dfd22979835882568a50018c122?OpenDocument
Written by James Wong, Glen Morgan, and Jeffrey Reddick
Produced by Craig Perry and Warren Zide
Starring Devon Sawa, Kristen Cloke, Amanda Detmer, Chad Donella, Ali
Larter, Sean William Scott, and Brandon Fehr
 "I'm never going to die!" yells one character at a memorial for 39
fellow French-class students who died in a plane crash that, by all
rights, he should have died on too.  As incredibly laughable as this
line is, it provides the big flaw in the basic premise behind Final
Destination making a horror movie about people cheating death does not
have much potential.  Since you can't kill Death, destroy Death, or send
Death screaming back to its home planet, you have a no-win scenario in
front of you.  No matter what is said or done, everyone ends up getting
it.
 This is not to give you a spoiler and to say that everyone gets it in
the movie.  This is simply to point out the fact that no matter which
way they go, they're screwed.  Death is a no-win scenario.  If you're
going to make a movie about escaping death, make it a la Fearless, where
we focus on the human element.  But since it's a horror film the ball is
in the court of Director James Wong to provide us with something that
will keep us interested for an hour and forty minutes of inevitability.
 The film actually does a halfway-decent job of this, but only by going
so far pass the realm of the believable to enter into the land of the
ludicrous.  How so?  Well, virtually everyone who bites it in the movie
does so by the means of a Rube Goldberg contraption.
 Rube Goldberg, for those not familiar with his work, was drew comic
which often depicted a scientist trying to find the most complicated way
to do the most simple job.  A classic example of this is the machine in
which a cord is snapped, a mallet unlocks a cage, an anteater crawls out
from the cage and licks the ants on stamps, thus preparing said stamps
to be mailed.  Final Destination features several of Rube Goldberg's
guillotines forms of death that end up being so drawn out that, about
five minutes into the elaborate trap, you utter a groan and yell at the
movie to get on with it.
 The result is a movie that is only good for the target audience: the
young college student who is looking for an excuse to have his
girlfriend become utterly frightened and leap into his arms.  Do not
think in this film you'll find plot holes.  Do not pay attention to the
dialogue in this film you'll hate it.  Do not expect this film to be up
to par with half of the episodes of "The X-Files" that Wong has worked
on you'll be severely disappointed.
 Final Destination is good for a horror film.  This means that the
acting is terrible, the script was probably written by monkeys, and
somehow you find yourself enjoying the film anyway.  So sit back, relax,
and watch it but only if you like cheese.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/57a29c3ae8f55739882568a50018c59e?OpenDocument
Starring Chris Klein, LeeLee Sobieski, Josh Harnett, and Bruce Greenwood
 In David Mamet's The Spanish Prisoner, Steve Martin puts his two cents
in on doing business in America.  "Always do business as if the person
you're doing business with is trying to screw you, because they probably
are.  And if they're not, you can be pleasantly surprised."  The
entertainment industry is a business, and I conduct myself around this
business with the expectation that each movie that I see will be
terrible.  That way, as I come out of the movie, I can be pleasantly
surprised.
 Don't think I'm crazy It's reverse psychology: it's not supposed to
make sense.
 This weeks pleasant surprise was Here on Earth, a film which I expected
to be LeeLee Sobieski (the scantly-clad tailor's daughter from Eyes Wide
Shut) dropping her intellect and artistic integrity for a more sizable
paycheck.  As it turns out, her intellect and artistic integrity are
about the only things she doesn't drop in this film.  Sobieski plays
Samantha, a small town girl with vices that include (but are not limited
to) scenic waterfalls, birch trees, and Robert Frost poems.  Sam is the
object of the rivaling affections of two boys, a rich prep named Kelley
(Chris Klein), and a hick-with-a-heart named Jasper (Josh Harnett).
 Kelley would have been valedictorian of his prep school if it weren't
for the fact that a joyride / car chase with Jasper resulted in the
destruction of a diner named Mable's Table.  When a judge sentences the
two rivals to rebuild the diner, Sam predictably falls for Kelley.
Rather than play the vicious jealousy card, writer Michael Seitzman
chooses instead to give Sobeiski a terminal illness, and from there the
movie proceeds to its achingly predictable climax.
 After reading the summary on what is likely to go down in history as
one of the worst written scripts ever, you probably are pondering why
Here on Earth was a pleasant surprise.  Well, this film works exactly
like The Hurricane did: by placing great actors in parts not worthy of
them.  Sobeiski is one of the few people that actually can die with
style.  Klein is able to pull of the I-hate-small-towns shtick, act like
a jerk, and still have us love him.  Greenwood plays both stock roles of
the town sheriff and the grieving dad to a T, and Harnett truly shines
as the most human character of the entire group.  In addition to this,
the film is remarkably well photographed.  The nature outside of the
small town is captured perfectly in the lens of Michael D. O'Shea.
Director Mark Piznarski also handles his cast and crew well.
 All in all, Here on Earth is yet another movie that proves that a good
script really isn't necessary to have a good movie.  If it could just
have gotten a good script, Here on Earth could have taken me straight to
heaven.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Get Shorty (1995)
Directed by Barry Sonnenfield (Men In Black)
Starring John Travolta, Rene Russo, Gene Hackman, Danny DeVito, Dennis
Farina
     In my line of work, the most fun you normally get is in the insult.
The good reviews, on the average, are trite, fairly boring items.  They say
the same things, over and over, and rarely give you a chance to have a
creative outlet.  The bad reviews, on the other hand, allow you to have lots
of fun.  The real challenge of the job is to insult a movie in the most
creative way possible, because, although insults run rampant in the world,
very few of them actually take time to use any brainpower.  They normally
come in formats as cliched as some of the films I review, and are equally
boring.
     Sadly, I cannot exercise my creative skills at insulting Get Shorty.
It was just too good of a movie to warrant that.  The thing that is most fun
about Get Shorty, however, is the way it insults the system of Hollywood.
Watching a movie like that, I feel like the movies themselves are replacing
my job: that maybe, maybe, Hollywood might start policing itself.
     The movie is a surprisingly post-modern tale: a shylock trying to
collect money from an idiot doing a scam on an airline ends up in LA and
pitches a movie to another person he's collecting from.  What's the pitch?
A shylock is trying to collect money from an idiot doing a scam on an
airline.  By the end of Get Shorty, you swear you just saw a true story play
out in front of you, but one that poetic license has made completely
hilarious.
     The movie opens with plot and conflict brewing.  `Chili' Palmer (John
Travolta) is having a conversation with a friend in Miami on the coldest day
of the year the temperature is a chilly 34.  Palmer's jacket is stolen by
Ray `Bones' Balbone (Dennis Farina), and Chili quickly steals it back,
breaking his nose in the process.  Bones tries to kill Chili, but almost
gets his hairline shot off instead.
     Chili heads off to Las Vegas to collect a debt, then heads to LA in
further pursuit, having picked up an additional debt on the way.  In LA, he
hooks up with B-movie producer Harry Zimm (Gene Hackman) and his
scream-file-star girlfriend Karen  (Rene Russo).  All of a sudden, he
decides he wants to produce a movie, that is, with the help of Zimm.
     Only one problem: Zimm already owes money to another, LA,
 `Variety'-Reading, loan shark.  One with seventy dollar a yard carpet, a
stuntman for a hood, and an idiot for muscle.  Meantime, he's working on a
drug deal with an idiot named YaYa who thinks that ten year olds in the
airport are actually DEA agents guarding a bag full of $500,000.  Not to
mention Bones is hot on Chili's trail trying to get even with Chili, and
Chili is falling in love with Karen while trying to produce his first
Hollywood feature film.
     As normal, Elmore Leonard's seemingly out of control story has a
direction, a steady plot, and a nice, tidy ending.  Everything comes
together at the end, but it looks messy beforehand.  In between, we're
granted a black satire of the Hollywood system where a loan shark decides to
go into the movie business and seems to know more about it than a seasoned
pro.  Scott Frank does his normal great of capturing a novel so out of
control and transferring it onto the screen without gift-wrapping it for us.
So many of today's adaptations are made nice and neat and ruined in the
process.
     Barry Sonnenfield does an especially good job: his camera follows Chili
everywhere, and his use of the stedicam augments the fast storyline to make
the film itself seem as fast-paced as a baby's heartbeat.
     Like I said, I like to insult.  But I can't do it with this film, this
satire did it for me, taking on the Hollywood system and organized crime
alike and still coming out very funny.  Definitely see it.

Title
Review for Assignment, The (1997)
Written by Dan Gordon and Sabi H. Shabtai
Starring Adian Quinn, Donald Sutherland, Ben Kingsley, and Claudia Ferri
 This is either a new high or a new low. Never before have I seen a movie
one night at 2:10 and reviewed it the next night at 11:49, albeit aided by a
massive overdose of caffeine. This could be viewed as one of two things: a
new level of obsessive behavior putting me right up there with Glenn Close
in Fatal Attraction for a textbook example of crazy, or, the more pleasant
alternative, a new level of commitment to my job combined with a chronic
case of insomnia.
 The movie I watched from 2:10 AM to 4:05 AM was The Assignment, one of two
movies that dealt with "The Jackal" in one way or another that came out in
1997. Although I don't especially think that I would have slept anyway, The
Assignment is not worth losing sleep over.
 Yes, it is enjoyable, and yes, it is intelligent, but, for all of us who
have grown up with James Bond movies and Tom Clancy novels bringing in
millions (not to mention the endgame of the Cold War, in which intelligence
was the only thing actively fighting), it is the same old same old.
 The plot of The Assignment is that you have a terrorist for hire named
Carlos (Aidan Quinn) who is on the run from every government in the world
except the Russians and the Libyans. Among the people who have an especially
good reason to kill him are Henry Fields (aka Jack Shaw) (Donald
Sutherland), who was there at one of his attacks in Paris and a Mosad agent
named Amos (Ben Kingsley) who has absolutely no character motivation
whatsoever.
 Tricked into helping them is Lt. Cmd. Ramirez (Aidan Quinn), an exact look
alike of Carlos with a nuclear family living in Virginia. Ramirez is such a
very memorable character that someone told the imdb that his first name is
Annibal, which is, in fact, the first name of his wife (Claudia Ferri). As
for correcting it, I don't remember his name, either. The characters seem to
be pulled out of a damp storage room from back when espionage films were
chic.
    The plot is basically idiotic. The cinematography is impressive for an
espionage film, and we have a lot of fun watching Ramirez be trained to
become a super-spy.
     But the whole thing reeks of the stingy old films of the Cold War. I
was under the impression -and perhaps I am mistaken in this aspect - that
the Cold War was over and that we didn't have to put up with a punch of
stock-character enemies in parkas and fur hats being shot perfectly by
American idiots.
     The thing about The Assignment that you must understand, however, is
that, despite all of the above detriments to its cinematic value, it still
ends up being fun. Nowadays James Bond does nothing by cavort and crack
jokes, and the plots are all hackneyed and stupid.
    They may have all been that way, but ever since Pierce Brosnan got in on
the game, they stopped being so much damn fun. Tom Clancy, in his effort to
stay up to date, has become terribly essayistic in his novels and in their
adaptations. I mean, come on, how came out of Clear and Present Danger
wanting to purchase drugs just to spit in their face? Well, me neither, but
you get the point.
     The espionage genre took a massive turn for the worse after the Cold
War ended, and, despite the fact that we're back to square one where a super
agent man is slipping past customs in perfect disguises and getting the
Russians angry, it is still much better than the very unenjoyable modern day
espionage films.
     I'm in a quandary. On one hand, I try to recommend good films to you.
The Assignment is not a good film. On the other hand, I try to recommend
enjoyable films to you. The Assignment is enjoyable. It is up to you where
to go from here.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
Starring Hugh Grant, Julia Roberts, and Rhys Ifans
     If there is one genre in Hollywood that is alive and kicking, it would
have to be the Romantic Comedy.  Let's face it, ever since its inception,
Hollywood has always strived to make love funny instead of painful.  Besides
my standard quote of "so much for realism," this is fine by me.  The
romantic comedy formula, trite and tired as it may be, is a sure-fire way to
make up your budget.  It's not going to be a hit, but its going to be in the
black.
     Notting Hill is the latest of these low grade Hollywood romances that
only teenagers find romantic, this one setting us in a bizarre universe of
sorts (Notting Hill, London, England) where somewhere along the line Julia
Roberts plays an actress (Anna Scott) who wins an Oscar.  Is that a
violation of the by-laws of the universe?  Also in the film you have William
Thacker (Hugh Grant), a humble bookkeeper.  Of course, when Anna decides
that she's going to get a book on Turkey, a bizarre relationship ensues.
     For comic relief we have William's furball of a flatmate Spike (Rhys
Ifans), who steals the show (and the comic performance) with one of the
funniest character acting jobs you will ever see.  You come away feeling
sure that Spike is a complete and utter idiot and has still just played you
for a fool.
     Notting Hill is blessed with the British comic wit of Richard Curtis
(Four Weddings and a Funeral), who churns out a screenplay that is decently
funny, somewhat romantic, and has enough twist on the norm to keep me awake.
It has a plot that is formulaic to no end, but keeps an ironic twist on it
as it seems to be on some level a take off of Henry James' "Wings of the
Dove", of which a film version has just wrapped at the end of the movie.
     Hugh Grant does a good jump of leaping back into romantic comedies
despite the fact that he still has a reputation for wanting very unromantic
liaisons in West Hollywood.  Julia Roberts sticks to my rule that when an
actress plays an actress, you're only looking for trouble.  I think she was
better in the "Law & Order" episode.
     The film, decently funny and somewhat romantic, falters when Richard
Curtis tries to add in way too much plot.  Let me be clear: the screenplay
has no 3rd act.  In place of a third act it spends its time trying to
impress me with how deep it can go into a relationship.  It tries to stay
true to who the characters are, and ends up having a bloody, drawn out
battle of a relationship with the duration of Vietnam.
     It spends all of its time towards the end going back and forth in a
drawn out romance that could have ended half an hour before it actually did,
a true pain in the but for a film critic like me.  In its effort to stay
true to character, it scares away half the audience and cracks no good jokes
in the meantime.  But, hey, what does anyone care?  By the end, the theatre
is smiling, the girls are clutching boyfriends that really didn't like the
movie, and people like me are groaning.
     Yes, the romantic comedy is alive and well and kicking.  It is trite,
its fairly funny, and doesn't believe in the concept of plot twist but its
alive.

Title
Review for Less Than Zero (1987)
Based on the novel by Bret Easton Ellis
Starring Andrew McCarthy, Jami Gertz, Robert Downey, Jr., James Spader
     I am probably one of about five people in the world who got this, but,
in Bret Easton Ellis' "American Psycho" there is a conversation that takes
place in a video store relating to why the clerk should know who Jami Gertz
is.  Patrick Bateman mentions something about her being in a Diet Coke ad.
Being an avid fan of Ellis, I know that "American Psycho" was written in
about 1988.  So, based on the fact that the adaptation of his 1985 novel
"Less Than Zero" came out in 1987, I suppose he liked the film.  I, on the
other hand, did not.
     I've seen better and I've seen worse, but, you know what, I think there
are better ways to remember the 80s than watching Robert Downey, Jr. when he
only acted like he was high, instead of actually being it.  I know that the
point of the book was to display the laisse-faire nihilism that is/was so
characteristic of LA, and thus showing someone who played at being high and
ended up being a regular customer of Betty Ford should be a touch of
bittersweet irony, but its not.
     Instead of a bittersweet irony, the film gets to be a real pain in the
but.  The novel was excellent, and the film does its job in the fact that it
captured what was basically an unadaptable novel... or at least half of it.
The novel "Less than Zero" is written in very short bursts, each of them an
image that all sums up to a very complete collage of a nihilistic culture of
LA's youth.  To be honest about the book, it has no plot, but only in a good
way.  In order to keep idiots occupied, the novel puts in a subplot of a
romance between Clay (Andrew McCarthy), a Los Angelino gone East,  and Blair
(Jami Gertz), a coke-addicted fashion model.  It also places in another
subplot where Clay tries to save a washed-out Julian (Robert Downey, Jr.)
from a drug dealer named Rip (James Spader) who is pimping Julian out to pay
back his debt.
     It is these two subplots that make up the whole of the movie Less than
Zero, which paints the same picture that the book did but only in a very
streamlined fashion.  It basically glosses over the entire LA-sucks vibe
that the book sent out and puts in a hip soundtrack in its place.
     Less than Zero makes the mistake of targeting its target audience.
Sure, movies like She's All That and the two Scream films have sucsessfully
hit bullseyes on teeny-boppers while at the same time appealing to them, but
Less than Zero spends most of its time just trying to be cool, something
that the novel didn't really do.
     The movie Less than Zero is populated with the brat pack members Andrew
McCarthy, Robert Downey, Jr., and James Spader as well as the pin-up girl
Jami Gertz, who is surprisingly the only recognizable talent in the film --
the rest of the people just do a mediocre job.  It spends all of its time
doing what was so chic during the 80s that bothered me so much: making a
point.
     Part of the appeal of the book was that it was able to be essayistic in
a very subversive manner.  Ellis, the youngest author of literary merit and
a student of our generation, has always been able to be very subversive in
his attacks.  His insults have a careful, quiet tone... the very key that he
has always had to remaining hip while hating the hip.  The movie doesn't try
to conceal its anti-drugs message one bit (a message, mind you, that didn't
appear much in the book).  Coming out (or off) of it, I got the impression
that I had just watched a long Regan-era anti-drugs campaign... and wanted
to see a Cheech & Chong movie to make up for it.
     As I said earlier, the film is mediocre.  The cinematographer (Edward
Lachman) should be praised with his adept ability to take in the club scene
without a hitch: low light, high light, red light, blue light... he can
handle it all.  He also does what the script would not... depict the culture
in a way that would target it.
     Jami Gertz should be lauded for her performance as Blair, although the
character does have its trite moments (thanks to the script, not to her).
Aside from a brief stint on "ER", I've never seen her so good.
     Also, certain people should be shot for it.  For one, David Ruben, for
casting most of the people.  For two, Thomas Newman, for turning out the
decade's worst score, and Marek Kanievska, for giving us a movie that can be
used in dungeons.
     We should have smelled disaster with this movie.  But, it's a little
fun.  We get to see the brat pack before they became regular customers at
Betty Ford.  We get to see Brad Pitt when he was only a cameo.  We don't get
to see much else.

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
Old theme, new psycho. That's what this movie can be summed up as.
Put simply, its about the Djinn (pronounced "jin"), the source of the genie
legend. The Djinn, however, as put in the movie "is neither funny nor
smiling". It is a creature that hates us and is bent on our destruction.
Something horror fans are definitely familiar with, right.
Like most horror movies, the film's storyline is relatively predictable,
letting you know what will happen if you stop to think about it. Unlike most
horror films, however, there is a good element of surprise and a liking of
the villain, the stark ugliness of the Djinn as he goes through Earth
granting wishes in such ways that the person to whom the wish is granted
never wins.
The Djinn itself has been trapped inside of a fire opal for nine hundred
years and, after an accident on the docks of a port, which kills a man and
breaks open a statue that contains the fire opal. A greedy worker takes it.
>From there the Djinn is freed and begins to wreck havoc in LA.
If you like horror movies than this one should end up on your list but isn't
anything that you should really go out of your way to see. Besides a funny
yet malevolent Djinn, and a few surprises there's nothing in this horror
film that you won't find in the next.

Title
Review for Poor White Trash (2000)
What is it about semi-rural America that makes it so ripe for satirizing
American values?  It's a longstanding tradition of mockery, from the
Coen Brothers' Raising Arizona to Lynch's psychotic Blue Velvet and Twin
Peaks, to, finally, Michael Addis' Poor White Trash.
Poor White Trash concerns Michael Bronco (Tony Denman), a small-town boy
who wants nothing more than to be a psychologist.  He spends his
evenings talking about how his divorced mother's (Sean Young) anger
towards her ex is a shield for her fear of abandonment, and spends his
days raisin' hell with Ron Lake (William Devane).  One day, the hell
raisin' goes a little too far and the two find themselves in court,
where they are convicted but get a suspended sentence due to the
handiwork of the sleazy Lennie Lake (Jacob Tierney), a gold-toothed hick
of a lawyer with a beer-can garden (you really have to witness this
bizarre sight to believe it).  Thinking that all is fine, the group goes
off to celebrate, only to find out that Michael can't get into college
now that he's been convicted of a crime.
Furious, Michael's mother Linda embarks on a crime spree with Ron,
Michael, and Brian Ross (Jason London), a boy who used to beat up Ron
and Michael but now has convinced himself that he is in love with
Linda... all in an effort to afford the tuition of the University of the
Virgin Islands: the only place left that will take a student with a
criminal record other than trucker's school.
Needless to say, this is one really absurd, funny movie.
Cinematically, Poor White Trash is about as good as they come.  DP Peter
B. Kowalski (Whipped) gives the film a bright, surreal look, and set
designer Stacy Adamski and Jamie Colboth's creations (including the
beer-can garden, with its totem poll of Budweiser cans) are positively
mind-blowing.  The direction is fine, the script bitter, and the pacing
of the movie bouncily quick.  The only problem with Poor White Trash is
that the performances are just a little too over-the-top, even for an
over-the-top comedy like this.
Then again, most patrons of Poor White Trash likely won't look at the
film like movies of its ilk should be looked at.  Instead of viewing
this as the dark satire that it is, they'll simply view it as a black
comedy, a la Raising Arizona.  If that's the case, most people won't
give a damn that the actors have gotten a little too carried away with
the mania of Poor White Trash.  They'll just sit back and have fun.
Director: Michael Addis
Producer: Lorena David, Mark A. Roberts, Tony Urban
Writer: Michael Addis
Starring: Sean Young, William Devane, Brian Ross, Tony Denman, Jacob
Tierney, Jaime Pressley
http://www.poorwhitetrashmovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for It's a Wonderful Life (1946)
It figures that we'd have to go back to the 1946 Best Picture winner in
order to end up with a truly optimistic film. A film in which the characters
are not simply cardboard cutouts and the dialogue isn't used-before cliché.
This isn't the first time I've had this opinion: I think the same thing as a
general rule -- old movies are almost always better than new ones.
I won't bother with the why. The answer lies in the question in the fact
that the normal movie has to ask why it shouldn't use a thing that worked.
They never take risks (studio films, that is. I think an old film and an
independent are on equal footing), they never do anything new, and its all
money, money, money.
Then again, a man who has friends is always rich.
Cliches like that happen to comprise the idea behind on of the least cliché
movies in history, Frank Capra's "It's a Wonderful Life", the most famous of
his works and the one that coined the term Capraesque.
It's a Wonderful Life is a story about hope. Hope for life, hope for people,
hope for humankind. It shows us how we affect people in ways we never
imagined, and how we make things better by being in it. It does what an
artist should do, make the mundane important. And in making the mundane
important, in giving the meaningless meaning, it helps us all.
It's a Wonderful Life is one of the top fifty of all time, probably one of
the top ten: a cinema masterpiece with a message.

Title
Review for Book, The (1999)
Written and Directed by Grant Goodman
Based upon `Down with America', written by Mary Hornbacher
Starring Joe Kaczkowski, Robb Sherman, Peter Roach, Jason Paulick, Paul
Oppenheim, and Allen Goodman
     How many trilogies have I seen?  First, there's the obvious Star Wars
trilogy.  Then, you have the Indiana Jones bunch.  Then you have Kevin Smith
's ubiquitous (to a former Jersey resident) Redbank trilogy (Clerks,
Mallrats, Chasing Amy).  Then you have the two parts completed Scream
trilogy. The Die Hard trilogy.  The Alien trilogy.  I lose count if I
actually try to get them all in my head at once.  The Godfather trilogy.
     Add to this list the Down with America trilogy.  This is the first
short film trilogy that I have yet seen and, to put things mildly, an
interesting twist on the genre.
     Now, normally, when you have a trilogy, the second part of it is the
strongest.  It's expected.  This is why, in the infamous discussion in
Scream 2 about sequels sucking, Empire Strikes Back was put down quickly
with the line: `not a sequel, part of a trilogy, exempt.'  It bites into the
standard idea that any trilogy is an expansion upon the basic three-act
format to the script.  In the three-act model for the script, the second act
is invariably the most interesting.  You spend your time truly getting to
know the characters that were introduced in the first act and preparing
yourself for the plot twists in the third act.  It is the core of a film.
     In the second installment of the Down with America trilogy, it breaks
the mold (as you would expect), but ends up doing so in such a way as too
annoy us.  Were the trilogy of shorts to be viewed as a total film, I would
say that the second act is what kills it.  It isn't terrible, but its pretty
bad.
     Whereas the third part: Down with America: Moldy Kitten reminds me of
Ed Wood, the Tim Burton film, The Book simply reminds me of Ed Wood.  It has
the same grade of plot, of special effects, and of camerawork.  It was
someone's bright idea to film in black and white and, from that point in,
everything goes wrong.
     Normally, the technical aspects of a film do not distract me from the
watching experience but, in the case of The Book, they did.  I spent my
entire time squinting at the screen trying to make out exactly what was on
it.  There was no lighting, there was no filter, and the film, through some
bizarre twist of fate, tries to be noir.
     A tip to director Grant Goodman: when your script isn't noir, don't
have your camera be noir.
     The script is worse than shabby, packed with bad dialouge and
absolutely no plot development, thus eliminating the need for a second act.
We do indeed have a higher body count (as far as murders are concerned) in
The Book, than in Down with America or Moldy Kitten, but, they seem to get
us nowhere.  The book changes hands about three times, and that is all that
happens in the film.
     The lines, unlike in Down with America, are poorly delivered.  The
characters make you lose any emotion you may have had invested in them.  As
part two of a trilogy, and thus as a second act, The Book fails.  It does
not do its job.
     I said in my review of Down with America that I don't box with kid
gloves.  It's true.  I know some people at Rigormortis Productions and
consider them to be at least acquaintances, but that is no reason for me to
give a positive verdict to this film.  I have not had to do this before to
someone I know, but, as the man says: `You gotta do what you gotta do.'

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Selma Hayek, and Kenneth Brannaugh
Written by Brent Maddock, Jeffery Price, Peter S. Seaman, and S.S. Wilson
     I'm back.  I've been over at the other end of the country for about two
and a half weeks, going through the desert and California for no reason in
particular but unfortunately, in my whirlwind vacation of the country, I
have had no time to view a movie in theatres until today.   Today, I came
back.  Today, I watched Wild Wild West, Austin Powers 2, and my first
episode of "Sex and the City" in two and a half weeks.  I'm back.
     Unfortunately, both of these movies disappointed me. With Austin Powers
2, it was the buzz others had given it that made it a disappointment.  With
Wild Wild West, it feels as if it is a matter of faith.  I have faith, as
silly as it sounds, in Will Smith as a person able to pick hits.  I have
faith in Kenneth Brannaugh as a person able to pick intelligent roles.  I
have faith in Selma Hayek for being able to pick fun roles.  I have faith in
Kevin Kline as an actor normally (except for In & Out) to pick good movies.
Most of all, however, I have faith in Barry Sonnenfield, who has been on my
good side four movies in a row.  Ever since The Adams Family, he has had me
laughing and loving his movies.  I feel very betrayed by all five of these
people's latest endeavor, Wild Wild West.
     I'll admit that I haven't watched the TV series at all, but, you know
what, neither has the target audience.  Anyway, the TV series featured Jim
West as white and the movie is so dotted with racial humor that a major
resemblance wouldn't really be possible.  The fact remains that I did not
enjoy the movie, did not find it to be an intelligent film or even a very
fun film.  Barry Sonnenfield, for the past four movies, has turned out films
that are wildly funny, fast-paced, and highly intelligent.  Sure, we're all
tempted to say Men in  Black didn't have a brain because it was a summer
film and because it was based on a comic book but it did.  Yet, when Barry
and Will teamed up again for a go in the Wild Wild West, it turned out to be
a foray into the realm of complete disappointment.
     The plot, which four script doctors who probably haven't seen the TV
series either concocted, involves a evil Dr. Loveless (Brannaugh), a legless
psychopath out to conquer the world (of course) and the two secret agents
(Jim West and Atremis Gordon, played by Will Smith and Kevin Kline,
respectively) that stop him and save the girl (Selma Hayek).
    First off, the girl has absolutely zilch to do with the plot and is only
stuck in the film as a love interest.  I can both forgive this and figure
out why it happened (one of the five executive producers told the writers
that they needed a love interest for Will Smith).  Second off, the film
tries to be an action movie instead of being a comedy.  Barry Sonnfield may
be good at pace, but he's no good at action.  He can keep us interested by
the fact that we watch a character crack great jokes while solving a mystery
or figuring his way out of a problem, but he's no good at actually having an
action sequence take place.  Every time there is one in the film, it seems
stolen from somewhere else (i.e. the part where he goes under the train
reminding us all of Speed).  Third, the comedy seems highly contrived in
this film.  While it is not, as called by some preemptive bad-mouthers, Men
in Black Hats, Wild Wild West doesn't have the same original sense of humor
that Men in Black and Get Shorty did.  The sense of humor in this film is
much too contrived for that.  It drags its feet, sticks a good line in here
or there, and then is done for.
    This, of course, describes all of why the film in and of itself is bad.
Earlier, when I came out of the film, I figured it was just OK, but, in
retrospect, I can only justify it as bad.  The only great part of seeing
this film was seeing the full-length Eyes Wide Shut trailer in front of it.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Written and Directed by M. Night Shaymalan
Starring Bruce Willis and Haley Joel Osment
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 In my review of Naked Lunch, I attacked the egghead set (a caste in which
some people have placed me) with their stubbornness in saying a film or book
or piece of art is incomprehensible.  Now, it's the Everyman's turn.  If you
didn't see the end of The Sixth Sense coming (which I thought was impossible
until my Uncle John, whom I hold in rather high esteem and who uses words I
do not yet know on a regular basis, did not), then you too fall victim to
the need to praise movies you do not get.  If you saw the end coming, like I
did, you needn't bother.
 Movie connoisseurs will see the ending about ten minutes into the movie.
They will hit a point when it just clicks.  People who are not film buffs
will not pick the ending up, because the knack probably isn't in them to do
so.  Either way, however, you probably won't enjoy this film.  I know the
box office speaks against me with the fact that only this week it has
dropped out of the #1 spot, but the fact is that The Sixth Sense is a poorly
constructed film.
 It spends half of its time trying to be a tear-jerker, the other half
trying to scare you.  Neither scares nor screams ensued from this critic or
his date.  The film goes at about the pace of a slug on a sidewalk.  The
performance by Bruce Willis is reminiscent of his earlier days say, summer
of 1998 in Armageddon.  Newcomer Haley Joel Osment seems around to annoy me
and people like me.
 In the words of Nancy Kerrigan, who's knees were busted up with a hockey
stick, "Why me?"
 The answer lies once again in the faulty school of thought that if
something flies over your head, it must be good.  The Sixth Sense flies not
too high over the mainstream audience's head just high enough that, when
they finally do figure out the ending, they feel like really smart people.
When the ending finally comes if they haven't figured it out, they feel
pretty spiffy in a "horray-for-their-side" sorta way.
 But, all of those people who did enjoy the movie The Sixth Sense, ask
yourselves "why?"  From the dry eyes and generally silent theatre I can say
quite honestly that, although some people were impressed, The Sixth Sense
accomplished none of its tasks.  It didn't make you cry, laugh, scream, or
evict any other emotion.  What The Sixth Sense trafficked in was special
effects of the mental variety.  Tricks of the mind.  It gave the illusion of
being intelligent.  And, because it gave the illusion of being intelligent,
people sang its praises.
 Leave it to a business all about illusions to try to act intelligent, for
that is exactly what The Sixth Sense does (and actually succeeds at).  It
acts as if it were a well thought out and constructed piece when in fact it
was probably one of those screenplays thrown together on the fly in six days
with a how-to-write-your-bestseller book in writer/director M. Night
Shaymalan's hands.
 Hollywood is all about magic, and it is a great piece of magic indeed that
this film pulled itself off.  A lesson to be learned for this nowadays is
that all you have to do to make a movie that will gross $200 Million is act
smart.  But, of course, that's only for the next sixth months of short-term
memory that studio heads have.  After that smart will be passe, and stupid
will once again be en vogue.


Title
Review for Shine (1996)
The Scott Hicks film "Shine" is a stunning blend of music and cinema. He has
directed one of the best films of the year (and has a Best Picture and Best
Director nominee to prove for it).
This interesting and engaging film opens with Geoffrey Rush (Young Einstein)
talking in an all-too fast voice and then cascades to reveal more and more
of his abusive childhood through flashbacks. Each time Rush appears on
screen, he captures your attention with his eccentric performance, and is
now running neck-to-neck in my guess for the Best Actor Academy Award (with
Ralph Finnes of "The English Patient" as his only major competitor). It a
probability that he will get the award, if only because of the fact that he
plays with such passion that he can easily portray the wild lifestyle of
pianist David Helfgott.
The film's style allows the audience to get a good taste of the spirit of
Helfgott, showing them him playing his own, darker interpretation of the
monstrous "Ragmaninnov's Concherto #3" and then allowing everyone to see
just how abusive his father was, hanging up the phone every time David tries
to call him.
The real David was the pianist for most of the film, and the performance
shows through in one particular scene in which he sits down at a piano in
the middle of an Australian piano bar and proceeds to play all of "Flight of
the Bumblebee" with a cigarette hanging out of his mouth.
Although it takes a degree of musical appreciation to enjoy, the film is
good enough quality wise to make an entertaining two hours. This one is
worth seeing if you enjoy quality pictures, but is neither funny nor
suspenseful. It is a story with power, not a story with thrills.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
And the peace came to me In The Sweet Hereafter
Indeed the hereafter is sweet. I watched the film on vacation, at a friends,
having been cramped in a town where I was isolated from the foreign film,
the independent film. Sundance award winners, Cannes award winners: all of
them, excluded from my quaint little hamlet. However, I made it a resolution
to rent a "real" movie while away, and I did.
The Sweet Hereafter tells a simple tale of a simple people (it felt so much
like home) who's lives are destroyed by an accident that kills several
children when a bus goes off the road and through the ice. This alone,
however, did not win it the Grand Prix. What got it that was the subtle,
beautiful way that the stories are all intertwined: the lawyer with his own
daemons who tries to channel their anger towards an adversary that does not
exist. The small towners who MUST blame, for it is so human to do so, and
who talk about others behind their backs. The survivor confined to a
wheelchair. The daughter of the lawyer, a compulsive liar who may or may not
have AIDS and has been in drug clinics all her life.
The Sweet Hereafter takes its morals out of a children' book, in which a
piper lead all of the children of the town into a magical cave save one: a
cripple (symbolic, of course, of the wheelchair girl), who is the only one
who can see the truth after all that has transpired. It is a homage to the
happenstance, to the terrible tragedies that befall us and leave us
wondering "why?" The irony being that the one who was most affected by the
accident is the one who wants revenge the least, and who realizes the truth:
that there is no one to blame, but that we must have someone to lay our
guilty conscience upon.

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
Written by Tom Jankiewicz, D.V. DeVincentis, Steven Pink, and John Cusack
Starring John Cusack (The Thin Red Line), Minnie Driver (Good Will Hunting),
Dan Aykroyd (Antz), Jeremy Piven (Very Bad Things), Alan Arkin (Mother Night),
Hank Azaria (Mystery Men), Joan Cusack (Runaway Bride), and K. Todd Freeman
(The End of Violence)
I admit it: I have a dark sense of humor.  It may be treason in this day and
age but I have one and I really don't care what anyone else thinks about it. 
I'm one of those people who loved the ultra-weird cult film The Rocky Horror
Picture Show.  I loved Very Bad Things, and I loved Serial Mom.  As much as I
could debate the psychological healthiness inherent in having a sick sense of
humor, I won't.  It's not worth my time.  The only reason I say this is that,
if you don't have a sick sense of humor, you shouldn't even bother reading the
rest of this review.
Grosse Pointe Blank, one of the few studio dark comedies left, bombed in the
box office back in 1997.  However, I saw it then and liked it so much that I
bought the tape.  It is in my collection and will remain there for a long
time.  The film concerns Martin Blank (Cusack) a professional killer by trade.
 Blank is under pressure from another professional killer, Grocer (Aykroyd) to
join a union that they are creating.  Tending more towards his idealization of
the lone gunman scenario, Blank says no and that is where the trouble starts.
To add on to that, Blank has just been invited to his 10-year high school
reunion in Grosse Pointe, Michigan.  Injecting a little reality into the
review, I laud the reunion committee of Grosse Pointe High in being able to
track down a former spook, but that is beside the point.  Blank has been
obsessing over ex-girlfriend Debbie (Driver), who he stood up on prom night
when he freaked out and joined the Army.
When Blank is told that he must kill someone in Detroit, the gods seem to be
pushing him towards going to the reunion.  He consults his shrink on the
matter (Arkin) and, with heavy trepidation, returns to his hometown.
Now if I hear anyone spouting off because the film is unrealistic I will be
very displeased.  This is Hollywood we're talking about, and the point is not
realism.  The point is to provide the illusion of realism.  To draw you into a
story and have you ignore any holes that might exist.  And, as much as I will
not argue my dark sense of humor, I will not argue whether this film is
plausible or even possible.  I don't care.
What is great about Grosse Point Blank is that it ends up being one of the
smartest movies I have seen inn ages.  Passed over for a nomination for Best
Original Screenplay, GPB still manages smart dialogue, excellent characters, a
quick plot, and a seamless mixing of action, comedy, and romance.  Cusack, in
his first outing as a writer, handles the script with the brilliance of a pro.
 Armitage, long a semi-cultish director, finally finds his studio masterpiece
in this film.
I have seen this film probably a half dozen times, and never had the words to
review it before now.  What I can say about this is that it is the most
memorably studio dark comedy of recent years.  That it is seamlessly put
together, flawlessly executed, and not for the faint of heart, stomach, or
mind.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Well, it made it to the big screen just fine. Made it there with a more
simplistic plot, a much bigger budget, a closely-guarded surprise, and a
huge overrating. Perhaps it is only me but in the summer of 98 I see a trend
(with the exception of The Truman Show), towards the bland. Any movie that I
like, upon seeing it again (which I do to actually ENJOY myself), becomes
tasteless and boring, making me want to throw my popcorn at the screen.
Movies that I don't like, like last weeks Six Days, Seven Nights (which by
the way only had four days and four nights in it) just seem to try my
patience. It's a conspiracy. I tell you, man, it's a conspiracy to make me
go mad with the bland, stale taste of popcorn films this summer!
The X-Files, televisions most paranoid show (currently on, UPN's Nowhere Man
was a little further out there), heralded in a new era in sci-fi. It was
cool to believe -- And not in aliens on starships from the 24th century. And
it wasn't enough that the cast and crew could scrounge up enough money
between all of them for a budget HALF the $63 million of the film, and it
wasn't enough that with a cult following of 25 million weekly American
viewers, it would be the biggest cult noir horror since The Rocky Horror
Picture Show, and it wasn't even enough that they got to film on the lot
that old Jim used for Titanic. No. They had to appeal to the mass market.
The so called "You and Me" which doesn't really exist.
This "You and Me" demands cheap one liners, green screens, blue screens,
special F/Xs that no one can stand, this "You and Me" were the people who
had the stupid idea to churn out about fifteen disaster films since
"Twister". The X-Files movie is basically an extension of the series: and
for all the good it did, for all the taking advantage of the ability to
curse and be more violent that film offers over television, it might just
have well have been a two or three part-er. The basic plot of it is the plot
of every X-Files and or alien movie: prove the existence of E.T.s and stop a
deadly virus that controls them from overrunning the planet. I'd go into all
of the complexities of the series of this were a review of the series: so
I'll let you who haven't been watching see the movie for yourself, it works
fine as a mass-market movie, but disappoints as an X-File. You can stop
reading now.
As for those who have been watching: understand this. If you have been
watching with half a brain the show and the trailers for the movie, then it
will come together easy as anything. The villains and heroes of the film, in
order to allow the mass market to understand, have not been painted in
Carter's trademark ambiguous gray, but instead in a stark black and white.
The Syndicate, the infamous group running it all, is purebred evil, while
The Well Manicured man, our British friend, is a brighter, sunnier chap. The
CSM (Cigarette Smoking Man), is still a dark, evil character, but in the
movie it throws away all the heart he had earned in the series with such
episodes as "Memoirs of a Cigarette Smoking Man", in which it paints his
life. No one mentions the possible Mulder-CSM family connection.
The movie's philosophy is "Don't Complicate Things". As in, don't bring into
play the relationship between Scully and God, or Scully's abduction, and
don't bring in the unwillingness to martyr Mulder, or the Mulder-CSM
connection, or, for the most part, Assistant Director Skinner, or, at all,
Agent Spender. Give the fans a Three Stooges (or Lone Gunmen, if you prefer)
cameo, but don't bring in the Frohicky-Scully obsession. Come to think of
it, if you kept reading from two paragraphs above, I may have just given to
you more information on the series than the movie will. AND STILL NOT GIVEN
AWAY ANYTHING.
There are no secrets revealed. There are no complications resolved. There
are no major plot developments. If the truth is out there, it's not there in
this film.

Title
Review for Dream Catcher, The (1999)
This is America.  Didn't we used to be king of the road?
Once upon a yesteryear, weren't the roads of this country our domain?
Pontiac, Kerouac, Sissy Hankshaw one can easily make the claim that the
American Road belongs to the public psyche.  And, although no economic
journalists are chronicling the loss of the American road movie to the
overseas market, I certainly am.
It used to be that one would associate the road movie with long shots
overlooking vast expanses: a sense of vastness that is as Quaker Oats
American to Rush Limbaugh as it is to a San Francisco Hippie.  But we
started transforming the road into the realm of schlock with Spielberg's
Duel and, ever since then, have been on the way down.  It's gotten so bad
that road movies are no longer coast to coast:  They're within a few states
(such as The Hi-Line, which goes from one end of Montana to another).  And
with this lessening in distance somehow comes a lessening of IQ.  I guess
that, when traveling a six hour drive, you just don't have time to be
pensive, have nice cinematography, be romantic, and stop to pee.
So then it's highly refreshing that Ed Radkte came along and delivered a
drug-free version of `On the Road' in The Dream Catcher, an incredibly
pensive road trip that features two off-the-beaten path people, Freddy
(Maurice Compte) and Albert (Paddy Connor), each on their own quest for
their parents.  Freddy, who runs from the probation officer and a pregnant
wife, searches for the father that ran out on him.  Albert, dejected, dumb,
and a kleptomaniac, searches for his mother.  Meeting in a rest area and
starting to hitchhike together, Freddy and Albert make their way
cross-country, developing a complex relationship, and learning to deal with
each other.
The Dream Catcher uses this modus operandi to make its way through 99
minutes of waxing philosophical and getting to a pleasant, albeit ambiguous
ending.  In fact, ambiguity is the largest trouble that The Dream Catcher
has.  It goes through its running time, makes you think a helluva a lot, and
leaves itself so open ended that you will either sit back and appreciate its
brilliance or shrug in confusion.  For me, The Dream Catcher was the former.
For many theatergoers, however, it will probably be the latter.  But, as
with other narrativly experimental films such as Spring Forward, it's hard
to criticize The Dream Catcher on its own grounds.  The script is solid
(although not teriffic), and the acting works.  The title was a mystery to
me until the director explained it, but the movie as a whole is better left
unexplained a philosophical mist floating through the ether, waiting for a
hapless person to intersect with it an be enlightened.
Director: Ed Radtke
Producer: Julie Reichart, Steven Bognar, Ed Radtke
Writer: Ed Radtke, M.S. Neison
Starring: Maurice Compte, Paddy Connor, Jeanne Heaton
James' mailing list: http://filmcritic2000.listbot.com/
James @ epinions: http://mk2k.epinions.com/user-mk2k
SHORT STUFF: http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Beautiful People (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/40326da6dc39de82882568c20010c937?OpenDocument
 It seems like eight years after Short Cuts, everyone decided to try to
one-up Robert Altman's slow-moving masterpiece.  In the space of six
months, we have seen the releases of three films that have been Short
Cuts-esque.  First we had Magnolia.  Then we had the beautifully
photographed yet sluggish 1999 Madeleine.  Now we have Beautiful People,
a British film about Bosnia.
 Somehow packing in the stories of about a dozen major characters into a
two-hour running time, Beautiful People has the same bizarre
intertwining of characters that Magnolia and Short Cuts did.  However,
Beautiful People manages to hit harder when all is said and done.
 Beautiful People is the story of Portia (Charlotte Coleman), an upper
crust Brit ER doctor who falls in love with Pero (Edin Dzandzanovic), a
Bosnia immigrant.  Pero ended up in the hospital when he was hit by a
car, and he ends up right next to a Serb and a Croat (Frank Purti and
Dado Jehan) who have duked it out all throughout London.  Next to the
Serb and the Croat is a Welsh firebomber (Nicholas McGaughey) who is in
the ward with a burn wound.  Overseeing those three misanthropes is a
nurse (Linda Bassett).
 In the same hospital, on a different floor, there is an obstetrics
doctor ho oversees a Muslim woman who was raped in Bosnia and now wants
an abortion so that she does not give birth to a child of the enemy.
This doctor is engaged in a custody battle.  His children attend school
with the children of a BBC cameraman who is stationed in Bosnia.  The
headmaster of the school deals with a heroin-addicted son who
accidentally is airdropped into Bosnia when he falls asleep on an
airdrop package.
 Much more jumbled than the last British film to probe the world of
Bosnia (Welcome to Sarajevo), Beautiful People plays itself out so
neatly as to be of absolutely no trouble for the viewer to follow once
you are in the thick of it.  Writer-director Jasmin Dizdar, himself a
Bosnia refugee, manages to add a personal touch to the story that
Welcome to Sarajevo was missing.
 Unlike Short Cuts or Magnolia, Beautiful People never delivers a
monologue.  Instead, it sometimes ends up being peachy and drives its
point home like a shot through the heart.  Which, when dealing with
Bosnia, might not exactly be a bad idea.
Written and Directed by Jasmin Dizdar
Starring Charlotte Coleman, Charles Kay, Rosalind Ayres, Roger Sloman,
Julian Firth, Heather Tobias, Danny Nussbam, Siobhan Redmond, Gilbert
Martin, Steve Sweeney, Linda Bassett, Nicholas Farrell, Frank Purti,
Dado Jehan, Edin Dzandzanovic, Walentine McGuaghey, Radoslav Youroukov,
and Nicholas McGaughey
http://www.beautifulpeoplethefilm.com/
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sound and Fury (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/066ed4fcd78e3b53882569820015c3b5?OpenDocument
        While we continue to watch the Michael Crichton take on the cochlear
implant-kitsch on E.R., some people are actually dealing with the issue
rather than racking up ratings.  One of these people is director Josh
Aronson, ex-still photographer and now-documentarian whose latest, Sound
and Fury, takes on the should-they-or-shouldn't-they issue of the use of
cochlear implantation to restore hearing.
        For some background on the subject, a cochlear implant is, in
simplistic terminology, a cure for deafness.  If implanted into a child
with hearing loss at an early age, there is no reason that the child
cannot live a "normal" life.  So, as many people who enter into the
theatre asked themselves, what is the issue?
        Well, for those who do not know deaf people, there is an entire "deaf
culture."  This culture uses American Sign Language, not lip reading, as
its official language, and takes comfort in the fact that its members
are composed entirely of the minority of the deaf.  Like many minority
cultures composed of people with disabilities, a psychological
self-defense mechanism makes the disability into an improvement.  A deaf
man might say, "Because I cannot hear, I do not have to deal with the
distractions of noise."
        This same phenomenon is also found in the mentally ill, and, although
it sounds ridiculous in the eyes of the layperson (why not fix something
that is broken?), for people who have grown up being deaf, it is an
accusation to say that deafness is wrong and that is at the heart of
Sound and Fury.
        Sound and Fury examines two Long Island families, one composed of
hearing parents who have just given birth to a deaf child, the other
(the in-laws) composed entirely of deaf people.  Both are considering
implanting their youngest child, and both have to deal with what that
means to their respective cultures.  Through countless interviews, with
doctors, with the parents, and with other deaf families, the issue is
examined objectively until each of the decisions are made, and, although
such a process might come across as long and tedious, it strikes the
viewer as an incredibly emotional ordeal that eventually tears both
families apart.
        Sound and Fury is informative, well edited, and absolutely
heartbreaking to watch, yet it does have a certain sensationalism around
it.  One wonders, watching the film, about the ethics of a filmmaker
seeking to document a family in trouble.  As the filmmaker tells of how
he received notice of the families and politely asked if he could
document their choices, you ask yourself if he knew the way the chips
were going to fall.  Still, his own ethics should not get in the way of
stating the simple truth: that Sound and Fury is probably the most
informative film on cochlear implants and on deaf culture that one could
ever hope to see.
http://www.nextwavefilms.com/sf/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)
Starring Lou Diamond Phillips, Dina Meyer, and Leon
As anyone who knows me will tell you, I don't shut up often.  But, when the
lights go down, my mouth clamps shut... Unless its a complete Z-grade movie
like Bats.
Bats is one of those movies where you have to get popcorn just to throw it at
the screen.  It is one of those movies where you have to make fun of those
little kids scared out of their wits three rows behind you on the other side
of the theatre.  Most of all, however, it is one of those movies where you
have to provide a running commentary.
My theory on this is that, as the mind sees such a bad product, it begins to
make some sense of it by turning it into a comedy.  After all, any movie where
I can emerge from the theatre saying "once again, man has made the world safe
from small mammals" might just provide Post Traumatic Stress Disorder without
a bit of sardonic humor implanted into it.
The plot of Bats is so very old that I had to wonder if the movie was
vaulted.  Vaulted is the industry term for a movie that was deemed unfit for
release when it was made but is getting released now because a star or
director of it had recent popularity.
Bats centers around two virus-infected carnivorous bats that were genetically
altered by a mad scientist and are now infecting a good portion of the bat
population around Gallup, Texas.  Every night, they come out of their cave and
attempt to eat everything in sight.  Of course, even though they're supposed
to be omnivorous, they skip right by the all-you-can-eat-buffet of grass and
go straight for the Grade-A meat known as a fat Texan hick.
To stop these bats, Shelia Casper (Dina Meyer) and her assistant Jimmy
(rapper Leon) team up with straw-chewing sheriff Emmett Kimsey (Lou Diamond
Phillips).  What follows is an hour and a half of your best one-liners,
insulting a movie that begs for it.
For a vague approximation of how bad the movie actually is, think back to all
of those schlock horror films of the 1980s.  You know the ones I'm talking
about... the films that made people stop making horror films (and then Kevin
Williamson came along with Scream).
Better yet, think to any episode you might have watched of Mystery Science
Theatre 3000, the show where three individuals are forced to watch the worst
movies in history and end up cracking jokes on them.  When you think in this
frame of mind, it's easy to figure out what it will be like watching the film.
 You will find that you have inside of you more great one-line insults then
you ever imagined!  Your creativity will be honed!
For this reason, I say that Bats is a fine film to see with a group of
friends.  Go ahead and watch it, but don't expect thrills.  Don't expect
chills.  Expect laughs... at what comes out of your best friend's mouth.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Pretty as a Picture: The Art of David Lynch (1997) (TV)
Pretty as a Picture: The Art of David Lynch
Produced and Directed by Tony Shallon
     Although this is not the first documentary I have watched, it would
have to be the first one I have reviewed. Sure, every once in a while I see
some PBS special or HBO documentary that I find fascination. For instance, I
recommend PBS' `From Jesus to Christ', a fascinating 13 part compilation of
interviews with theological experts that will turn on the brain of any
student of religious history.  I would also sometimes check out and HBO's
occasionally good, occasionally thrill-of-the-week `America Undercover'
series.  However, for the most part I avoid seeing any film that will
seriously educate me.  I suppose its part of my personal belief that, 9
times out of 10, you go to a movie to turn your mind off.
     However, I was at a college campus recently, was bored, and someone
directed me to the library where they have a good collection of videos.  I
went looking for Lynch's Eraserhead, his only feature-length American film
that I have yet to see.  Instead I saw the documentary Pretty as a Picture:
The Art of David Lynch, which was advertised on the Lost Highway
videocassette.
     Documentaries are just like any other type of film: done well, they are
compelling, intriguing works.  Done terribly, they make you want to shut
them off.  Shallon's documentary was an interesting piece, one that I didn't
sleep through, didn't have any trouble watching, and found very interesting
besides.
     To think of it best, imagine looking at yourself in a funhouse mirror.
That is what watching David Lynch is like.  Now imagine looking at the same
pictures through a lens that clears things up a little bit.  That is what
watching this documentary is like.  For anyone who doesn't understand Lynch
films (most of the general population) and would like to, I recommend
checking out this film.  If you understand Lynch, then you probably are like
me: a complete Lynch jag and the very idea of pulling back the curtain and
revealing the Wizard turns you on so much that you have to watch this film.
     The first thing you will notice as the curtain falls away is the Lynch
is not at all the person whom you would expect.  He isn't a complete
oddball, he doesn't look like he's ready to kill someone or blow up a
building.  The thing that will strike you about David Lynch is that, in
contrast to his truly insane and ambiguous films, he is a very direct,
grounded person.
     Pretty As a Picture takes us through the making of his latest film Lost
Highway, an extremely ambiguous film that I have watched about six times and
still don't have a damn clue as to what is going on.  Using this as a base,
it travels back to his experiences that led him to a career in art, provides
us a window into his surprisingly normal family (although you get about the
weirdest treatment for ants in the kitchen you'll ever hear), and shows us
his humanity in ways we never though possible.
    It takes us onto the set of Lost Highway, shows us the fanatical
devotion cast and crew have for the incredibly amicable and charismatic
individual.  Rarely do you have an entire cast that works with no one else,
even rarer is the crew that does so.  However, with David Lynch you have
actors such as Kyle MacLachlan who never did anything without Lynch until
1987, and producers such as Mary Sweeny, who have been with David Lynch
since 1986.
     With such segments of the film as showing us scenes from Lynch's first
three shorts (Six Men Getting Sick, The Alphabet, The Grandmother) and a
part devoted entirely to Lynch's paintings and photography (which, I
daresay, is even more impressive than the incredible visual aspects to his
films), the skilled director displays for us a much more in depth version of
Lynch than one will ever be able to glean from his films.
     Much as, when someone watches the first good film, no one needs to tell
them its good, no one needs to tell me that Pretty as a Picture is good.  I
simply know.

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
Get Ready for the Wildest New Years Eve of your life.
Witches, cauldrons, lesbians, and bitches, that's what lies in Allison
Anders segment of this bizarre anthology about the money-crazed dealing with
crazier people Bellhop Ted, who's sole motivation becomes tips in an ever
growing amount. And he'll do whatever to get them. He'll screw a
witch/midwife in a cauldron, helping resurrect a god. He'll watch two
psychotic children of a Mexican gangster and his alcoholic wife. He might,
just might (gasp) CUT OFF NORMAN'S LILLE' ....
This isn't a movie you should see if you hate profanity or violence, it has
plenty of both, but has to be on your list if you like the Black Comedies
that Lawrence Bender, the producer of Pulp Fiction, turns out.
The basic plot of the movie is you have Ted, the greedy bellhop doing his
first night on the job on New Year's Eve. A coven of witches resurrects
their goddess Diana and, because of such, the entire hotel goes mad in one
night, and each successive room reflects the madness.
The segments, directed by Allison Anders, Alexander Rockwell, Robert
Rodreguiz  and Quentin Tarantino (in that order) are miraculously
interwoven, perfectly locked in (I.E. The third segment becomes part of the
second segment when someone calls room 409, where a psychosexual drama is
being played out with a big gun, a tied up woman, and the bellhop. The
little girl asks if they have a syringe in their room. The other end says
"No, kid, we don't have any of those in our room. Just a big fucking gun.
How does that strike you?". The girl jovially responds "Thanks."), darkly
comic (the best I've ever seen) and well-produced.
Unlike PF, it doesn't have any deeper meaning, no social commentary or
redeeming value, but, should you have a taste for the bittersweet black
comedy, then you will NEVER regret checking out Four Rooms.

Title
Review for Wong Fei-hung (1991)
The West has Billy the Kid and the East has Wong Fei-hung... and if ever
the twain shall meet I will lose all faith in humanity and moviemaking. 
[Check out Shanghai Noon. -Ed.]  Wong Fei-hung, arguably the biggest
folk hero in Chinese legend and cinema, has shown up in various movies
and dime novels in China since the 1930s.  In America, he's just begun
to make a real dent... showing up via Jackie Chan in The Legend of
Drunken Master and Jet Li in Once Upon a Time in China.
Master of just about any kung fu style out there and massive opponent of
imperialism, the legendary Wong Fei is pretty much there whenever China
needs him, and, when one of China's anti-imperialist generals goes off
to resist the French Occupation of Vietnam, Wong Fei is set to train a
local militia to ensure that the West doesn't overrun the country while
the General is away.  Wong, with the help of many a militiaman with a
strange-translated nickname (like Porky or Buck Teeth), attempts to do
so, but this being a movie, something had to go wrong.  In this case,
his militia men get involved in a street fight with a local mobster,
Leung Fu (Biao Yuen), and just happen to fight their way into Wong
Fei-hung's diplomatic dinner with the Americans.
Needless to say, this doesn't help Wong's standing with the Westerners
at all, and various pressures are placed upon him to bend to the rule of
the West.  Assassination is attempted, Wong's Aunt-in-Law ends up facing
the threat of prostitution, his men are told not to fight yet are
continually attacked... pick your reason, Wong Fei-hung just can't stay
out of it.
Compound this with the fact that Wong Fei-hung is pitted against yet
another Kung Fu Master, Iron Robe Yim (Yee Kwan Yan) in a challenge of
honor, and Wong's just not having a good week.
Movies about Wong Fei-hung always tend to be filled with allegorical
symbolism, and Once Upon a Time in China is no exception.  Wong is the
traditional man who wishes for privacy, yet finds, like China did, that
sticking to yourself doesn't mean others wont bother you.  Iron Robe is
a member of the Boxer Rebellion, sure that bullets cannot beat Kung Fu
until he finds himself shot with one.  Buck Teeth is the Chinese that
can live well within Western culture and thus finds himself an outcast
in his own.
The film's most interesting character ends up being Iron Robe, who,
although he doesn't show up until halfway through the movie, is
portrayed as a broken man from the start, making it one of the few times
that you actually sympathize with the "bad guy" in a Kung Fu movie.
Like Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon, Once Upon a Time in China raises
the bar for a genre often thought of as meaningless dribble, showing
that a Kung Fu movie can be more than just spectacular fight sequences. 
Of course Wong Fei-hung doesn't ever disappoint in that aspect, either. 
One particular fight that takes place on a series of ladders in a
warehouse can leave even the most seasoned Kung Fu vet with his jaw
dropped... and, if not for the overwhelming political message, why the
hell else are you gonna see the movie?  Once Upon a Time in China is
art, and you can feel free to tell yourself you're seeing it for that,
but a few hundred words of explanation later, I only have three words
that sum up the entire film: It's fucking cool.
Director: Hark Tsiu
Producer: Hark Tsiu
Writer: Hark Tsiu, Kai-Chi Jun, Pin-Yin Tang, Yui Ming Leung
Starring: Jet Li, Rosamund Kwan, Biao Yuen, Jacky Cheung, Steve
Tartalia, Kent Chang, Yee Kwan Yan
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Starring Elijah Wood, Clea DuVall, Laura Harris, Josh Hartnett, Sean Wayne
Hatosy, Jordana Brewster
    I shouldn't have to review this film.  Don't get me wrong -- The Faculty
rocks -- but anyone with a half of an IQ point should know that.  Think
about it.  Look at who wrote it, look at who directed it.  Admit it, we all
loved Scream, Scream 2, and IKWYDLS.  And Desperado kicked ass.  So why
should I have to bother telling you why the collaboration between the writer
of Scream and the director of Desperado is the best horror movie of the
year.
Not that the competition is high: ISKWYDLS sucked.  But, compared to that
film, The Faculty is still light years ahead.
    The Faculty has the same plot as The Puppet Masters: parasites are
taking over the Earth.  This time, however, they sneak in through the back
door of Ohio and start taking over a high school in an unnamed football
town.  And six kids (an anti-social girl, the school nerd, a new girl from
Georgia, the editor of the newspaper which has more scandal than The Drudge
Report, the ex-quarterback, and the high school drug dealer) have to stop
the aliens from taking over the planet.
    As always with Williamson, whom I believe to be a satirist with
proportion to a script-writer Kurt Vonnegut, he is setting his sights on
something to parody.  This time, it's the all-too-cheesy and idiotic sci-fi
films.  He points out to all of us just how stupid Independence Day was, how
much Invasion of the Body Snatchers was a rip-off, and how the monsters
always die from the dumbest things (In Puppet Masters, it was a brain
disease.  In The Faculty, it's caffeine).  This alone would have been cool
enough for me.  But, no, they stuck Rodreguiz behind the camera.
    Now I hated From Dusk till Dawn, but I loved this one.  He continues his
love affair with the stedicam as he takes the first major scene of the film
in a roughly 7-minute tracking shot.  He follows the victims during the
chase scenes with great precision that rivals John Carpenter's skill.  He
goes to slow-motion at just the right moment, edits his film until all the
errors are tweaked out, and uses our fear of the unknown as good as
Speilberg did in Jaws.
    Now I go to the flaws for all of you who haven't left and seen the movie
already: the script is as predictable as any you've seen.  The "queen" alien
is known to you after the first thirty minutes.  The dialogue sucks.  The
performances are atrocious.  But, like I said with Blade: to hell with all
that.  Have some fun.

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
The perennial problem with film buffs is the belief that filmmakers are fine
wines.  That, due to the name of such and such, said film will undoubtedly
be good.  Oh, they'll say: `it's a Van Sant, circa 1989' or a `Spielberg.'
To an outsider to this particular argot, one would almost find the Napa
Valley and the San Fernando Valley indistinguishable both homes of fine
craftsman of a product of whateverness.  As From Dusk Till Dawn proves, this
is not the case.
Both a `Rodriguez' and a `Tarantino,' still manages to be a fairly
unengaging vintage filled with little humor, a go-nowhere plot, and a
vampire mythology so far off the norm that From Dusk Till Dawn's only
redeeming value is in self-parody.  And call me someone who doesn't
appreciate Tarantino's or Rodriguez's innate genius, but said self-parody
fails to do anything for me.
Of course, this in and of itself isn't the really disappointing factor in
>From Dusk till Dawn.  Schlock horror in and of itself makes for interesting
viewing and psuedo intelligent insults.  From Dusk till Dawn, however, doesn
't choose to go campy or go artsy.  It does both.  It starts off by
introducing Seth (Clooney) and Richie (Tarantino) Gekko, two brothers who
have robbed a bank and are now heading for Mexico to get sanctuary in a town
called El Ray.  Seth is cool, calm, professional: a cold sociopath who cares
about nothing more than getting the job done.  Richie, on the other hand, is
a full blown psychosexual pervert.  He rapes women, he kills for no reason,
and he's absolutely paranoid.  On the other side of the tracks lie Jacob and
Kate Fuller (Keitel and Lewis), an ex-minister and his daughter, both low on
their faith.
So how do we become a movie about a bunch of stripper vampires?  You've got
me.
I really could tell you how this film descends into the utter madness at
which it ends up, but it doesn't seem to matter.  All that matters is that
>From Dusk till Dawn is good until it gets in the bar, and then it sucks
worse than the vampires it depicts.
Director: Robert Rodriguez
Producer:  Gianni Nunnari, Meir Teper
Writer: Quentin Tarantino
Starring: George Clooney, Quentin Tarantino, Juliette Lewis, Harvey Keitel
In order to hear about some more messed up movies, join James' mailing list:
http://filmcritic2000.listbot.com/
Short Stuff, reviews of Short Films and Hypermedia:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for No Escape (1994)
Written by Michael Gaylin and Joel Gross
Based on the novel "The Penal Colony" by Richard Herley
Starring Ray Liotta, Lance Henrickson, Stuart Wilson, Kevin Dillon, Michael
Lerner and Ernie Hudson
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Ah, the wonderful world of mediocrity.  That chasm between good and bad in
which so many movies exist.  You know where I'm talking about.  It is that
place where a movie is entertaining despite the fact that it is terrible.
That place where it has a message but you don't care.  The place where it
drifts aimlessly between the fine line between a good movie and a B movie.
 Ironically, No Escape falls into the chasm of mediocrity and seems not to
be able to escape from it.  Instead, it is rather like a crab in a crab
basket: its own competitive nature pulls it back in.
 No Escape tries to be both a drama and an action film.  In order to do
this, it sets itself on a place called Absolom, an island prison some thirty
years in the future where two groups constantly compete against each other
for control of their jail.  Looking at the highly beautiful island, I can't
fathom why anyone would pick this place as a prison but they did.
 The story follows Robbins, ex Marine Force Recon who ends up in prison
after shooting a CO.  Being Ray Liotta, everyone is expected to root for
him.  I merely sit the film out.  Having a high aversion to authority, he
pisses the warden at the regular prison off and is sent to Absolom, the
island where no one wants to go.
 Let's perform a reality check here.  With an island that beautiful, thirty
years from now it's going to be Club Med.
 But, back to the review, Robbins is sent into Absolom where he quickly
encounters Merek, the villain of the story who is a psychopathic fascist
leader of The Outsiders.  Of course, having that same damn aversion to
authority, Robbins kills several people while escaping from Merek and, after
falling a thousand feet and landing in the water (on his back), he
miraculously survives and is taken in by a group of kinder, gentler people
known as The Insiders.  The Insiders run a socialist system, good of the
whole, etc. Their leader is called The Father, and is played by Lance
Henrikson, who's old enough that they should have called him The
Grandfather.
 Everyone dreams of freedom but excepts their new life.  Tensions boil
between the insiders and the outsiders.  War erupts.  Ray Liotta saves the
day.
 Lifted off of the pages of a sci-fi book, No Escape is your classic
W.W.I.I. metaphor: Fascism versus Socialist and Democratic systems.  There
are spies, betrayals, and, of course, the Americans win in the end.  As I
said, it contains a message but no one, including me, cares.
 The movie goes slowly for an action movie because it gets caught up in the
pseudo drama of the moment.  It tries to form characters, tries to form plot
twists, and fails.
 However, the small bits of character that it contains are enough to
maintain your attention for roughly two hour running time that is, along
with the action sequences.
 Yeah, No Escape is one of those movies you can just sit back and not really
enjoy.  It is a solution to boredom, a show of mediocrity.  It is in the
chasm, that void of movies that we will all watch if they're on.
 It is in the chasm, my friends.  Down at the bottom, leaning towards the
bad but still edible.

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/c66292008a87ebac88256916001bf079?OpenDocument
There's just something really screwy about a family like the Ephrons.
A pair of sisters (Nora and Delia) collectively control the purse
strings of many a woman and hold they keys to the heart of the modern
romantic through two movies: Sleepless in Seattle and You've Got Mail. 
Nora Ephron (along with Meg Ryan), redefined delis and male-female
interaction with 1989's When Harry Met Sally.  Both are the daughters of
a screenwriting duo, children of The Industry, and have become
higher-level powerbrokers than their parents ever were with a string of
well publicized hits and soon forgotten misses that formed a winning
streak that lasted up until now.
And why did their house of cards come toppling down?  Because someone
decided (that someone being Nora Ephron) that it might be a good idea to
make a movie out of Delia Ephron's novel a novel about (*gasp*) the
daughters of a Hollywood screenwriting duo!
Yes, Hanging Up is a movie that smells of quasi-autobiographical kitsch
hanging in the wings.  And burdened down by this fact, Hanging Up never
achieves that all-important low level of pretense that made You've Got
Mail and Sleepless in Seattle pass as entertainment.
Eve (Meg Ryan) is a caterer running a banquet while her father (Matthau)
is dying.  Georgia (Diane Keaton) is a Tina Brown-esque women's magazine
editor who steals Eve's stuffing recipes for articles for The New York
Times.  Maddy (Lisa Kudrow) is a soap opera actress.  All three are
sisters who have to deal with their father's death and an impeding
banquet.
Although I would really love to go on a rant about why it's not a good
idea to write a book about your life and then make a movie out of it
with your sister, I won't.  I'll stick to the raw weaknesses of Hanging
Up, which are as prolific as cellular phones in Sydney.
For a film written by two of Hollywood's top-gun screenwriters of this
generation (and the children of some top-gun writers of last
generation), Hanging Up is incredibly weak as far as character
development goes.  Walter Matthau's character raises more questions than
answers, Eve is typecasted as the busy working mom, and the other two
sisters are merely caricatures who never really have a conflict to
them.  Maddy is so forgettable that one might have done better to fill
in her role by using stock footage from "Friends."  Georgia pins her
Tina Brown pin-up but we never get any insight as to why she's the
famous one (other than that she's the oldest).  Flashbacks happen with
little purpose, and the film staggers around like the drunken leach that
Matthau plays.  Since Hanging Up is so damn busy being the creme de la
creme of character dramas, it neglects almost any comedy.
The result: Hanging Up is the picturesque butchered novel, lying
bleeding on the editing room floor.
Of course, to give credit where credit is due, all of the acting is
fine.  Although the film wobbles left and right, it can still see
straight enough to give us some entertainment along the path just
enough to get us through the film.  Yet we never connect we never make
contact with anything dear to the characters, and, as Eve goes on her
rampage around the house and takes all of the phones off the hook, we do
not feel her triumph we feel the urge to just hang up.
Director: Diane Keaton
Producer: Nora Ephron, Lawrence Mark
Writer: Nora Ephron, Delia Ephron
Starring: Meg Ryan, Diane Keaton, Lisa Kudrow, and Walter Matthau
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
I'm a child of the 80s. I like my horror movies, and I like them cheesy.
They're not scary to me, they're excuses to get a little closer with my
girlfriend, they're ways to enjoy sick comedy in the theatre while the idiot
girl's getting gutted. They're my reminder that fiction is more fun than
fact. I like them quick, I like them gory, and I like them campy. All of
those adjectives are words you can tack on to John Carpenter's Vampires.
Now anyone who has read my review on Halloween will know that I hold this
man in no reverence. To be honest, I pretty much hate the bastard. But, I do
admit his prowess behind the camera and his ability to scare, although not
his creative ability. But this time, he didn't pen the screenplay, so I'm
happy. I don't hate his style, I hate his original material. After all, has
anyone seen Jim Carrey or Pauly Shore's standup? It sucks. Are they funny
people, yes.
In Vampires the Roman Catholic Church has gone beyond garlic and crosses and
exorcisms as a way of fighting evil, it's headed into the dark and dismal
hiring of a gun-ho team of slayers to kill the bloodsuckers. I suppose it
had to be coming, after all, they are an infestation and the Catholic Church
has to do something about it. Of course the people doing the slaying are
more sinners than saints, but that makes 'em all the more fun to watch. We
have James Woods (Contact) heading up the team with the fourth Baldwin,
namely Daniel (Born on the Fourth of July in a bit role as a vet), who spend
they're days smoking cigarettes, watching Kaptain Kangaroo, and kicking the
shit out of vampires. Of course, vampire Master Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith)
kills all of the slaying team except for Jimmy and Danny, and only bites
Sheryl Lee (Twin Peaks) (but he's biting her on the inner thigh, hell, I'd
do that).
So, while Little Ms. Wrapped In Plastic is growing fangs they use a
telepathic link to track the Master Vampire down, hopefully before he can
get a cross that would let him walk in daylight. But, about him walking in
daylight, I wouldn't be too worried: you'd spot him a mile away.
It's got blood, it's got guts, it's got campfire humor and sinful psychosis.
It's only a matter of time before it's declared a sacrilege. So did I like
it? Do ya really have to ask?

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Written by Karan McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith
Based upon "The Taming of the Shrew" by William Shakespeare
Starring Heath Ledger, Julia Stiles, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, and Larisa
Oleynik
 Coming out of the movie theatre I began my weekly ritutal about telling the
staff of the cinema, including the cute new worker who keeps begging me to
put her in one of my reviews, how good or bad the movie I just saw was.  It
is the equivilant of pointing the thumbs north or south.  In the case of Ten
Things I Hate about You, my comment was "No where near as dumb as I
expected."  Behind me a bunch of high school Freshmen were gabbing about how
hot the guys looked or how sweet the story was while their very bored
boyfriends did the thing that very bored boyfriends have learned to do very
well.  Nod and smile politely.
 Seeing as the main word that kept coming up in their lemming-like
consciousness was "hip", I decided to do what I do best: burst a bubble.
 "I wonder if they know," I said loud enough that they could hear, "if the
film they just liked so much was based on a William Shakespeare play."
 "What?" came a nervous pipsqueak of a voice from behind me.
 "Yeah," I turned.  "It's based on 'The Taming of the Shrew'.  They changed
the place and the dialogue and some of the names around but the basic story
is intact.  You just watched Shakespeare."
 An eerie silence came over the entorage.  My only impression is that they
felt guilty, almost dirty, about having liked something by the Immortal Bard
that didn't star Leonardo DiCaprio and Claire Danes packing 9mm's.
 This brings me to point number one of the "10 things I don't hate about 10
Things I Hate About You."
 1. It's underhanded.  It takes Shakespeare, the dread of high school
students everywhere, and puts him in a teenage movie with a cool soundtrack.
What's worse, it has very little Elizabethian dialouge, no big stars, and it
actually makes them laugh.
 2. It imports actors.   Sure, we all love imported food and we really love
imported cars (give me a BMW anyday), but do we like imported actors.  No,
we loathe them.  That is, everyone who likes pulp movies loathes them (The
Thunder from Down Under excluded).  However, 10 Things... a pulp film to the
core, has an imported lead.
 3. It has a brain.  No further explanation.
 5. It doesn't get lost somewhere between the 17th century and the 20th
century.
 6. It has a guidance counselor who writes sex novels.  So I'm human.
 7. Feminist music plays a large part in the movie yet Gwen Stefani is
nowhere to be found.
 8. It has teenagers who know show tunes.  Surreal, but very fun.
 9. The unpopular character is the one you love the most.
 10. For once, not everyone in the movie salivates over a model with no
brain.
 10 Things... is a movie that is blessed with a set of fine adaptors, a
director that I will remember the name of for his/her next film, and
performances by up and coming actors and actresses.  Like She's all That,
which had the audacity to make its satiric target its target audience, 10
Things... goes about in an underhanded way making the idiots laugh and the
wise man laugh harder.
 I honestly don't see how anyone under 25 could hate this film.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Written and Directed by Terrence Malick (Badlands)
Based upon the novel by James Jones ("From Here to Eternity")
Starring Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin, John Cusask, Woody Harrelson,
Elais Koteas, Jared Leto, Dash Mihok, Tim Blake Nelson, Nick Nolte, John C.
Reilly, Larry Romano, John Savage, Arie Verveen, David Harrod, Thomas Jane,
Miranda Otto, Jim Caviezel
Featuring, in cameos, John Travolta and George Clooney.
I will address the first question first.  Everyone ahs asked, how does The
Thin Red Line compare with the other epic war film of 1998, Saving  Private
Ryan.  I address it by saying this: they are not to be compared.  They are
too different to even be considered competitors.  Under my advisement, I
would recommend that you watch Saving Private Ryan and then The Thin Red
Line.  One will sack you with a visceral image of war, and the other will
give you a means to comprehend the massive onslaught of emotion the first
did without allowing you to forget.
The Thin Red Line follows C-for-"Charlie" company during the battle of
Guadacanal.  The reason the cast is as epic as the 6-hour-director's-cut
(the final movie is 3 hours) is that not one character is focused on much
more than any others.  All of them are given fairly equal screen time, with
a difference of perhaps ten or twenty minutes for a couple of people.
There are five people that are followed more than any other, and those would
be Capt. James "Bugger" Staros (Elias Koteas), First Sgt. Edward Welsh (Sean
Penn), Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (Nick Nolte), Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin) and Pvt.
Witt (Jim Caviezel).  These five, consequently, are the primary narrators of
the story.  Not a single scene exists where one of them is not present.
To truly describe the complexity of The Thin Red Line, I would need an
academic paper.  This review, I will warn you now, will be insufficient.
The same is true of my review of Saving Private Ryan.
One thing to be honestly said about The Thin Red Line is that it is a film
of images.  From the horror of a dying bird shot by a stray bullet to the
beauty of a fern closing at a soldier's touch, The Thin Red Line rivals The
Sweet Hereafter in precious visual complexity.  As I called it shortly
after, The Thin Red Line is a poetry of images.
Another thing that you can honestly say is that The Thin Red Line is
uniquely contemplative.  In the pauses that come in the battle, both you and
the characters take time to reflect upon what you just saw.  You do not,
however, prepare yourself for what happens next.
The Thin Red Line may nab a couple of nominations that Saving Private Ryan
doesn't.  One is for Best Supporting Actor, which may very well go to Nick
Nolte for playing the career-motivated Lt. Col. Gordon Tall who, until he
has seen the death his armies inflict and receive firsthand, does not even
truly realize that men are dying.  Another possible nomination, although
someone with so few speaking lines will most likely not get it would be for
Best Supporting Actress, Miranda Otto.
Miranda Otto plays Marty Bell, the woman you see on the swing in the
commercials.  Wife of one of the two truly important characters, Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin) and Private Witt (Jim Caviezel), Miranda Otto gives a
heart-stopping performance as the wife of a soldier at war.
Private Bell gives a much better performance as the husband at war, down in
the grit and fighting it.  A former officer in the corps of engineers, he is
a demonstration of how the military command itself may well be the only
villain in this film.  He quit the corps of engineers to be with his wife,
only to be promised by the military that he would be drafted and he would
become an infantryman.  Lost in the dark, murders world of Guadacanal that
Terrance Malick so aptly shows, Private Bell is forced to moor himself to a
wife he cannot see in order to retain his sanity, to not cross the thin red
line.
The thin red line, as told according to James Jones, is the line between man
and beast.  It is the point where you cease to recognize a difference
between killing a human and killing an animal, and thus kill with the same
sociopathic lack of concern.
Private Bell and Private Witt are the only people that do not cross the thin
red line.  Everyone else, in the horror of battle, crosses at some time or
another.
The scene at which everyone but Bell and Witt cross is a perfectly filmed
attack on a Japanese hilltop encampment.  Lasting about the half the
duration as the recreation of D-Day in Saving Private Ryan, I would venture
that this scene is more effective.
This scene is set to music composed by Hanz Zimmer, music sure to score him
a nomination and, hopefully, the win for Best Original Score.  This music,
increasing steadily in both volume and tempo, sets the pace for both that
attack itself and the violence towards the victims.  Using that same mastery
of images that Malick displays through the entirety of the film, people are
placed as to show the sorrow of the moment much more than Saving Private
Ryan ever accomplished.
This scene greets you with the sight of a meditating soldier, who prays as
the world literally goes to hell around him.  It also shows a hospital's
patients being killed in mass of fury, in retaliation to the deaths during
the initial offensive.  The most striking item, however, is the image of a
private removing the teeth of dead Japanese, and contemplating removing the
teeth of a living one, for the purpose of their gold.  This, of course, was
used in Schindler's List to denote the inhuman nature of Nazis, and is
equally effective here.
Private Witt is the final statement in both the film and the review.  The
only person to retain all sanity through the film, Witt is a repeated AWOL
who returns to the company shortly before the battle.  A deeply religious
man, Witt is placed to counter Sean Penn, an atheist, but develops his own
character.  He has lived among the natives but, in the film's most powerful
statement, is not allowed to return when the battle is over.  He is Army.
He is American.  He is, in their eyes, death.
The film suffers one major pitfall that, until I wrote this review, I
thought was much more serious than it actually was.  After the hilltop is
taken there is a half-hour pause in the film.  Each line implies a fadeout,
and it is still an hour until it is given.  I realize now that this is the
point which allowed me, and should allow you, to analyze the intense two
hours you have just witnessed.
Oh, yes.  You haven't witnessed it yet.

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
Written by Adam Sheinman and Robert Kuhn
Starring Hugh Grant, Jeanne Tripplehorn, and James Caan
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Somehow, I feel like I've traveled back in time.  I feel like I have
journeyed to a land not far away (my local multiplex) and a not-so-long time
ago (February) when I was watching Analyze This.  By the time Analyze This
came out, it was mob spoof number three ("The Don's Analyst" on behalf of
TMC, "The Sopranos" on behalf of HBO).  Mickey Blue Eyes becomes number four
this summer as Hugh Grant once attempts to be a perfect British gentleman in
awkward circumstances.
 We have the same backdrop that Analyze This did, of people getting whacked
and an outsider being let into the group.  We have the same silly jokes, the
same good moments, and the same generally bearable nature.  "The Sopranos"
and Analyze This both stand out on the list of good mob spoofs, but Mickey
Blue Eyes seems just to take on this newest formula: the mob spoof.
 Sure, they left out the shrink this time but they put Hugh Grant in
instead.  This time, Grant wants to marry Jeanne Tripplehorn (after 3 months
of dating) but she doesn't want him to become a wiseguy.  Between Analyze
This and Mickey Blue Eyes, I sense a pattern with botched mob weddings, but
who cares.
 Mickey Blue Eyes does a fair job of holding its own as a movie, adding in
some original scenes such as Grant tripping over his British accent as he
attempts to say fuggetaboutit, a phrase which I was able to pull off living
in New Jersey after only a week without a drop of Italian blood in me.
Another great point comes as two pairs of mobsters try to bury bodies on
opposite sides of a small pile of dirt.
 However, memorable scenes is all that Mickey Blue Eyes amounts to.  It
tries to have a part of it concerned with serious plot, and, unlike Analyze
This, fails completely.  Not that it matters at all, because this is still
summer and still no one really gives a damn.
 Hugh Grant does his best with the part but it is highly obvious how awkward
he feels, perhaps because his criminal behavior is usually limited to the
misdemeanor "Soliciting the services of a prostitute".  Jeanne Tripplehorn
seems to always be the person pitted against the mob (i.e. The Firm).  James
Caan does all right, but simply doesn't have the comic gumption to pull his
performance off.
 The question that both Mickey Blue Eyes and The Thirteenth Floor brought to
mind is very simple: is the bizarre becoming the norm?  Both of them copied
films that went away from the norm, and, as a consequence, ended up as a
weak facsimile of the original.  The spirit seems to have died somewhere in
between.
 This serves to prove my theory about Hollywood: that they can only copy.
Hollywood has spent years seeing a film, saying "wow, that's innovative",
and making copies of it until it becomes a formula.  There are originals
somewhere, but they are buried so deep in cliche that, by the time we get to
The Thirteenth Floor and Mickey Blue Eyes, we are so sick and tired of it
that we don't care where it came from and swear off the formula as a whole.
 Another prime example comes in the new horror films, which remain conscious
of their level of self-insult, but, even in the case of The Blair Witch
Project, only serve to follow formulas.
 In my review of Message in a Bottle, I pleaded for intelligent characters.
In this review, I'm making an honest plea for a new plot.  I'm so tired of
your formulaic crap, and I'm sure I'm not alone in my gripe and groan.

Title
Review for 1999 Madeleine (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/ec3e3c11246f55e5882568b7000a2de8?OpenDocument
Written and Directed by Laurent Bouhnik
Produced by Etienne Comar and Jean Cottin
 Snip-snip, Short Cuts.  Magnolia, make room.  The Decalogue, find a
different audience.  You guys have company.  This company: a 10-year,
10-film series following 10 intersecting French men and women.  The
first part of the first act in this sequence, 1999 Madeleine, is a film
that I am sure I will praise when I have seen the entire, 10-film
sequence.  It is also a film that, at this point in time, is so
incomplete, such an incompetent piece of storytelling, that part of the
audience uttered a few laughs when the words `To Be Continued' appeared
at the end.
 Such is the fate of fifteen-hour films.
 1999 Madeleine has no real story only illustrations.  It introduces
Madeleine.  Note: this is not the child Madeline.  This is a fully
adult, full-tilt lonely Madeleine.  This is a seamstress so frustrated
with her incapability to get any that suicide and personal ads seem
equally good exits to her Inferno.  Madeleine searches Paris, and
searches some more, and searches some more, and, at the end of it all,
only three plot developments have taken place: her mother is lost, her
crucifix is lost, and (hooray for Madeleine) she has gotten laid only
to be left when the man realizes the betrayal he has done his wife.
 In other words, 1999 Madeleine is absolutely wrist-slitting
depressing.  It has all of the narrative quality of an American soap
opera (not a French soap opera, which are often quite good, but an
American soap opera, which has only produced Sarah Michelle Gellar).
The only thing that makes the film bearable is the beautiful, lyric
photography in the film, care of Director Laurent Bouhnik.  The lyricism
in the shots is reminiscent of Egoyan's Exotica and The Sweet
Hereafter.  The blue matte of the film serves as a reminder of
Madeleine's constant depression, and, by extension, the constant
depression of the film itself.
 When all is said and done, however, even the photography doesn't make
this film worth watching.  The great photography has managed to sucker
me into watching all 10 of the films, in advance, and if each one of
them is as bad as 1999 Madeleine, I am going to be really, really pissed
off come 2009.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
As anyone who has read my last two reviews: short films that studios and
people alike have never heard of and are available for free download via the
internet, you can probably guess that I have it out against the current
regime of Hollywood movies, which, after seeing basically crap for about
four months, is beginning to make Communist Russia under Stalin seem like a
pretty friendly place.
    In case that hasn't tipped you off, my gripes about The Mod Squad, a
movie based on a late-sixties, early-seventies TV show that wasn't that
great to begin with, should probably clue you in.  I am not saying starring,
because anyone who would act in this film and consider themselves a star for
it is either a drunk or has an agent that's a drunk, probably the latter.  I
can forgive Giovanni Ribsi, on the account of the fact that he's acted in
good movies (unlike Epps and Danes, who rarely even get close to a good
role).  He's been in Gus Van Sant and he even does a good job among the
twentysomething shoot-the-actors while making them popular sitcom of
"Friends", where several good actors seem to go to work the bad acting out
of their system (i.e. Lisa Kudrow).  I maybe can forgive Dennis Farina, who
is at least killed off before the movie gets really bad.
    Being the eternal optomist that I am, I'll have to give you a few good
points.  For one, it has a really nice soundtrack.  For two, it's fun to
pick on.  The script is so bland and unoriginal that I will further
investigate my theory that major movie studios are experimenting on monkeys
turning out scripts for them, and anonymously email my evidence to the ACLU
and ASPCA for them to lobby and handle.
    The director tries to light his film like it's noir: half of it takes
place in a nightclub and it shows.  When I came out of the theatre my eyes
hurt from the light changing so much.  He also tries to act like he's
Richard Donner, taking all that could have been a good scene from the Lethal
Weapon saga.  I can forgive him for it to, after all, he directed the cheap
film Johns, and someone whose done something that bad doesn't need to be
kicked when he's down.
    Unfortunately, the movie doesn't show us the same courtesy.
    Basically, frame one is the movie's high point and it goes down from
there.  Watching this movie, I understand which the Mad Bomber placed his
bombs under the seats of movie theatres.  Claire Danes, Omar Epps, and
Giovanni Ribsi make up a mod squad (insult to our intelligence: both terms
are defined at the beginning of the film) of undercover cops under the
command of Dennis Farina.  They stumble upon a drug conspiracy with corrupt
cops (What movies was that?  Take your pick.).  They find love, shoot the
bad guys, and act cool (they wear Ray Bans on a cop's salary).  And in the
end, the world is safe for democracy and even more drug dealers.
    No one does a good job in the movie, no one makes the façade of cool
stand up.  Even the target audience won't enjoy this film.  Face it, it
sucks.
    The film tries to be funny.  It fails.  It tries to be cool.  It fails
at that, too.  It tries to be enjoyable.  Strike three, you're out.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Starring Robin Williams, Monica Potter, Daniel London, Philip Seymour
Hoffman, and Bob Gunton
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 My main gripe with Mickey Blue Eyes was that it was using a new formula.
Similarly, my main gripe with Patch Adams is that it is using an old
formula.  In fact, Patch Adams is using the old formula that annoys me most:
the schlock based-on-a-true-story drama.
 As a collective group, when we see the line "Based on a True Story", this
is supposed to open the valves of our tear ducts.  This is supposed to make
the story believable, the characters likeable, even if it actually isn't and
they aren't.  We're supposed to give a damn when people in the movie die.
We're supposed to hate to see them go.  We're supposed to have a triumphant
ending with some moral or another.
 Whenever I see the line "Based on a True Story" in front of a movie, I want
to cringe.  Whenever I reach the highly pretentious ending which is often
only missing an usher with a collection plate, I want to puke.  Whenever the
movie inevitably takes a turn for the worse, I get really sick and tired.
 The problem with "Based on a True Story" versus "A True Story"
(documentaries) is that whenever "Based on a True Story" exists, there
become conflicts.  We all know that the events displayed in the movie are
complete fictional representations of events that weren't that interesting
to begin with, and thus are completely blown out of a proportion.  Whenever
we enter the movie theatre we expect to have this "resounding human
sympathy."
 When was the last time anyone you know had "resounding human sympathy".
This is the 90s, the Age de la Nihilist, and someone should clue studio
executives in that nine out of ten of us don't really care unless you make
us care.  We see the news and only put up with the first ten minutes because
a) it's mildly entertaining, b) we want a stock quote or the whether or
something that comes later.  I show my true cynicism when I say that I
honestly believe that most people are apathetic, myself included, and will
not care about a movie just because it says "Based on a True Story" in front
of it.
 If a movie is done well, if it draws me in and actually makes me care some
way or another about the characters then I will actually have some sympathy,
but I really don't much care about fictional representations of real people
I never met.
 Furthermore, I doubt I would care about Hunter "Patch" Adams were I to meet
him.  I have a sense of humor, and my sense of humor is juvenile I'll admit
that.  But I do not go to a meat-packing convention and make a speech that
begins "friends, cow men, bullshippers, lend me your steers."  It's just not
funny.  Although I laud what the man did for modern health care, we still
have a long way to go and his casual disregard of authority is the same
behavior that most people call me a jerk for.
 I make a call to studio heads: stop using "Based on a True Story" as a
marketing ploy to conceal a bad movie.  Yeah, we have the occasional
"Schindler's List" and "Alive" which can bring you in to a true story, but
those were strong movies.  When you have a weak movie, don't tack on "Based
on a True Story" and expect a result.  It's an insult to our intelligence
and its playing off of the guilt we feel when we should care but don't.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Starring Kevin Costner and Robin Wright Penn
 Most days I would love to be in the shoes of people in Hollywood.  Much as
participating in the play is every secret playwright's dream, and painting
the picture is every secret photographer's dream, being in THE BIZ is the
secret dream of every movie critic I know.  We apply to film school.  We try
to make movies.  Some of us even write them, such as Roger Ebert, author of
the movie Beyond the Valley of the Dolls.
 But, one person to another, I wouldn't be in Robin Wright Penn's shoes if
you paid me a million dollars.
 Robin Wright Penn, you see, is married to Sean Penn, who snubs the
Hollywood mainstream, and, if there are two words beyond "It Sucked" that
describe Message In a Bottle, "achingly mainstream" would have to be my
choice.  Predictable to a T, bitingly sweet, it just wasn't a movie I could
connect with.  It is not the chick flick in the aspect that it is chic to go
to, as She's all That would be, but instead the chick flick, as in the
perfect example of a reason not to make movies like that.
 Based on the novel by Nicholas Sparks, the screenplay comes off as an
uninspired, unintelligent event.  The attempts that it makes to insert
professionalism and lyricism into the script come off as downright stupid as
the attempts often made in techno-thrillers to take on serious subjects,
such as medical ethics (should the doctor play God?) or religion itself.
 The basic plot of the terribly contrived story is that Teresa (Robin Wright
Penn) discovers a message in a bottle while jogging in Virginia,
consequently, she publishes this in the Chicago Sun Times and begins her
search for the writer, a woman on a mission and in love (has Hollywood ever
stopped insulting you, ladies?).  What she finds is Kevin Costner.
 Robin Wright Penn, formerly Jenny of Forrest Gump fame, does a nose-dive on
the bad-roles-for-good-people tree and hits every branch on the way down,
coming off as a stupid main character that can be connected to only by
people of similar intelligence.  Kevin Costner, straight off of The Postman,
disappoints yet again, and proves that in Hollywood, sex appeal sells.  His
character, at least to me, came off as a Homo-repressed idiot.
 Paul Newman, the only good part of last summer's Twilight, disappoints yet
again as the father of Kevin Costner in the movie I love to hate.
 Now, I'm sure a lot of people liked this tale because it filled the
likeable criterion: sweet, moderately funny, character-driven with a
storyline so formula that it could have very well been a movie done without
a script.  But, as for me, and any other movie buff, you will dread this
film.  This is a symptom of the greater disease of the terribly cliche films
that Hollywood turns out.
 What else to bash?  Oh, yeah, the direction.  The direction consists of
shots stolen from
different movies: sex during a thunderstorm, a boat being launched, grainy
film met to represent the past, a complete absence of sound during emotional
pseudo-tension, and let's not forget the lightning flashing as Kevin Costner
discovers the secret of Robin Wright Penn.
 Personally, I think it's time to send a message to Hollywood.  Don't just
stop making mainstream trash, but stop making films that rub off as
insulting to women because they portray them as drooling idiots.  And worse
for the Y-chromosome, don't make any that portray all men as Kevin Costners,
make them jerks, and still have the main character fall in love with them.
 I plead you, producers, hack writers, directors, help me out.  Make a smart
character for a change, please.

Title
Review for Alive (1993)
Starring Ethan Hawke, Vincent Spano, Josh Hamilton, John Hayes Newton, Sam
Behrens, and Illeana Douglas
As reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Ah, the splendid sight of a good movie after a string of bad ones.
Understand me, I have seen about five bad movies in a row, and, when I
watched Alive, I broke my streak.  Perhaps then it is fitting that I should
write my review of Alive last (the last of a marathon writing stretch of
seven reviews), that is should be my final respite after such a long series
of typing.
 Alive is the true story of a plane crash that occurred in 1972 in the
Andes.  Come on, you know what I'm talking about, the one where the
survivors had to resort to cannibalism?  Yeah, I saw that episode of
"Seinfeld" too.  The movie has been parodied way too much for something of
its caliber.
 It starts out with a steely narration by John Malkovich, who tells of his
finding God in the Andes, and then quickly goes into a terrific sequence
involving the plane crash.
 From there on in, most of the rest of the movie occurs at the front half of
the plane, where 27 survivors begin their fight to live.  A few people are
completely broken by the experience and die.   A few people do will go to
any lengths to survive.
 The particular lengths they will go to include cannibalism.  They do not
kill and eat, but instead eat the people who have already died.  Nando
(Ethan Hawke) and Antonio (Vincent Spano) have such strong survival
instincts that they are willing to climb the Andes to save themselves and
their friends.
 Unfortunately, I saw Alive last, after all of the wave of survival films
that it spawned.  Because all of these were Alive rips, Alive now appears to
be contrived and cliched.  But it is not.
 Alive is a movie able to touch your heart (and your stomach) as it grimly
displays the miraculous true story of survival in the Andes.  Using relative
unknowns at the time, Alive was able to manipulate the audiences into
believing that the circumstances were actually happening.
 As normal, however, I have my complaints of Alive.  For one, although the
performances are great, the dialogue is incredibly bad.  True story or no, I
have trouble believing that anyone would say half the lines in this movie.
Also, the movie tries to be funny.  Although many people who go through
trauma develop a dark sense of humor, it doesn't ever seem realistic... and
seeming realistic is what dramas are about.
 Ethan Hawke and Vincent Spano do their finest studio roles (Gattaca as an
exception for Ethan Hawke) as they take on fairly simple characters and take
them to new heights.  Illeana Douglas manages to hold her own as practically
the only female member of the cast, a woman desiring to go home to her
family.  Most impressive, however, is John Haymes Newton, who plays the team
captain, Antonio Vizintin.
 Antonio is a control-freak who is forced, by the mountains, to realize that
there are things that he cannot control.  As the mountain gets harsher on
them, and as hope dies, Antonio dies along with it.  Nando and Antonio
Balbi, however, will not allow their hope to die.
 Alive is a good drama, uplifting, hopeful, and intelligent.  It is not the
greatest movie ever made, nor is it especially worth spending three bucks to
rent. If it's on the television, however, go ahead.

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/6bc44eb43d6bf1ef88256879000a7ed5?OpenDocument
Written by Armyan Berstein and Dan Gordon
Produced by Armyan Berstein, Norman Jewison, John Ketcham
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Kara Unger,
Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Heyada
 If anyone even dares to hum the lyrics of the Bob Dylan song, I'm going
to have to kill them.  All right.  So this is an empty threat.  I have
zero way of knowing whether or not you are humming the Bob Dylan song
just to spite me, but please don't do it anyway.  After seeing The
Hurricane, I have Bob Dylan stuck in my head.
 In fact, Bob Dylan and Denzel Washington are about the only things
stuck in my head after that movie that and enormous sense of racial
injustice and a newfound respect for the residents of Toronto.
 The Hurricane is the story of Rubin `Hurricane' Carter, welterweight
champion who was wrongfully imprisoned for a triple-murder that he
didn't commit.  To clear this up to younger readers, this actually
happened. Although the wrongfully-imprisoned genre film is terribly
passé at this point in time, having a falsely accused man in prison is
something worth making into a movie again.
 The question, walking into The Hurricane, was whether making a
`wrongfully accused' movie is a viable option after the genre has been
sucked dry by fictional (or semi-fictional) counterparts such as The
Fugitive, U.S. Marshals, Double Jeopardy, and Wrongfully Accused.
 To its credit, The Hurricane shows us that such a film is possible.
 Most of the credit in this case goes to Denzel Washington, who I now am
absolutely sure deserved the Golden Globe he won for Best Actor.
Washington is in flawless form here, pushing every emotional button in
the book.  He is able to take a character that would otherwise be
contrived and make it into something new and impressive.  The film is
carried squarely on Washington's shoulders, and the result is a
potentially terrible film is turned into something that jerks a tear or
two out of even the most heartless of viewer (or critic).
 The big flaws in the movie come in the form of the writers, who are
dead-set convinced that the story of Rubin Carter (which, face it, would
have been better as a documentary) needed a little extra oomph.  To add
said oomph, the film takes poetic license and creates a corrupt cop (Den
Heyada) out of thin air.  To add even more oomph, the film takes more
poetic license with the do-good Canucks (Schrieber, Unger, and Hannah),
who are portrayed as the major detectives of the film.  Being as the
film is more based-on-a-true story than actual biopic, the Canucks are
placed in a large degree of artificial danger from a possibly imaginary
web of New Jersey corruption stretching all of the way up to Christie
Todd Whitman (all right, to whomever was New Jersey's governor at the
time).  We know the Garden State is screwy, but not that screwy.
 Said poetic license, contrived events and characters, make The
Hurricane terribly difficult for anyone who is an admirer of Rubin
Carter to take easily.  Scorcese fans, on the other hand, will be
undoubtedly pissed by the Raging Bull knock-offs that pose as fight
scenes.
 In the end, however, when all is said and done, Denzel Washington has
made pearls out of swine.  Without Denzel Washington, The Hurricane
would just be another contrived prison-drama, whether or not it actually
happened.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
Written by Michael Berry, John Blumenthal, and Steve Carpenter
Starring Martin Lawrence, Luke Wilson, and Dave Chappelle
Typecasting.  Definition, when writers pigeonhole you into one role, assuming
you can do nothing more than that.  However, typecasting is not just a product
of the writers.  It is not just a product of your Hollywood image.  It's a
product of what you choose to do.
Case in point Martin Lawrence, whose new movie Blue Streak seems like a
carbon copy of his last one, Nothing to Lose.  The jokes work off of the same
punch line, the scenes seems stolen from one another.  Everything is placed
towards a completely predictable ending.
Oh, yeah, and its inexplicably enjoyable.
We've seen the buddy comedy a thousand times before.  Cheech and Chong,
Nothing to Lose, The Grand Jury Testimony of William Jefferson Clinton.  Well,
maybe not the last one, but we've seen 'em all and laughed at 'em all, being
fully aware of how cheap the laughs they evict are.  We don't laugh that hard,
and we don't laugh that much.  We don't care about the characters and the
story means as much to us as an anthill in Africa.  But watch we will.
Blue Streak is a movie that fits perfectly into the interracial buddy comedy.
 Streetwise Jewel Thief Miles Logan (Lawrence) infiltrates the LAPD to get
back a $17M diamond he stole, teams up with
homegrown-country-boy-newly-promoted-from-traffic-cop Detective Carlson (Luke
Wilson) and the two end up fighting crime while Lawrence tries to get his
diamond back.
Every possible obstacle that can be put in his way is.  Every possible laugh
is exploited for all that is worth.  Thus we get the general aura of the
movie: squeezed.
The movie feels as if it has nothing left about five minutes into it, and
pulls it along on the buddy comedy shoestring for the next hour and a half. 
You get frustrated, you wait to laugh.  You want the characters to die, trip,
and fail.  You are getting very sleepy.  You are listening only to the sound
of the DTS.
Yeah, it's the buddy comedy.  We've seen it a million times before and it
ain't getting any better.  Blue Streak is just 1,000,001, and isn't worth the
time or money.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
 I really love Jackie Chan.  He's fun to watch, he's a break from the
ever-tedious norm.  But, Jackie Chan as ... the kung fu cook?  Come on.
 Jackie Chan plays opposite no names in Mr. Nice Guy, a film that rivals any
of the 50s B-movies or the 60s Kung-fu flicks.  It's high on fun, but low on
quality.
 The plot basically follows Jackie Chan playing... Jackie?, the Kung Fu
blackbelt and gourmet chef.  I think they're running low on plots.  And, to
add in other bit of cheesyness, he's running from bad guy drug dealers in
search of an incriminating tape.  Resisting the urge to make a joke about
Larry Flynt, Linda Trip, or anyone involved in any recent sex scandal, I can
only state that we all know just how many times people have wanted a tape.
To be quite honest, this bothers me as a plot device.  If they could just
shoot the person instead of asking for the tape, they'd save us and
themselves a lot of time and energy.
 Still, the plot devices in Mr. Nice Guy are as hackneyed as a whooping
cough, and I really can't stand the fact that they decide to put them in at
every turn.  It reaches a sad point when a theatre-released film with Jackie
Chan is worse than the HBO film "Jackie Chan's: Who Am I?", which at least
had action scenes.  But I don't even get that anymore.  Mr. Nice Guy has the
tendency to just bother someone with cheaply filmed action sequences.
 Although it doesn't usually bother me, the thing that bugged me about Mr.
Nice Guy wasn't only that it felt cheap.  It looked cheap, too.  The
explosions are obviously stock footage, and the film itself looks like a
home video with poor lighting.
 Anyway, the plot continues with them taking Jackie's girlfriend hostage and
Jackie coming and kicking everyone's ass.  To add in what people thought
would be fun, they decided to have a rival gang thrown into the mix.  Oh,
yeah, and the other main character is a member of the media who wants the
tape back just so she can get her story.
 You get the impression that the media is going to hate this girl, because
she rubs off as a total bitch, almost as much as Jackie's girlfriend rubs
off as a total ditz.  She resorts to parading around half-naked and accusing
people of fondling her to stay alive.  She acts like a hooker and runs off,
never to be heard from again, a half-hour from the end of the movie.  So
long, farewell, goodbye, good riddance.
 Another terrible aspect of this film was the accent everyone had.  I may
have missed something, but it apparently takes place in Sydney or London or
some city with a British accent.  Normally, again, accents don't bug me, but
this movie appears dubbed even though I don't think it was.  If Hollywood
made it, shame on them for doing so.  If Hollywood didn't, shame on whoever
turned it out.
 I'd like to tell you that the performances were good but they weren't.  I'd
like to tell you that it was enjoyable, but it wasn't really.  It was
enjoyable to the fact that I could sit through it, but I couldn't wait to
turn it off, either.  It runs about 90 minutes, and each one is worse than
the last.  I really can't stand it that films have gotten this bad, that a
person able to turn a cheesy film into something very funny can't do a damn
thing with this.  It just bothers me.
 It should bother you, too.  But, if you're lucky, you haven't seen it yet
and you won't.

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
You're miserable. Your life is a monotonous routine, the same thing, day
after day. Your business provides you with more money than some small
countries, yet day after day you experience the same living death that is
characteristic of the post-modern rich boy. Douglas is a veteran at the role
of the rich kid, having won a Best Actor Oscar in 1987 for his portrayal of
Gordan Gekko in Oliver Stone's "Wall Street".
In this movie, however, he begins to recognize that Greed may not be as good
as it was made out to be.
On his 38th birthday, business is as usual. It is a day that he dreads due
to the suicide of his father thirty years earlier, in which his father leapt
from the roof of the home in which Douglas now resides.
His brother, Conrad Van Orton, played by "Fast Times at Ridgemont High's"
Sean Penn (ex husband of Madonna and current husband of Robin Wright of
"Forest Gump"), is a perpetual child. Seemingly incapable of being mature,
he makes a lunch date with his brother under the name of Seymour Butts. His
gift is a certificate for an interesting game run by the company CRS
(Consumer Recreation Services).
Staring at the card later at night, just off the phone with his ex-wife and
watching cable he decides to get ready to play.
The next day he goes to CRS, is given a psychological test and a physical,
taking up the entire day, and he is told that his game will begin within a
few days.
That is the question in the back of your mind throughout the entirety of the
movie, as you find yourself thinking for a few seconds that you know what it
is and then contradicting yourself. Is it a con for money? A psychotic
murder plot? A taunting reminder of times past? Or is it really a game?
Whatever it is you know that there is one simple rule for this movie  Trust
No One. And, following that maxim or not following it, you won't know what's
real and what's not until the very last frame.

Title
Review for Dracula 2000 (2000)
Well, it's the holiday season and what better way to celebrate than by
sucking everyone dry?  No... it's not your neighborhood Christmas Key
Party, it's Dracula 2000, a gift to all you horror fans for Christmas.
And it's got all of those earmarks of just about every Dracula, a
director no one has heard of (Craven just bankrolled it), a series of
barely recognizable actors, and a feeling of having been shelved for
about four years oh yeah, and a bunch of religious undertones so the
crew can work through their theological schizophrenia a la Anne Rice.
The film opens in 1892, where we see a ship with all hands dead bound
for London and with Aramaic written on the sails.  Cut to 2000, when a
ragtag band of thieves and morons raid an antiquity dealer's basement
because they don't know what's there.  Even after seeing fanged skull
upon fanged skull and losing two men to booby traps, they decide to take
the silver coffin they find out with them and, after good old Vlad the
Impaler (Gerard Butler) awakens and vampifies everyone, we wind up in
New Orleans.
Of course it's Mardi Gras and ultra-Catholic Goth girl (Justine Waddell)
who works at the Virgin Megastore (Can you say product placement?) finds
herself the object of Drac's affection.  The original vampire hunter
(Christopher Plummer) and his assistant (Jonny Lee Miller) hunt Drac,
and the assistant is falling for Drac's girl.  Needless to say, Vlad
ain't happy.
Unlike most horror flicks, which are content at being a splatterfest and
accepting of their brainlessness, Dracula 2000 opts to be a
Stigmata/lesbian-vampire-flick hybrid which raises more pitiful
religious questions than it gives in entertainment value.  Although it's
set to a metal soundtrack so commercial salespeople hawk it at the door,
even half of the horror fans in my audience went away pissed.  I
probably don't need to tell you at this point, the movie isn't even
worth the time in line for popcorn, let alone in the theatre.
With Dracula calling a Goth music video absolutely brilliant and the
fact that half of the film either features a Virgin Megastore logo or
takes place in the Virgin Megastore, it's pretty clear that Dracula 2000
is a bit more advertisement than art.  Sure, most movies these days are
complete commercials, but they're also pretty slick -- and Dracula 2000
can't even manage to pull that off.  The one thing Dracula 2000 does
have is a monopoly on big-screen bloodsuckers for the time being.  But
don't despair, horror fans: January is only a few days away, and soon
you'll have all the recycled horror you can stomach.
Director: Patrick Lussier
Producer: W.K. Border, Joel Soisson
Writer: Joel Soisson
Starring: Jonny Lee Miller, Justine Waddell, Gerard Butler, Colleen
Fitzpatrick, Jennifer Esposito, Danny Masterson, Jeri Ryan, Lochlyn
Munro, Sean Patrick Thomas, Omar Epps, Christopher Plummer, Shane West
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Starring Shannon Marosi, Katie Stevens, Ping Fu, Leann Marosi, and Stephen
Friday.
Seeing as I am not an academic, I refuse to write a paper on the merits of
free-access to a film online. That will not, however, stop me from writing
several reviews on the subject. Once again my target is RigorMortis
productions, creators of the Monty Python-esque short film L'Auto, done
entirely in English. Why? Mostly this is because all of the other films I'm
finding online are not registered with the IMDB, and I am clueless as how to
do so. Anyone reading this review who knows how to do so, please tell me so
that I may report other movies of absolutely no budget.
In the case of Les X-Files, you can't quite say it's enjoyable. You can't
quite say it's good, either. But you can't quite say it's bad. Like all
reviews that are truly subjective and honest, I'll present you with good
points and bad points:
Unlike L'Auto, a movie with a French title done in English, Les X-Files is a
movie with a French title done in French, which basically means that unless
Parle vou France? Means anything special to you, forget understanding this
movie. When I watched it, part of me thought: OK, this is commentary on the
inexplicable and nature of Chris Carter's conspiracy theory cult hit, The
writer had to do for French class. Point down: scratch higher meaning.
The humor is more tongue-in-cheek. Since you can't understand French, it's
left to the physical and musical aspects to understand the film. Anyone who
has seen the Season 5 finale of "The X-Files" will get the plot, so they can
then appreciate the wonderful tongue-in-cheek that is shown when "Mulder"
drives her car to where "Diana" was shot to the theme of "Hawaii Five-O".
Come to think of it, maybe you don't.
Believe it or not, I am actually going to say that the acting was better,
despite the fact that I didn't understand a word. You can actually tell
looking at the faces of the talented and nearly all-Double X-chromosome cast
what they're trying to get across, which various soap opera actors and
actresses, despite "professional" experience, fail to do (in my humble and
wise-ass opinion, they come across looking like they're trying to fart and
not make a sound on "Days of our Lives"). Talking to the head of
RigorMortis, he acknowledged and concurred with my viewpoint.
And, yes, people, I do think Roberto Benigni deserved Best Actor, so can the
women who saw Sleepless in Seattle and think that Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan
should star in every movie and should win all Academy Awards please shut up
about the debate.
Another good point comes in the fact that everyone involved, including the
director, had a sense of humor over the entire thing: the note that he has
at the download page for this film is "Note from the Director:
Please do not e-mail for a translation of the film. It's presented in
French, a language that I don't speak. The only word that I can recognize is
"Une Vache," which means Cow. This film is proof that you don't have to
speak a foreign language to direct a foreign language film."
    Les X-Files makes me hope for the movie industry in general that the
people who run companies like RigorMortis, who act in films such as Les
my girlfriends.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
Written and Directed by Andrew Niccol (The Truman Show)
Ethan Hawke (Great Expectations) as Vincent Freeman / Jerome Morrow
Uma Thurman (Pulp Fiction) as Irene Cassini
Alan Arkin (Grosse Point Blank) as Investigator Hugo Coldspring
Jude Law (The Talented Mr. Ripley) as Jerome Morrow / Eugene Morrow
Loren Dean (The End of Violence) as Investigator / Aton Freeman
Elias Koteas (The Thin Red Line) as Antonio
We're all becoming Orwells. Hollywood, me, you, the Internet, everyone is
becoming in a constant state of surveillance. It's a trend. Enemy of the
State and The End of Violence use it. The Truman Show, Dark City,
Pleasantville. All of them used it. And, as good as any one of those films,
Gattaca uses it.
Gattaca is a character drama in the guise of a thriller, the same way that
The Truman Show was a drama in the guise of a comedy. Andrew Niccol works
his beautiful charms with both of them. In Gattaca, he offers us a stunning
vision of the not-so-distant future, a time where genetic engineering is so
commonplace that it is common practice. The world, of course, has the
drawback that anyone who was not genetically engineered is part of a new
class of society, called an invalid.
Vincent Freeman was born this way. He chooses, however, not to remain and
invalid but become what is known as a de-generate, someone who uses other
people's blood, urine, hair etc. to fake a genetic code superior to their
own. His dream was to end up in space and being this particularly loathed
thing is the only way he is able to do it. Lending his dream to the real
Gerome Morrow, a suicidal cripple, the two band together to get him into
space. Everything is going well, he is set to leave in a week. Then the
mission director is murdered.
This occurs, in my opinion, only to keep less intelligent viewers interested
in the story, which contains enough pathos to warrant me watching it if it
didn't involve a murder at all. As Vincent tries to keep his secret, he is
falling in love with Irene Cassini, another worker at Gattaca, the story's
equivalent of Cape Canaveral. The panic caused by the moment causes each
person involve to examine themselves, society, and the state of the world.
The sad thing about Gattaca is that so many people will hate this movie
because of its utterly slow pace. It does not keep the interest of someone
not intrigued by people, which encompasses most every viewer today. So that
takes out studio fans, and its Star Trek target audience. Everyone else,
including you indie lovers, should tape it the next time it airs on HBO,
though.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Directed by Eric Darnell, Laurence Guterman, and Tim Johnson
Written by Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz, and Paul Weitz
With the voices of: Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Sylverster
Stallone, Christopher Walken, Danny Glover, Dan Aykroyd, Jane Curtin, Anne
Bancroft, Jennifer Lopez, John Mahoney
Some movies just aren't what you suspected. They surprise you, go against
their promos so much that you hate those boys on Madison Avenue (even more
than I already do). One example is Antz, a movie that is advertised as a
family fun adventure but turns out to be a social satire.
Take the first few seconds. Immature humor? An ant's tiny fart here or
there? No. Instead we find out that Woody Allen still has his shrink, even
as an ant. It's one of those movies with an adult audience and a child's
rating. In fact, even the eight-year-olds didn't laugh at the dry humor
encased in this anthill of gold.
I liked it, though. I mean, how many times do you get an intelligent movie
that animated?
How often does Gene Hackman play a villain astride Christopher Walken
playing a hero.
When does Sylvester Stallone say his lines right, Sharon Stone not look like
she's about to kill you with an ice pick, and Woody Allen  wait, he's still
nuts. But anyway, it was a change. And I guess I have one saying about
movies that I hold dear: Change is good.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Two words, are you listening, Best Picture.
I know, I've put it off. I'm a procrastinator. I always wait until the last
minute to name the Best Picture hopeful that I have (although its more like
sure-fire with "Titanic"), but, when I do, I'm not often wrong (I've nailed
em three years straight)
To describe the movie "Titanic" is to try to describe light to a blind man.
It's one of those movies that isn't seen, it's absorbed, engraved into the
viewer's brain. Tears stream down your cheeks as you realize the disaster.
Smiles like ripples in a lake start whenever the 22-year old acting duet
(Lenoardo Dicaprio of the Gen-X version of "Romeo & Juliet", Kate Winslet of
"Hamlet") light up the screen with there romance.
To say what it is isn't enough. To say what it's not: it's not badly done,
it's not stupid, it's not extraordinary in the supporting acting but the
ship is the story, the special effects the tale, and they are done so well
that everything bends to their wills.
Dicaprio doesn't disappoint me in this one, giving a subtly good
performance, portraying the lower class well. He doesn't overact, which was
what I was expecting from him, and doesn't underact, either. Plus, since the
dialogue was cleaned up so well, he doesn't have to worry about that
hampering him. Winslet didn't surprise me, if only because of the fact that
she is one of those actresses who are naturally good. She turned up the
romantic charm in "Sense & Sensibility", as well as persevered past the
verse in "Hamlet" (something which DiCaprio ended up tripping over in "R &
J"). The only actor that doesn't do well at all is Billy Zane, who really
needs to control his face (he looks like a little child through half the
movie).
As far as the directing it reaches a new level of perfection, Cameron's
camera points on the ship of Titanic and we all light up our eyes at the
magic, and the impact of it hits us all.
The movie's point is that of discrediting the aristocracy, of putting down
the upper class and their pretensions, as they are all cast as the villains
in this flick. Its other point, as sad and true as it may be, is to show the
complete horror of the Titanic disaster (as best displayed with scores of
bodies floating in the water after the ship has sunk). But the movie is well
beyond a disaster film. It is a miracle. A diamond in the rough. An
entertaining work of art.
Get ready for three and a half hours of your life you will never forget.

Title
Review for 30 Days (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/57e99d2fd60466e58825695c006f2919?OpenDocument
Well, we all heard how bad 28 Days was, so coming into 30 Days, you
might just wonder what added torture they could pack into the extra
two.  Thank God, 30 Days isn't 28 Days' cheap sequel.  It's not 28 Days'
evil twin.  It's not even a distant cousin.
Instead of being a schlock comedy about drug rehab, 30 Days is an always
smart, often thoughtful film about detachment, breaking up, true love,
and how all doesn't always turn out for the best.
Jordan (Ben Shenkman) and Sarah (Arija Bareikis) are a pair of
upper-middle class New Yorkers.  Jordan co-owns and operates a liquor
store.  Sarah is a publicist.  Set up by friends, Jordan and Sarah end
up sleeping together because Jordan can't remember the name of a girl he
slept with.
By the time you reach this event, you can be pretty damn sure that this
isn't going to be your run-of-the-mill romance Or is it?
Sure, the average studio flick won't have a relationship that breaks up
because the man asks the woman to marry her, but this kind of thing is
definitely a trend in the indie world.  Aaron Harnick himself was in a
similar movie by the name of Judy Berlin just prior to directing 30
Days.  It's becoming as clear-cut and predictable as studio films are
criticized for being for studio will tend to mean a happy ending and
independent will tend to mean a ponderous, and consequently, unhappy
ending.
The result is that 30 Days is a calculated fiscal risk low investment
for a slightly higher gain.
Regardless of the fact that we've thought the same thing a hundred times
before, 30 Days still gives that wonderful illusion of originality that
allows us to enjoy it guilt-free.  It might not have anything actually
new to put into the debate about male-female relationships, but it does
its business in a way that is entertaining and offers a few new jokes,
not to mention a final shot so unorthodox you have to laugh.
30 Days is moderately well acted, moderately well directed, and
moderately well filmed.  Its psuedo-originality manages to make this
otherwise midlist picture into an enjoyable, thoughtful one worth your
$10 if you like independent films, though it would be better placed as a
video rental (or even a buy).
Director: Aaron Harnick
Producer: Matthew Rego, Michael Rego, Arielle Tepper, Hank Unger
Writer: Aaron Harnick
Starring: Ben Shenkman, Arija Bareikis, Alexander Gaberman, Bradley
White, Thomas McCarthy, Catherine Kellner, Jerry Alder, Barbara Barrie,
Arden Myrin, Mark Feuerstein
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Spring Forward (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/2743c048aa1b0e67882568b80010c594?OpenDocument
Produced by Jim Mackay, Gill Holland, Paul Mezey, Tom Gilroy
Starring Liev Schreiber, Ned Beatty, Peri Gilpin, Campbell Scott
 People will compare it to My Dinner with Andre.  They will inevitably
be wrong.  People will assume that it has something to do with Daylight
Savings Time.  They, too, will be wrong.  People will assume that just
because Michael Stipe executive produced this film, it will end up
seeming like Being John Malkovich.  They, too, will be wrong.  In point
of fact Spring Forward is that rare gem, a film with no brothers or
sisters to deal with, no son to look down upon or father to look up to.
In the family tree of American cinema, the most Spring Forward can have
are a few distant cousins.
 So what is Spring Forward?  Simply put, Spring Forward is unique.  It
is not unique in the sense of Being John Malkovich or Spectres of the
Spectrum (a uniqueness tainted with the surreal), but instead unique in
the point of fact that it a movie that has no plot, that has no
centralized point or purpose that has nothing but characters.  The
characters are Murph (Ned Beatty, switching back into his serious,
pre-Naked Gun days) and Paul (Schreiber), two city parks department
workers in Connecticut who spend one year talking while on the job.
 The film starts in Spring, when Paul starts his first job after getting
out of prison.  It ends a year later, when Murph leaves his job for
retirement.  Paul is a bookworm.  Murph has common sense.  Paul is
philosophical.  Murph is practical.  The two characters are in almost
every single way opposed to each other, except for the fact that they
are both incredibly charismatic.  This mutual charisma incites Paul and
Murph to form a sort of paternal bond, and for the rest of the movie,
with sit in quiet contention and complete fascination as we listen to
some of the most brilliant conversation ever captured on screen.
Writer-director Tom Gilroy, an actor himself, created a true actor's
haven.  He unleashed Schreiber and Beatty not only on the audiences, but
on each other, and the result is the kind of completely natural
interaction that you run across in real life.  The dialogue is sharp,
the direction on-target.  But that is not what makes Spring Forward
incredible.
 As a film, what makes Spring Forward so absolutely incredible is its
ability to challenge the audience.  As I sit and think about the one
small problem that Spring Forward has, pacing (if the characters are
ever silent, you begin to glance at your watch), I realize that the fate
of Spring Forward is not in it's stars, or its director or producers,
but in ourselves.  Spring Forward is a movie that, having no narrative,
lives entirely in the gray.  When you perceive Spring Forward as slow,
you lose sight of the fact that, in order for a movie to be either slow
or fast, it must be moving in the first place.  Spring Forward does not
move.  Spring Forward does not progress.  Spring Forward simply is.
 And, provided you can let go of conventional thought long enough to
enjoy Spring Forward's just being there, Spring Forward simply is worth
every second you spend in the theatre.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Down with America 3: Moldy Kitten (1999)
Written by Danielle Ervin, Richard Ferrando, Grant Goodman, Joe Kaczkowski,
Karen Mester, Justin Mickley, Aaron Miller
Based on `Down with America' by Mary Hornbacher
Starring Joe Kaczkowski, Aaron Miller, Karen Mester, Josh Raab, and Meri
Stevens
     This is a multi-faceted job.  I wrote, in a review of Firestorm, that
being a film critic is like having a doctorate in theology: people are
always asking you `why?'  I revise this.  Most people don't bother asking
you `why' as much as they bother asking you about the trends.  They think
that you have some mystic knowledge of whats trendy.  That you know what's
hot and what's not.
     The truth is that being a movie critic is something akin to Number
Theory.  It is your job to observe patterns in the current fabric of the
universe of celluloid.  You pick up paradoxes, learn the exceptions to the
rules, and try to make sense of it all.  As in theology and mathematics, it
rarely works.
     An interesting paradox I have run across in my studies is one of
originality.  Just last night, I trashed the Anthony Hopkins/Cuba Gooding,
Jr. collaboration Instinct on the account of it not having an ounce of
originality.  However, sitting at the keyboard typing my review of Moldy
Kitten, I think only of how unoriginal it is, which poses a question to me:
 Is the lack of originality just an excuse a critic uses as a measure of
their personal distaste for a film?
     I wonder if these years I have been doing this job, this quasi-rubric
that I grade films on, is really worth anything.  Have I been lying to
myself this entire time, seeing as I am able to like a film like Moldy
Kitten: a movie with a terrible plot, and dislike Instinct: another movie
with a terrible plot?
     The question to ponder is what makes good and bad.  Seeing as this
question fringes on morals and is thus not at all the business of the movie
critic, who does not bear a nation's moral responsibility on his or her
shoulders (we'll leave that to Jerry Falwell to worry about), I think I'd
better leave that alone and get on with my review of Moldy Kitten.
     Moldy Kitten follows Brian Ferrell (Aaron Miller), a cliché character
that we have never been able to help but like.  His life has been destroyed
after he was implicated in the murder of his fiancée (whom he still loves)
and, three years later; he is just now getting back into the game by dating
Ellen McMurphy (Karen Mester).  This hardly sounds like the previous two
parts of the trilogy.
     Let's throw in the fact that Aaron was the fiancée of the librarian
offed in the first film and is dating a woman who lives two doors down from
the Mystery Man (Joe Kaczkowski) and a series of bloody murders are taking
place in the background.  We throw in alien abductions and conspiracies to
cover up the existence of The Book, the very item which has haunted the
entire trilogy of films.
     Being a veteran of movies, I can safely say that the plot is nothing
new.  Like many plots, it is a mix and mash of dozens of movies and thus not
original at all or is it.
     Originality, the magic ingredient to a film that everyone wants and
almost no one has, comes in two forms.  One form is in the story itself.
The other is in the method in which the story is done.  The entire genre of
dark comedy has made a career out of thanatological comedy: the same gag
done on a live man is much funnier when the person is dead (at least
sometimes).  Seeing something new does not always come in the form of
complete originality, but in styles we haven't seen before.
     Moldy Kitten does this.  It incorporates a Western style showdown and
an X-Files class abduction with a strange ditty of a romance.  When we mix
and match plots in film, they are usually conventional, which is what Moldy
Kitten refuses to do.

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
Written by Tab Murphy, Bob Tzudiker, and Noni White
Based upon "Tarzan of the Apes" by Edward Rice Burroughs
With the voices of Brian Blessed, Glenn Close, Minnie Driver, Tony Goldwyn,
Nigel Hawthorne, Lance Henriksen, Wayne Knight, and Rosie O'Donnell
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Normally, whenever Disney gets a new tech toy, it takes them a while to get
used to it, to learn it fully and bring their films back up to par.  With
Tarzan, this gap is nonexistent.  With its first outing, Deep Canvas takes
Tarzan's animation to incredible levels, giving us the best quality
animation in years.
 Perhaps then it is fitting that Tarzan is the movie that finally pulls the
Disney animation team out of its slump.  Ever since The Lion King (not
inclusive), they have been slacking on the quality of animation and the
quality of film that they turned out.  And, if there is one thing that
Tarzan doesn't do, its slack.
 Tarzan also doesn't mess around.  It begins quickly with a ship burning at
sea and the last-minute self-saving action of a man and his family, and
never stops in pace from there.  Unlike the last several Disney films, which
drag their feet, Tarzan never wastes a minute of its running time.  Its
characters are simple but good, the voices perfect.  Instead of making an
American fake a British accent, they import actual Brits for British roles.
 The movie is, sadly, a very old and unoriginal story.  Anyone familiar with
the Tarzan story knows it, knows the famous and infamous line ("Me Tarzan,
you Jane").  We've been inundated with the line since birth.  Like the Jaws
theme it has been parodied innumerable times.  However, by keeping it simple
and adding a Disney-style humor, they manage not to let the movie fall into
a slump.
 Another thing that almost kills the movie are the songs by Phil Collins.
The movie has a fine musical score, one that goes in sync with the feel of
the moment.  However, whenever one of the musical numbers comes on, it feels
highly distant from the movie.  The sound of the song, the lyrics, all of
them go completely against what is happening off screen.  It has a way of
getting under your skin, and causing an itch.
 The true saving grace of the movie comes in the form of the animation.
Tarzan literally surfs through the jungle, flying from vine to vine and
sliding up and down trees like the ultimate circus acrobat.  Whenever each
one of those sequences comes on, you are given the feeling that you are
right there, experiencing it.  It's like an animated roller-coaster ride.
 The voices on the movie are excellent.  Minnie Driver, a true brit, takes
the role of Jane and gets to have some fun in it (rather than play the
ultimate oppressed woman).  Brian Blessed voices Clayton, a game hunter who
is out to poach Gorillas, and he does it with all the appropriate charm of a
snake.  Lance Henriksen, from "Millenium" fame, does the appropriately
deep-voiced Kerchak, the silverback head of the gorillas.  Wayne Knight
voices and elephant.  Rosie O'Donell plays a sarcastic ape.  In short, they
all do voices that fit exactly with who there characters are.
 Tarzan, the first good animated film I've seen in '99, is definitely going
to pull Disney out of its slump.  Fiscally, it's always been able to keep
going, but now the quality has risen to match.  Finally, I can breathe a
sigh of relief.  The five-year Disney reign of terror has ended.

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/73f7419e4b3281de882568cf0000ffb1?OpenDocument
Written, Produced, and Directed by Peter M. Cohen
Starring Amanda Peet, Brian Van Holt, Judah Domke, Jonathan Abrahams,
and Zorie Barber
The time is the present, and the setting is New York: where everyone has
game or at least thinks they do.  Brad (Brian Van Holt) thinks he's got
game but is really an unabashedly sexist pig.  Zeke (Zorie Barber)
thinks he's got game but all he has are physical shortcomings.  Jonathan
(Jonathan Abrahams) knows he doesn't have game, but is forced to ante up
stories as if he did because Zeke and Brad constantly brag over Sunday
breakfasts about how they scammed during the week.  And Eric (Judah
Domke), a man who was designed to `jump on the grenade' at parties and
ended up marrying the grenade, just wants to escape from his utterly
pitiful life.
Enter into the story Mia (Amanda Peet), a girl who appears to be
innocent but who we quickly discover to be playing all sides against the
middle.  Mia meets Brad, Zeke, and Jonathan one week, then schedules
dates for the next week, only to be surprised by all three on the same
night.  Knowing that she is found out, she decides that it will be
impossible to do a relationship with any single one of them because she
likes them all too much and offers them the choice of each one having a
relationship with her or having them all leave.  Because all of them are
too cocky to let Mia go, they all end up dating her alternating nights,
bumping into each other on the way out, and generally growing to hate
each other rather quickly.
This is about a half hour into the movie, and the remaining hour and
fifteen minutes are spent poking fun at the trio of headstrong men who
are too dumb to realize what we do immediately: that Mia is a player.
Combining great dialogue with toilet humor (and I mean toilet
literally), Whipped is something like watching a hybrid of `Sex and the
City', Swingers, and There's Something About Mary.  And, like all of
them, it is destined for greatness.  In fact, the best way to describe
whipped is as the second coming of Swingers, except this time the girls
come out on top.
Fully aware of its status as a sex comedy, Whipped never takes itself
too seriously.  Instead, Whipped whips up a batch of great laughs
combined with a light touch of satire.  Peet plays the same perky, sexy
girl that we so easily fell in love with in The Whole Nine Yards, and
writer-director-producer Peter M. Cohen handles the film like he had
been directing since birth.
The films flaws come in two aspects.  One is that the movie is done in a
sort of documentary format, showing clips of each man talking to the
camera (and, as is suggested towards the end, talking to Mia behind the
camera).  The other is that the men are overdrawn in their actions.
They overact their parts until they become nothing more than
charicatures, and when that happens, the satire starts to become too
heavy for such a light film.
Yet Whipped is ungodly funny.  How funny?  Let's just say I'm whipping
out my wallet to pay for a ticket when it comes out.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
The one thing that I'd like to know about In & Out is whose idea was it to
make a story that tries to be everything? It's the same question I asked
myself after watching Independence Day and The Fifth Element.
The story starts trying to be funny, fails at that. Then it tries to take on
issues of stardom and how it affects people's lives. Fails again. Of course
it tries to tackle the gargantuan issue of in-the-closet homosexuality but
fails at that one too.
Truth to be told, if it weren't for the fact that I long ago vowed to never
fall asleep or walk out on a movie, I wouldn't have made it through the hour
and forty minute film. I found myself yawning, scratching my eyelids,
looking towards the exit sign and pondering leaving, moving around in my
chair constantly just trying to find that perfect position that doesn't
exist.
Anything to avoid the movie.
What was even more disappointing was the failure to live up to the good hype
that the movie received. And what was worse than that was the fact that I
expected more from every member of the cast and crew. Director Frank Oz did
"What About Bob?" which is one of the funnier movies I have seen. Kevin
Klein did "Dave". Joan Cusack as been in things like "Adams Family Values",
"Grosse Pointe Blank" and "Nine Months", each one funny in there own right.
Yet the combination of all of these ends up less than zero.
If you want to see something completely stupid, that's your own fault.

Title
Review for End of Violence, The (1997)
Story by Nicholas Klien and Wim Wenders
Starring: Bill Pullman (Lost Highway), Andie Macdowell (Sex, Lies, and
Videotape), Gabriel Byrne (The Usual Suspects), Traci Lind (My Boyfriend's
Back), Rosalind Chao (What Dreams May Come), K. Todd Freeman (Grosse Pointe
Blank), Loren Dean (Enemy of the State), John Dihel (A Time to Kill), Pruitt
Taylor Vince (Beautiful Girls)
The world is fraught with questions. What created it? Why is it so ugly and
beautiful at the same time? How can things like irony exist? How can a
thriller be entitled The End of Violence? Of those four questions, I can
answer only one, and I can answer it simply. A thriller can be called The
End of Violence if it isn't actually a thriller.
Though containing the psychological tension of a thriller, and plot elements
that would make you believe it's a thriller, it ends up being a character
drama instead. It shows how much we loathe violence, how our culture hypes
on it, and how we forget ourselves while buried in suspicion.
The artistically bold film opens with the question "Define Violence.", which
we are thoroughly unable to do throughout the film. We can only begin to
understand its nature, but not its form.
A man who controls violence's public nature, hotshot Hollywood producer Mike
Max (Bill Pullman), is at the center of a bizarre plot involving a secret
surveillance system around Los Angeles, watching it in an attempt to usher
in The end of violence, but ending up causing more violence in the process.
Overseeing the technical aspects of the project is Ray Bearing (Gabriel
Byrne), a technology genius who wants a simple life. Unhappily married to
Mike Max is Paige Stocklard (Andie MacDowell), a woman trapped in her
unhappy marriage yearning for experiencing life.
When an attempt is made on Mike Max's life, however, everything changes.
The movie is a contrast, a study in ambiguity which is the nature of
violence itself. It is a haunting, spectral image of a violent world that is
still with us, and it will leave you wondering how to define violence, and
waiting, wanting, to see The End of Violence.

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
Written and Directed by Don Roos (Single White Female)
Starring Cristiana Ricci (The Adams Family), Martin Donovan (The Portrait of
a Lady), Lisa Kudrow (Romy and Michelle's High School Reunion), Lyle Lovett
(Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas), Ivan Sergei (John Woo's Once a Thief)
Deedee Truitt (Ricci) is a narcissist. She's a sex-addicted, nyphomanical
user and abuser. She's blaring, she offensive, she's witty, she's brilliant.
She packs a gun while pregnant and swears every other word. And, like all
anti-heroes, you love her by the end of the movie.
She's not going to grow a heart of gold (or so she says) and she's not going
to change her ways. She goes around stealing ashes from urns, seducing gay
men, running off with one-balled hicks from Louisiana, and basically living
her life without consequences. Then, of course, she gets pregnant and
reality begins to set in quickly.
Basically, her realization of reality comes around basically like this:
1) Stepfather dies. She leaves Louisiana with Randy, the one-balled hick,
and keeps on running to Illinois, where she holes up with her homosexual
half-brother and his lover, Matt. Matt and the half-brother are locked in a
relationship based upon sex, which Matt readily admits but the half brother
will not (his previous boyfriend died of AIDS).
2) Deedee seduces Matt. In a crazy world where anything can happen, anything
does, with her working her unique charms to bed a homosexual.
What follows is a politically incorrect story of her learning that life
isn't so easy. It's a wake up call: a rude one. The movie, for liberals like
me, is both riotously funny and blatantly offensive. But in the strange
world of film it was just the dark comedy I was looking for.
It offers an insight that no politically correct movie can. It doesn't worry
about what you think about her, or what you think about it. This, as anyone
who reads my reviews knows, constitutes my very favorite thing: ARTISTIC
BOLDNESS.
Yes. A movie this flagrantly offensive is not only art but quite intelligent
art at that. Instead of worrying, like everyone else does, about wording
their answers to the questions of life in a kind way, The Opposite of Sex
doesn't care.
The strange thing is, by the end of the movie, you will.

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/88855cbe3007b09b882568d1001f4d11?OpenDocument
The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas (2000, PG)
Produced by Bruce Cohen and Steven Spielberg
Written by Harry Elfont, Deborah Kaplan, Jim Cash, and Jack Epps Jr.
Starring Mark Addy, Steven Baldwin, Jane Krakowski, Kristen Johnston,
Joan Collins, Thomas Gibson, and Alan Cumming
 All right.  I withered away my youth watching "The Flintstones" like
just about every other kid in the 80s.  That doesn't mean I have to like
the movie or feel the slightest pang of nostalgia.  I won't give any
special points to The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas for invoking some
memory in me of the pre Cartoon Network days when I watched "The
Flintstones" on a black and white TV located outside of my room in the
house that I grew up in.
 Viva Rock Vegas is bad.  Real bad.  It features the same kind of dry
humor that the show did, and thus makes you wonder why you watched the
show in the first place.  It slowly sucks the life out of you and gets
progressively worse in a 80-minute running time that feels like two
hours.  It has the high point of watching The Great Gazoo, an alien sent
to observe prehistoric man's mating patterns, get kicked and crash into
signs.
 Viva Rock Vegas opens with the standard Universal logo redone in
tied-together wood and retitled "Univershell."  This provides yet
another bleakly high point, as, being tired when I saw this movie, I
read the logo as "Universe Hell" instead of the intended "Universe
Shell."  This brought a small laugh out of me.  It just so happens that
was all the movie was able to garner up in the way of entertainment.
 The story goes as such: Fred (Mark Addy) and Barney (Steven Baldwin)
have just graduated from construction school.  Elated and prompted by
The Great Gazoo (Alan Cumming), the two go out in search for dates.
They find said dates in the form of Betty (Jane Krakowski) and Wilma
(Kristen Johnson).  Betty is very lower class, but Wilma comes from a
large mansion on a mountain overlooking bedrock.  Wilma is under
constant pressure by her mother (Joan Collins) to marry Chip Rockefellar
(Thomas Gibson), so she runs away and moves in with Betty.
 Predictable, the four fall in love.  Even more predictably, Chip
invites them to Rock Vegas to attempt to steal Wilma from Fred.  A few
things from are explained in this film: how Wilma got her pearls, where
Dino came from, and why the dinosaurs went extinct (apparently, someone
had been poisoning their water supply).  To the "Flintstones" fanatic,
these will matter.  To everyone else, who cares.
 Krakowski is delightful as Betty, who she basically plays the same way
she does her character on Ally MacBeal.  Baldwin proves once again why
film critics hate the Baldwin clan.
 All in all, Viva Rock Vegas is a very bad run-of-the-mill movie with a
few bright points, making it a complete waste of your time.  It's lame,
predictable, and just plain unfunny.  So, for God's sake, don't watch
it.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)
Written by Sherman Alexie (based on stories from his book The Lone Ranger
and Tanto Fistfight in Heaven)
Starring Adam Beach, Evan Adams, Irene Bedard, Gary Farmer, Cody Lightning,
and Simon Baker
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 To those who think the world of watching movies as a job all fun and games,
remember that it is a chore as well.  You are forced to sit through numerous
bad movies, forced to lose faith slowly and surely in the film industry
until it is almost gone.  The cynicism you harbor eats you up inside until
you have nothing left but your own cruel intentions towards an industry that
you have no affinity left for.
 Then, as hope has dwindled to an almost non-existent point, you sit back
and watch a film like Smoke Signals.  Smoke Signals is one of those rare
movies that you never hear a bad word about.  It is one of those films that
comes out of nowhere, has no big names or bad lines, and is a completely
original story in short, the main things most movies lack.
 Rarely does a film touch you so much as Smoke Signals can, nor does it make
you smile or cry like this immensely powerful film can do.
 Set on the C'Ordelene Indiana Reservation in Idaho, Smoke Signals concerns
Victor Joseph (Adam Beach as an adult, Cody Lightning as a child) and Thomas
Builds-the-Fire (Evan Adams as an adult, Simon Baker as a child), both,
according to Sherman Alexie, "children born of fire."  By this it is meant
that the two of them were both almost killed in the same fire that took
Thomas' parents 22 years ago on the Fourth of July.  Arnold Joseph (Gary
Farmer) saved Thomas by catching him in his arms when he was thrown out of
the window by his parents in order to save him from the holocaust.
 Arnold Joseph, haunted by his own guilt for his abusive treatment of his
family and a secret that tears him apart inside, left for Phoenix when
Thomas and Victor were only 12, and, ten years later, the two of them must
go retrieve his ashes from his next door neighbor Suzy Song (Irene Bedard).
 The story sounds highly simplistic, and it is.  It also serves to be a
perfect method in which to examine the troubled relationships between
fathers and sons, and seeks to find a definition of a good man.
 As much as I talk of myself in my reviews, writing this it strikes me how
very little I tell you in them.  I opt not to speak of my own relationships
with others, nor my own personal demons and hauntings.  Faced with Smoke
Signals, I would love to recommend the film more to you but cannot do so
without entering into how the film is made personal for me.
 That feeling that the film is personal is universal with Smoke Signals,
which means different things to different people but is always a powerful
and personal story to everyone.  The film is strictly word-of-mouth,
recommended by one friend to another, and there is a reason for that.  Smoke
Signals is so intensely personal that it is difficult to get into why it is
such a perfect movie without drifting into one's own past something which
most people will only do with people they trust.
 What can be told without getting too personal is that, whatever walls you
may have built up over the course of your life, Smoke Signals contains with
it the raw power to break them with a thought.  It is a film that you will
enjoy, whether or not you set out to enjoy it.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Directed by Brian Helgeland (LA Confidential)
Based upon the novel "The Hunter" by Richard Stark
Starring Mel Gibson, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger, and Lucy Alexis Lui
 I'm a man of firsts.  I am the first to make strange comparisons, the first
to make a writing style composed entirely of hybridization (my own dubbing
being the "mockingbird" style, after a Tom Robbins simile in his novel
"Skinny Legs and All").  I'm also the first, and probably the last, to
compare Payback to Quenton Tarantino.
 What could a movie like Payback have to do with anything the "the Q" has
ever done?  Could it be that, with no morals and no real point other than
entertainment, with music mixed in that comes from the era which inspires
the writer, that Payback is closest to Tarantino's 1992 debut Reservoir
Dogs?
 You probably disagree.  In fact, you're probably thinking of looking me up
so you can kill me if you're a hard-core Tarantino fan.  But, with Mel
Gibson in the role of Porter, the anti-hero of our strange story, I couldn't
help but be reminded of the moral ambiguity that "the Q" dishes to us.
 As for the plot, it's both simple and incredibly complex.  Porter, quite
literally a man back from the dead, has been plotting revenge for five
months.  Five months ago, he was shot by his junkie wife (The Game's Deborah
Kara Unger, in a minor but very effective role), who was working with Val
Resnik, Porter's former partner, to screw him out of $70,000.  Left for dead
but alive and well, Porter's back with a vengenece.  He's pulling out all
the stops, he's killing anyone who gets in his way, and he's going to get
his money back.
 Along the way to getting Val Resnik, we see Lucy Alexis Lui (Ling of "Ally
MacBeal") in her funniest role yet, a leather-dressed S&M freak that likes
getting beat up... but likes beating up more.  She's as good with the gun as
she is with the whip, and, although all the right-wing conservatives in the
theatre I saw it in were reaching for their nitroglycerin every time she
came on the screen, I was laughing my ass off.
 Porter also hooks up with an old friend (a hooker, as a matter of fact),
gets to beat up David Paymer (who keeps asking "You're not gonna fuckin kill
me, are ya?"), and destroys a suppossedly powerful crime lord while he's at
it.
 Gibson does his usual brown hair-blue eyes Thunder From Down Under spiel,
giving a moderately good performance in a moderately good movie.  He doesn't
endorse positive moral values... in fact, no one does.  In the words of Lori
Petty from Tank Girl "Lock up your children".  Besides graphic violence and
a touch of S&M, the film isn't all that bad though.  Just make sure you
don't send a sociopath in, they may get ideas.
 Like almost any script he delivers (with the exception of The Postman),
Brian Helegand turns out ann unusually dry repertoir of humor while telling
a likeable story.  Also, like his Oscar winning co-written screenplay LA
Confidential, it has characters you love to hate and characters you love to
hate to love.
 I wouldn't say this is action packed, either.  In fact, on the action
scale, it's about a five.  But this film isn't held together by action, it's
held together by the script staccato pace.  The storyline, from the opening
line, grabs you, pulls you in and lets you enjoy what's happenning to you.
 Overall, like Reservoir Dogs, I won't extol it as one of the greatest films
of all time, but, its the best out there.  And it certainly is a damn good
film, too.  See it, you'll agree.  Just make sure you pay the babysitter in
cash.

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
Just how many times has Paul Anderson seen Dune? I mean, when you find
yourself on a planet with massive wastelands, lots of sandstorms, and one
person who leads the social group that he's not originally from to safety or
some such crap, doesn't that remind you of a certain David Lynch film circa
1984?
Maybe if he was in Lynch's territory it would have turned out better.
Anderson, director of Mortal Kombat, and Event Horizon, set his sights on
making his "sci-fi masterpiece" with a human element this time by setting
himself down to work on a good premise movie, and ended up screwing that up,
which you'd figure would be easy. If he'd made it out of studio, tried the
independent road, the film might just have turned out quasi-semi-decent,
instead of ye load of crap which we see before us now. But he decided to
stay with the high paycheck security of a movie that relies on being blind
and not noticing the plot holes that are large enough to walk through.
The movie has a specific cadre of people drafted at birth and becoming the
perfect soldier, not speaking unless spoken to, and following all orders.
Not speaking is good news, we don't have to listen to Kurt Russell attempt
to utter a line in fact, we don't hear his voice until about a half hour
into the movie. All of these people watch atrocities, kill civilians, and go
through life without emotion. Good premise.
He's replaced, of course, when they come out with genetic models that were
designed in Japan and made in China, in otherwords, cheaper, better. And of
course he's still alive when they dump him on a waste planet. And, of
course, he finds other inhabitants and isn't quite accepted amongst them,
due to massive war flashbacks and a nice little human element that almost
works until they put the action in.
In fact, if you took out the action sequences at the end, it'd be a good
movie.
But, no, instead, you have Kurt Russell kicking butt like he always does
badly. And you end up hating the movie that started out so good, started out
so intriguing. If I could just make a single splice, I'd save it
But, hey, you know what they say, always the critic, never the criticized.

Title
Review for She's the One (1996)
She's the One, a movie about love, marriage, divorce, sex, and cheating.
This bizarre love triangle (more like two triangles), centers around the
Fredricksons, a family played by John Mahoney (Frasier), Mike McGlone, and
Writer/Producer/Director Edward Burns (The Brothers McMullen), who are on
some of the worst and some of the best terms that I've ever seen in a movie,
talking about sex almost every day on a fishing boat called "The Fighting
Fredrickson's".
At the beginning of the movie, one of the brothers who plays a cab driver
gets married to someone after only spending 24 hours with her he goes back
to tell his brother and his wife (Jennifer Aniston), who absolutely never
have sex because, although Aniston doesn't know it, her husband Francis is
cheating on her to his brother's ex-hooker ex-fiancée Heather (Cameron
Diaz).
The story gets even more compacted and bizarre as his brother picks up
Heather for a cab ride and ends up taking back the TV he had left at her
apartment when he found her cheating on him. He returns home and begins
having trouble with his wife Hope when he tells her about where and how he
got the TV. She eventually tells him that she probably will go to Paris to
get her pH.D., making matters between them worse.
Meanwhile, Fancis' wife begins to suspect something, and through methods
that I can't mention, discovers about Heather, and a divorce results.
>From there in things go to hell in a handbasket with the brothers being
further split apart and Francis proposing to Heather, and from then in,
well, you'll have to watch the movie yourself.
Now what you should ponder is the possibilities presented in the movie :
Love in first sight, adultery, and honesty to your lover / spouse. The fact
that all of this happens in one movie is something of an oddity, and one of
the things that detracts from the plot is the fact that all of this does
occur, and thus making it an almost inconceivable movie, as funny and
well-plotted as it would be.
There are three sets of shoes you should put yourself in while watching or
after watching this movie : One, if you loved someone upon seeing them,
would you continue to love them and be completely honest with them through
their relationship, and be willing to sacrifice your life as you know for
them. Two, would you feel guilty about cheating on your wife, and, if so,
would you continue to have sex with her should you think that you're in love
with the person your cheating on. Three, would you be completely honest with
your spouse or lover about your past.
First, I would try my best, but I would want to know more about her before I
would give up my life as I know it.
Second, I cannot and will not be sure until, if the event occurs, it
happens.
Third, there are some things people should not know about each other, but
its best to diffuse a bomb before it blows up.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
Screenplay by Leslie Dixon and Kurt Wimmer
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Rene Russo, Denis Leary, Faye Dunnaway
As Reviewed by MovieKritic2000 (James Brundage)
 Rene Russo finally did it.  She finally gave up her antiquated morals and
her idiotic ideals.  She finally buckled under the pressure of the Hollywood
system. Gentlemen, she finally signed a nudity clause.
 Before multiple slanders such as "sexist pig" go through your mind, please
remember that I am only trying to look on the bright side.  You see, Rene
Russo signing a nudity clause is about the only good aspect in The Thomas
Crown Affair.
 I think a rule is being drafted that anyone that played James Bond gets to
play an anti-bond character in a thief movie.  First we had Sean Connery in
the highly entertaining, highly well plotted (also from a shlock director)
Entrapment.  Now we have Pierce Brosnan in the not entertaining, not well
plotted, from a completely shlock director (John McTiernan, whose other
movie being released in August, The 13th Warrior, has been delayed for over
a year) in The Thomas Crown Affair.
 Seeing as nudity clauses seem to be the only thing the film has going for
it, the movie exploits them at every opportunity.  It is a rare event that I
call a movie exploitative, but, whenever a movie has absolutely no reason to
show someone's breasts yet continues to do so, it is clear that it is highly
aware that it has no other cards in its hand.
 The mediocre cards that The Thomas Crown Affair also contains are a nice
Jazz soundtrack, and a beginning and ending robbery scene that, were the
rest of the movie the same, would make something good.  It plays all three
of them too quick, having each scene last a few seconds.  In between this,
we have the pseudo sex appeal of Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo, which,
despite an R-rating, don't hold a candle to the sex appeal that Sean Connery
and Catherine Zeta-Jones so expertly held over their captive audiences.
 The reason I address sex appeal and other unintelligent matters in this
review, rather than going on my normal intellectual diatribe, is because The
Thomas Crown Affair has so little in the way of plot that it is barely worth
mentioning.  It tries to be both a romance and a crime movie, fails at being
both, and follows the formula boy-steals-Monet, girl-tries-to-get-boy,
boy-sleeps-with-girl, incredible-jealousy-and-mindgames-ensue, and
everything turns out happily ever after at the end.
 As you can see, when The Thomas Crown Affair is broken down to its bare
essentials, it does not offer much.  What it offers instead is the meager
compensation of Rene Russo and Pierce Brosnan going at it like rabbits.
 In short, a perfect example of Hollywood exploitation.
 Soapbox aside, the movie is so utterly weak that it cannot maintain
anyone's interest for more than a few minutes.  Because they are simply
relying on sex appeal, which Rene Russo lost in my mind after her femme
fatale performance in Get Shorty, the actors do not draw you into their
characters.  There is not one iota of emotion for them, not one bit that
makes you care about how the movie ends.
 Pierce Brosnan may very well use his Brit accent to make the girls slobber
over him, and it may very well succeed, but my optimism, my idealism as a
critic is that the audience has at least some intelligence left and will not
just be duped by a nice ass.
 Please don't disappoint me and see this film based solely on its very
cheap, plastic surgery enhanced, assets.

Title
Review for Alvarez & Cruz (1999)
Since this is making the fest circuit right now and already getting a
very nice audience and critical response, it's likely that Alvarez and
Cruz will be coming to a theatre near you some father's day in the
not-too-distant future.  And, if you have that special relationship with
your father that says "Dad, you're an asshole," then Alvarez and Cruz
might just be the art-house indie to watch with your folks provided
you're a truly bitter person.
Taking on a subject not touched in cinema all too often -- that of
complete antipathy between father and son where it is the father who is
portrayed in a negative light, Alvarez and Cruz will most likely be
regarded as an exceptionally brave film to be such a slap in the face of
the nuclear family (which it is).  In fact, Alvarez and Cruz spits at so
many of our nicely held illusions of Hollywood happiness that it will
probably become yet another film that gets a distributor, gets a theatre
release for about three weeks, and then goes to that dusty video shelf
of fest-circuit also-rans.
All of which will be the viewing public's loss.
Why will Alvarez and Cruz most likely face this fate?  It is a
well-acted, well-scripted, and well-directed film with the right blend
of humor and seriousness.  It has enough recognizable faces to be
bankable, but it also has a son who would rather not see his father
before he dies and a father who rapes his son's girlfriend (different
pairs, just in case you were wondering).
In the film, Alvarez (Alex D'Lerma) and Cruz (Vince Lozano) are a pair
of Hispanic conmen/carjackers.  They hijack cars, sweet-talk women, have
a heart of Gold, and quote The Godfather left and right.  If the story
were to go the way you might think, I'd just dub the film Alvarez and
Cruz: Up in Smoke and start my tirade on racial stereotyping.  But the
two quickly fill out as characters, and we discover that they are drawn
together by similar life experiences.  Both have deadbeat dads, both
have had girlfriend trouble, and both are trying to get somewhere past
the life of being a suburbanized hired gun.
Alvarez father (Bert Rosario) manages actors, including Alvarez (with no
attempt to actually help his career), and Cruz's father is facing the
possibility of quadruple bypass.  At Alvarez's father's birthday party,
Alvarez is proposed to by Benita (Nicola Siexas), his girlfriend, and
when he rejects the proposal he is dumped.  Two days later, Benita goes
to audition for Alvarez the older, where she is raped.  Now Alvarez must
deal with whether or not he will seek revenge against his own father,
and what lengths to which he will go in such a pursuit.
Looking over my plot description, you'll have to take my word for it
that this film neither is not a shoot-'em-up action flick, nor any of
the other melodramatic ludicrous genre types that such a plot could
carry itself into.  It is, instead, a finely crafted character drama
that moves at a boisterous pace.  Although the title currently reads
Alvarez and Cruz, it should probably be just Alvarez.  Cruz's ambitions
are vague and his conflict with his father is far less compelling and
serious than his partner's.  Benita is similarly developed.  Both of
these characters have more than one dimension, but Alvarez and his
father are the only people in the movie with any real depth to them. 
Still, these are items that could be fixed with a slice here and there
on the celluloid, and Alvarez and Cruz's run on the fest circuit is far
from over.
At the end of the day, Alvarez and Cruz is definitely worth making your
way to a festival so you can watch it, just in case it doesn't come to a
theatre near you, and it's worth making sure you locate it on tape after
Alvarez and Cruz's release.  Just be warned no matter where you see it:
do not take your parents with you.
Director: Vince Lozano, Alex D'Lerma, Paul Mangetti
Producer: Vince Lozano, Alex D'Lerma
Writer: Vince Lozano, Alex D'Lerma
Starring: Vince Lozano, Alex D'Lerma, Bert Rosario, Nicola Siexas
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for John Updike: In His Own Words (1997) (TV)
Coordinating Producer: Ronald G. Shafer (as Ronald Shafer)
Script Coordinators: Ronald G. Shafer (as Ronal Shafer) and Jonathan
Alexander
Post Production Audio: Bob Millslagle and Dennis Williams
Post Production Editors: Paul Byers and Kevin Conrad
 Routinely I am asked to speculate on the nature of things.  Perhaps that is
what the critic's role is, to be a traveling ponderer of other's works.
Recently, I have been asked by the existence of John Updike: In His Own
Words to ponder the nature of the documentary.  I stated in a review of
another documentary that my friend Ronald Shafer worked on that the point of
a documentary may be to inform, but a point of human nature is to entertain
oneself when possible.  I revoke that statement, or, rather, I modify it.
The idea of a documentary is the dispensing of information but in a format
that will engage all viewers, bring them into the process.
 By that definition, John Updike: In His Own Words fails as a documentary.
 Although it is highly informative, the film feels more like an extended
interview than an bunch of information presented in an interesting manner.
The difference is likeable to that of a resume and a biography.
 John Updike: In His Own Words is highly fascinating for a writer such as
myself to watch, and most likely highly fascinating to a reader of Updike.
However, over my years in this business, I have learned to think in terms of
other demographics... and other demographics will not find this film
interesting.  This is a piece of academia, of pure esoteric documentary
filmmaking.  It has no soul or personality, only bits of information to hand
out.
 Although academics will tend towards academia, and almost all of us enjoy
academia in our own field, academia does not have much application in the
documentary filmmaking world... a world that works off of broader appeal.
 John Updike: In His Own Words is a film that can only be measured as
enjoyable or unenjoyable based upon a benchmark of discussion.  People that
find pure dialogue enjoyable will most likely enjoy the documentary, as will
people that find Updike a person worth listening to.  However, due to the
fact that the film is cut in such a way as to focus exclusively on Updike
(only a few times does anyone else's voice pop up), you have the feeling of
almost experiencing idolatry while watching the movie. From the shots of the
highly attentive crowd to the incredible esteem that the only other person
in the movie's voice holds while talking of John Updike, the author of  such
books as Rabbit Run, The Coup, and The Witches of Eastwick, you have the
feeling that these people worship this man, despite the man obviously not
worshiping himself.
 Like many films that fall into the "documentary trap" (this was the first
film that my friend participated in), it feels more like watching My Dinner
with Andre then getting any actual information out of it.  As much of a
friend as I am to Ronald G. Shafer, I cannot recommend his first film to the
broad band audience. I recommend it to people who do worship Updike, or who
worship the written word (as I do, I found the film fascinating), but I
cannot recommend it to the Joe Schmoe.  It just wouldn't be fair.

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
Starring Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo, Ben Stiller, William H. Macy, Kel
Mitchell, Paul Reubens, Wes Stuidi, Greg Kinnear, Lena Olin, Geoffrey Rush,
Tom Waits, Eddie Izzard and Claire Forlani
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 In the words of Lisa Simpson, "the few, the proud, the geeky."  Indeed,
these three adjectives are as good descriptions for the completely likeable
band of misfits put forth in Mystery Men.
 In Champion City, the superhero market is pretty much cornered by Captain
Amazing (Greg Kinnear).  The villains are all defeated... crime is down...
the corporate sponsors are backing out.  Yes, you heard right, Captain
Amazing is a walking, talking, crime fighting ad for toothpaste and soda.
Striding around in an expensive suit, he saves the day every chance he can
for the celebrity endorsements he gets to do.
Meanwhile, Blue Raja (Hank Azaria), master of silverware, The Shoveler
(William H. Macy), master of dirt moving, and Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller),
master of getting really pissed, roam the streets at night looking to win a
battle.  Of course, they fail every single time, but who really cares?
 They spend each night roaming around, getting stabbed with their own forks
or hit with their own shovels and heading to the local cafe for coffee
served by the attractive waitress Monica (Claire Forlani), whom Mr. Furious
has a crush on.
 Back to the wonderful antics of Captain Amazing, who has all of the
endorsements and all of the intelligence as the average MAW (Model Actor
Whatever).  Using his power as his real identity, he sets free Casanova
Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush) so that the ensuing battles will help get him
back the precious Pepsi endorsement that he has just lost.  Only one
problem, he has the general IQ of a tack and soon finds himself held
prisoner.
 And the Mystery Men (although they can never decide on a name to give
themselves) have to save the day.
 The begin recruiting super heroes with bizarre powers such as Invisible Boy
(Kel Mitchell), who can only become invisible whenever no one is looking at
him and he's not looking at himself.  Invisible Boy helps them recruit an
entire bunch including The Spleen (Paul Reubens), master of flatulence, The
Bowler, who keeps her father's skull encased in a pink bowling ball, and The
Sphinx, whose power remains a mystery.
They get non-lethal weapons from a the mad scientist Doc Heller (Tom Waits)
and then have to face Casanova Frankestien, Tony P. (Eddie Izzard) and the
Disco Gang before a hideous weapon destroys Champion City.
 In case your wondering why the hell I would spend about 400 words on  plot,
the answer is simple: plot alone makes Mystery Men worth seeing.  It's so
ungodly wacky, so hilarious in its premise that one cannot help but laugh.
Were that not enough to carry a movie (and past films have proved that
movies can be carried on much less), the film is blessed with a perfect
comic timing that makes all of the wordplays and jokes pass off
effortlessly.  A good deal of slapstick helps keep oh ye of little brains
occupied while the juicer cerebellum focuses on the more intelligent attacks
on the nature of comic books in general (the reason that no one recognizes
super heroes who merely change from having glasses to not having glasses)
and the type of bizarre powers that are featured in Marvel or DC comic
books.
 Of all of the scenes in the film, I would have to say that the most
memorable remains when they are searching for qualified heroes.  On the list
are PMS Avenger ("I work four days a month, you have a problem with that?"),
Pencil Man and Pencil Boy, and Ballerina Man.  I don't think I have to tell
you any more how wacky and enjoyable Mystery Men is.  Besides, the rest you
should see for yourself.

Title
Review for Larry David: Curb Your Enthusiasm (1999) (TV)
Larry David: Curb Your Enthusiasm (1999, TV-MA)
There's a moment in Larry David: Curb Your Enthusiasm that I became sure that
I was dealing with a mockumentary.  Larry is in the offices at HBO and, over
Larry's shoulder, there was a poster for Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth.
 Seeing as the last documentary made by Robert Weide was the Academy-award
nominated Lenny Bruce film, that was simply too coincidental to rule out any
possibility that the documentary was real.
Of course I had my suspicions before that.  The conversations Larry David was
having were a little too Seinfeldian in nature.  The conflicts a little too
contrived.  What they said all seemed to flow naturally, as most mockumentary
dialogue does (see The Blair Witch Project's bit about "Gilligan's Island"). 
The camera shook just the right amount.  The colors had that amateurish hue
associated when you don't have cinematographers shining lights in people's
faces or a very good DV.  Knowing Weide's latest works (Lenny Bruce: Swear to
Tell the Truth and being the writer-producer for Mother Night), I couldn't
help but crack a smile as I realized that one was being put over on millions
of HBO viewers across the country.  Its the exact kind of thing that Larry
David and Robert Weide would (and obviously do) love.
The mockumentary is the documentary's teenager.  It runs around, does
whatever it wants, and keeps going back and forth between the line between
entertainment and intelligence.  Contrary to popular belief, it existed before
this summer's smash The Blair Witch Project (see This is Spinal Tap), and will
exist long after the profit record for BWP is broken.  To give a simple
definition, it is a documentary that either tackles a fake subject or tackles
a real subject in a contrived way.  Much as I praised Lenny Bruce: Swear to
Tell the Truth for being one of the finest documentaries I had ever seen,
Larry David: Curb Your Enthusiasm is the best mockumentary I have ever seen.
Larry David: Curb Your Enthusiasm is the supposed documentary about the
preparation for Larry David's return to stand up with an HBO special, which is
eventually canceled at Larry's request (between a 3000-seat auditorium and a
picture of him that looked like Woody Allen as if a cigarette had just been
removed from his mouth, he goes the way of George's dad and says "I can't take
it anymore" (but of course lies about the reason)).  Over the period of
forty-four days, Larry David is followed by the camera which records
everything from a bit regarding Carolyn instead of Caroline, a near-divorce
because Larry gets caught in the park with his adulterous manager's
girlfriend, and a letter of recommendation gone to hell in a handbasket. 
Because Weide is a great documentarian, he is able to be a great
mockumentarian.  He is so very familiar with the technical aspects and
stylistic giveaways of documentary filmmaking that his mockumentary seems to
be so perfectly real.  It balances effortlessly the interviews and the raw
footage, inserts David's comedy sets at just the right moments, and puts in
some seriousness just to placate all documentary die-hards.  Larry David is
able to toss the jokes out with the same perfection as he did for nine years
as a producer on "Seinfeld", and the two of them combine their efforts to make
the mockumentary as surreally believable as some of the episodes of "Seinfeld"
are.
As always, I cannot let a movie off without complaining about one thing.  My
complaint with Curb Your Enthusiasm is that the film seems to have too much
direction to it to be completely believable.  There are too many little
touches for you to believe that this is real, and, in any mockumentary, this
is distracting.
But it isn't distracting enough to keep you from laughing your ass off.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Hideous Kinky (1998)
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.

Susan Granger's review of "HIDEOUS KINKY" (Stratosphere Entertainment)
        For her follow-up film to "Titanic," Kate Winslet has chosen a
decidedly un-glamorous role in this modest British film, based on
Esther Freud semi-autobiographical novel about her own exotic
childhood experiences. Winslet plays a restless, penniless single
mother from London who takes her two bewildered young daughters - a
skeptical eight year-old and an enthusiastic six year-old - to
Marrakech in the early '70s in the wake of her divorce from an
unreliable British poet. Playing the precocious older daughter, Bella
Riza, is the actress who scores in this film, squirming over her
mother's selfish irresponsibility and shallow, bohemian pretentions as
the mother-daughter tension is sharply observed. Winslet's romance
with an acrobat/hustler (Said Taghmaoui, the French-Moroccan actor
from "La Haine") doesn't contribute much to the episodic story - and
the bizarre, unappealing title is derived from a funny-sounding word
game devised by the sisters whose fondest wish is to be "normal."
Screenwriter Billy MacKinnon and his brother, director Gillies
MacKinnon ("The Playboys"), have created a hybrid: part
travelogue/part nostalgic quest for metaphysical
salvation. Unfortunately, the characters - and John de Borman, the
cinematographer - spend too much time wandering aimlessly in the sun,
indulging in the pungent flavors of the time and place. On the Granger
Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Hideous Kinky" is a pretty but parched 5 as
it slowly labors to re-capture the soul-searching hippie spirit.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
     To be or not to be?  That is the question.  Or, at least, that is
supposed to be the question.  In the care of Disturbing Behavior, the
question is rather what to be.  One on hand, you have a fairly gripping
psychological thriller.  On the other, you have a teen moneymaking vehicle.
     One may ask, why can't it be both?  It can't be both because you just
can't be a psychological thriller and a horror film.  Sure, people have
tried, but I haven't seen it yet, and dollars to doughnuts, I've probably
seen more films than you.  Unfortunately, the writer and director of
Disturbing Behavior didn't quite get this.
     At least it focused mainly on being a teen vehicle.  In Disturbing
Behavior, instead of good kids going bad, bad kids are going good.  Of
course, having all seen our share of films with this plot, we know that
they're being brainwashed.
     Like all horror films, there really isn't any mystery or surprise to
the film.  Point A can figure Point B.  You have your basic secluded
setting: nice, suburban, and, of course, on an island only accessible by
ferry.
     Well, basically, the movie grudges along, trying to be good.  That's
fine.  It tries to be funny and basically succeeds in that part.  It tries
to surprise and trick us, but basically fails in that respect.  It has a
hell of a soundtrack.
     The thing that bugged me about the film was that, instead of accepting
that it was a popcorn movie, it tried to be intelligent.  For that, you may
blame "X-Files" vets David Nutter and Scott Michael Rosenburg.  It tries to
be surreal, it tries to be intelligent, and it makes references that pass
way over the heads of its target audience.
     This basically puts a stake in the heart of the movie, killing what
could have been a good teen flick, which still was, according to the
majority of teens, a cool movie.  This yet again proves Cynical Hollywood
Thesis #132: "If you slap a good-looking girl, a teen-idol guy, and a good
soundtrack on a film, and it will make up its incredibly meager budget."
The soundtrack on this one is mostly punk metal, but includes some
interesting additions, such as the 50s song "Accentuate the Positive."  It
also gives us the gift of Harvey Dangerfield's "Flagpole Sitta," the song of
the 1998 summer that is basically gone but not forgotten.
     The kicks I got in the film mostly came in the form of inside jokes.
For instance, I was the only one in the theatre who noticed that Bruce
Greenwood, the bad guy, was in the exact opposite position in the cult TV
show "Nowhere Man" a few years back.  Or the million references it put in to
The Stepford Wives.  Or the homage it pays to "The X-Files."
     The performances are better than the average horror film, but the
script isn't: cliches dot the movie and basically get on my nerves.  The
director tries to do film noir, but forgot how to somewhere along the line.
Nick Stahl and Bruce Greenwood are the standouts of the film, although
Holmes hones her natural talent to some degree.
     This isn't all to say that Disturbing Behavior wasn't fun: it was.  I
enjoyed watching it, making fun of it, watching Katie Holmes not have to be
the all-American girl with the SAT-level vocabulary she plays on "Dawson's
Creek" (nipple and nose ring and all), but the film basically disappointed
me.  I wanted a paranoid thriller.  I got Wes Craven.

Title
Review for Crazy People (1990)
Starring Dudley Moore, Daryl Hannah, Paul Reiser, J.T. Walsh, and David
Paymer
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Ah, the curse of an unorthodox sleep schedule.  Yet again I find myself
watching movies I barely remember being advertised at times of night (or, in
this case, morning) that are highly strange.  Griping about my combination
of yuppie flu and insomnia (the latter both coming on at the worst time)
aside, I found myself watching a movie this morning that I had not seen in
years.
 The movie, Crazy People, is one of those films for which the phrase "only
in Hollywood" was coined.  Its hook: a bunch of lunatics come up with honest
ad campaigns (i.e. "Continental: We'll screw them to get your package there
on time" and "Sony: Because Caucasians are just too damn tall").  Its stars
slapped in: Dudley Morre (whom I affectionately nickname the British Warren
Beatty), Daryl Hannah (at the end of the 80s, the decade she shared with Kim
Basigner), Paul Reiser (before "Mad About You"), David Paymer (need I say
more), and J.T. Walsh.
 To sum the plot up, Emory (Moore) is committed after pitching numerous
honest ad campaigns at his Madison Avenue firm.  When the ads accidentally
hit the press and become ungodly successful, Drucker (Walsh) makes the
decision to pull Emory out of the nuthouse and put him back in the office.
 One problem: Emory has fallen for Kathy (Hannah) and doesn't want to leave
the sanitarium.
 So, the other lunatics begin helping him design ads for which they are paid
back in pens.
 This, my friends, is where the movie takes a severe turn towards sucking.
 As soon as the writer gets the chance, he takes the film away from its
fairly good premise and brings it into the realm of being a soapbox from
which to preach about the rights of the mentally ill for recognition and
compensation.  He makes Moore become an articulate spokesperson for this,
which forms an extreme irony on two points.  The first is that Dudley Moore
is so drunk that you can barely understand him throughout the film, and thus
isn't very articulate at all.  The second is that the film is highly unfair
to the mentally ill.
 Before I step on my own soapbox and make the mistake that Crazy People did,
I will say that the movie would have been more funny were it not exactly
what advertising (and, oftentimes, Hollywood) is a series of good lines.
Although each ad slogan, such as "AT&T: We're tired of taking your crap", is
howlingly funny, and each character is tossed a few nice lines, the movie as
a whole has nothing beyond that.  It seems to be an adman's movie.  By
admen, about admen.
 Of course, being as highly Hollywood as Crazy People is, one can sit back,
relax, and enjoy the movie.  One cannot, however, expect any deviation from
the norm other than a little more bravery to say what one wants.
 Crazy People takes the standard road.  It could have been great, or at
least it could have been decent, but it failed.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
At the time I am writing this, I have seen Saving Private Ryan three times.
Each time, I have resolved myself to write a review on it, but was not able
to do so. To sum up the greatness of this film would be like writing a
letter to the mother of a dead soldier. No words I can say can express the
tragedy inherent in the film. I could batter you with cliché after cliché,
trite phrase after trite phrase, but what would that accomplish? "Best film
of the year", "finest war movie ever made", and "an incredible experience"
are truths, but they do not tell the story.
Saving Private Ryan is a film about the agony of war. It is not told, as
most war films are, from a third-person, as the eye that sees but does not
care, but as a first-person (though I cannot reveal who), showing what
happened in World War II. The one cliché I will give that actually does do
the movie justice, and hear me out, is that it is the most violent movie of
all time.
Why does this do Saving Private Ryan justice? Because that is war. War is
when you have a man searching for his arm on Normandy while the world goes
to hell around him. War is innocent soldiers screaming for their mothers
with their guts hanging out, their final words being unintelligible because
of the pain. War is brutal. Saving Private Ryan IS war.
The basic plot is this: a squad of eight men is sent to retrieve one, a boy
who has lost his three brothers on the field of battle and now is lost
himself somewhere behind enemy lines. The eight men, Army Rangers, are
war-hardened individuals, but still strikingly human. Each character, from
the victims who are shot down in the first second of the invasion of
Normandy (which a re-enactment of occupies the first half hour of the film),
to Capt. Henry Miller (Tom Hanks) to Private James Ryan himself, are
beautifully developed, and perfect illustrations of the effects of war upon
man.
This is the justice I offer: The first time I watched it, I saw an old man
walking out. Upon asking him why he was walking out, seeing him in the
lobby, he informed me this: he had been at Normandy.

Title
Review for North Beach (2000)
As we've seen in several recent Clerks knock-offs, doing nothing isn't
anywhere as entertaining as we've all thought.  Starting out with damn
near no plot, almost no point, and a collection of bizarre characters
and ending up with a funny movie that keeps your attention for a good
hour and a half just can't be done in Hollywood style.  So when I find
myself watching a film like North Beach, which proves its tagline of
"Once in a while, a movie comes along that defines a generation.  Let's
hope to God this ain't it," quite effectively, I can't help but enjoy
it.
North Beach centers (as much as a movie that wanders its way through its
story can center) around Tyler (Casey Peterson), a denizen of North
Beach, San Francisco who happens to have made the mistake of sleeping
with a 19-year-old stripper from New Orleans.  Slacker movie that North
Beach is, no matter where Tyler goes, everyone knows about this before
he tells them including his girlfriend.  The inevitable result is that
Tyler spends all day in frantic attempts to win his girlfriend back and
manage whatever else pops up in his slacker life.
As clichéd as the plot sounds (I mean, let's face it, this is the same
deal as every slacker film), North Beach has the rare panache required
to pull it off.  Casey Peterson, who also wrote and produced the film,
provides just the right combination of multidimensional characters,
witty dialogue, and insanity to make North Beach work, and North Beach
does work in most ways.
Co-directors Jed Mortenson and Richard Speight Jr. are proficient in
their craft despite this being their first time in the chair, and the
cast works together like a well-oiled machine.  At times North Beach
pushes it a little too over-the-top.  Just like the Redbank Trilogy or
Dazed and Confused, North Beach finds itself more than once in a
situation that's just a little too surreal for a slacker comedy, and for
that moment it losses its charm.
But such moments are fleeting.  For the most part, North Beach is simply
a highly entertaining comedy with few flaws other than its level of
realism.  And hey, as everyone who flames me is so fond of saying, it is
only a movie.
Director: Jed Mortenson, Richard Speight Jr.
Producer: Jed Mortenson, Casey Peterson
Writer: Casey Peterson
Starring: Casey Peterson, Jjennifer Milmore, Gabrielle Anwar, Richard
Speight Jr., Jim Hanna, Barrow Davis, Hopwood DePree
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Donald Hall and Jane Kenyon: Keeping You Safe Beside Me (1999)
Donald Hall and Jane Kenyon: "Keeping you Safe Beside me"
Director/Photographer/Editor: William Hamilton
Production Assistant: Brett S. Shafer
Person Interviewed: Donald Hall
With the voices of: Donald Hall and Jane Kenyon
Released by The Indiana University of Pennsylvania
     Steps to becoming a film critic.  First, you must develop a tolerance
for movies.  Not just for violence on film, or sex on film or anything else
that you may or may not find personally distasteful, but for bad films in
general.  Humanity is dropped at the door if at all possible, and you
reflect on your experiences with a human aspect once you exit.  Second, you
must learn that the world you are entering into is not at all a pleasant
one.  Three: Find an outlet.  Online places, due to their relative ease, are
a good start.  Do not try to get pay from the start, because you won't.  A
great deal many of us have been in this for years and have reaped nary a
dime.  Four: Network.  Get to know the business and the people in the
business.  Anytime you can pick the brains of a filmmaker, do so.
     The big fish in the business of film criticism, Roger Ebert, Leonard
Maltin.  These people know everybody, and are very logical about their
reviews.   Myself, I know a lot of the people on the low level (i.e. the
agent of Jena Olin, the cinematographer my favorite shot in history, the
opening shot of The Player).  I know them peripherally at most, by email.
However, today I feel as if I have made a major career move, because I have
met someone who has produced his own documentary.
     Admittedly, this is not a great source of excitement.  I've met people
farther up the food chain than this guy, but its still a source of dumb
pride (this is what I get for living in the suburbs for many years).  No,
I'm not reviewing this as a personal favor to him, although I do consider
him a friend I told him candidly before the premier at the local branch of
IUP that I do not show mercy as a critic.  I'm writing this review because,
as far as documentaries go, it's one of the finest I have seen in the past
four years of criticism.
     Remember that a documentary's basic purpose is not to tell a story.  It
is not to entertain.  It is definitely not to be original.   There goes
every single aspect upon which I normally grade a film... or does it?  The
documentary, for which the entire cast and crew is listed above, blurs the
lines between documentary and docudrama as it tells the story of Donald Hall
and the late Jane Kenyon, a tale of poets in love.
     Giving background, Donald Hall and Jane Kenyon are both poets that
wrote the majority of their time in New England and, at least I believe, are
of the naturalist persuasion.  Truth to be told, I do not know very much
about them.  This is not to say that the documentary was not informative: it
told me very much of the enduring romance between Donald Hall, a very
traditional man, and Jane Kenyon, a woman who spent most of her life
fighting manic-depression and died of leukemia in 1995.  It told me about
two people who appreciated New England like only people from New England
can, the ones who don't mind that bugs eat you alive and will give it all up
for the smell of the sea.
     What was interesting about this documentary, and what made it much
better than the 35mm or 16mm filmed Pretty as a Picture: The Art of David
Lynch, which was the last documentary that I saw, was that it did not fall
into what I term as the "documentary trap."  The idea of a documentary may
be to inform, but the idea of human nature is to entertain oneself every
chance we would get.  So, unless I'm in a classroom setting, I'd rather
watch a documentary which is more like a docudrama, which is what this film
is.
     Whereas the normal documentary does not move the camera (except to
pan), this film does.  Where as the normal documentary spends its time in
color, this one switches in between color and black and white.  The normal
documentary has about as much residual noise as a silent film has spoken
conversation.  It also has a touching story and hints of a basically cyclic
film style (the first and last scenes are the same).  This film has a
soundtrack in the form of original (and not too shabby) compositions.  It
does fall into one trap of the documentary, however.  It does have bad
lighting, which I have seen on about every documentary to date, and thus I
believe it to be unavoidable.
     I'm not going to tell you to rush to the multiplex to see this film.
You won't find it.  I'm not going to tell you to tune into PBS to watch it.
You won't find it there, either.  In fact, it is currently in the hands of
the marketing department at IUP.  I'm just saying that, should you get the
chance to see this, jump on it.

Title
Review for Eve's Bayou (1997)
Starring Jurnee Smolett, Meagan Good, Samuel L. Jackson, Lynn Whitfield, Lisa
Nicole Carson, and Debbi Morgan
"Memory is a selection of images, some elusive, others printed indelibly on
the brain.  The summer I killed my father, I was ten years old."  This
shocking opening line not only sets the tone but starts the galloping pace of
the psychological thriller Eve's Bayou.  It is the kind of line taught in
writing school, a line that can sustain an entire story with its cool malice.
Eve's Bayou is a film shocking in methods and motives.
In methods, it creates a movie that has bone-chilling characters, moments at
which you jump, and yet has characters that make you emotional putty in
writer-director Kasi Lemmons' hands.  In effortlessly sidesteps cliches
involving taboo subjects such as incest.
In motives, Eve's Bayou is one of those rare movies that has characters about
whom you can care... no matter what they have done or profess to do.  Going
far beyond just a tiny bit of moral ambiguity, all of the residents of Eve's
Bayou live in a realm of gray.  It makes you realize perfectly that life can
at the same time be utterly chilling and incredibly dramatic.
The story of Eve's Bayou deals with the descendents of a slave named Eve and
Jean-Paul Batiste, who inhabit an incredibly nice home on the Louisiana bayou.
 The Batiste family is a powder keg waiting to explode.  It has a philandering
father (Samuel L. Jackson), a psychic aunt (Debbi Morgan), and three children
under fifteen.  The mother is overprotective and knows of her husbands
infidelities.  The aunt is cursed that each man she marries will die.
After a party, Eve Batiste (the middle child, who voices the opening line as
an adult) catches her father with a local flirt named Mattie Mereaux (Lisa
Nicole Carson).  To a 10 year old, this is a destroying moment.  Her innocence
is shattered in that very moment.  She begins to become curious about what
other secrets lie in the bayou, swimming on the surface of the water like
snakes ready to strike.
Curiosity killed the cat, but it is not Eve who suffers for it.  Instead, it
eventually is her father.  How this comes about you will have to watch the
movie yourself to discover.
The greatness of this film comes in its ability to be almost all things at
once.  Encompassed inside its borders are tinges of comedy, doses of drama,
and an abundance of thrills.  Like Eyes Wide Shut, its thrills come from the
intellectual level.  They are not, in any way, shape, or form, visceral.  As
the mystery unravels itself, you are drawn more and more into the characters
and the temperature of the room seems to continually decrease.
Needless to say, this is not your everyday expectation for a thriller.
Kasi Lemmons, a first time director, handles everything on her set with an
adept hand.  Although my pick still would go with Atom Egoyan for The Sweet
Hereafter for Best Director in 1997, Lemmons was passed over for a nomination.
 Jurnee Smollett, playing 10-year-old Eve, acts as if she were born and raised
in front of the camera.  Her facial expressions are perfectly under control,
the timbre of her voice hers to command.  Not since Jodie Foster in Taxi
Driver have I seen a child do so well in such an ambiguous role.
The one major disappointment in Eve's Bayou comes in the form of Samuel L.
Jackson, who looks a little too happy-go-lucky for the part.  His smile is a
little to wide, his eyes a little too bright.  Despite the fact that he spends
half the movie screwing women other than his wife its hard to really hate him.
 Then again, perhaps that is the way the director wanted it.
A film is a selection of images, some elusive, others printed indelibly upon
the brain.  Eve's Bayou will never leave once it is there.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Jacob's Ladder (1990)
Directed by Adrian Lyne (Fatal Attraction)
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin (Deep Impact)
Starring Tim Robbins (The Player) and Elizabeth Pena
 In 1991, we were graced as a viewing public with two of perhaps a dozen
horror movies to date which are actually scary rather than funny.  One was
the Best-Picture winning Silence of the Lambs.  The other was Jacob's
Ladder.
 In Jacob's Ladder, Jacob Singer, a Vietnam Vet, is living in the Bronx with
his girlfriend Jezebel.  He's haunted by Post-Traumatic Stress of an
offensive (shortly before the Tet) that he can't remember anything but
scattered images.  Now, the insane world of New York offers to him the
strangest things he can imagine: demons straight out of the Book of
Revelations, horns and all.
 As he goes deeper into his own insanity, he begins losing himself in time:
having flashbacks of the mysterious offensive and of spending time with his
wife and three children.  As it stands in the film, you have no idea which
part of it is real.
 Although simpler than Lynch's 1997 effort into the psychotically bizarre
Lost Highway, Adrian Lyne does a much better job behind the camera,
delivering unto us stunning visuals of demons and other such monsters
roaming New York.
 Sadly, I am at a quandary as to what information I part unto you.  I can
neither confirm nor deny what other people may have said, out of fear of
ruining one of the most shocking and surprising twist endings: one worthy of
a Twilight Zone episode or an O'Henry story.
 What I can confirm is the review that states that Jacob's Ladder `redefines
the psychological thriller'.  It does. The psychological thriller is a genre
so diluted from its Hitcockian original (Psycho) by a dozen years of
Halloween-esque cliched horror films that believe the sight of blood itself
is terrifying.  Hemophobics of the world unite!  It has become the genre of
hacks and B-films and drive in necking sessions.
 Jacob's Ladder will be a film no one necks during.
 Jacob's Ladder is a brilliant effort, straight from the mind of script
doctor Bruce Joel Rubin (Deep Impact), a man repeatedly able to turn out
great stuff on his own and good stuff in collaboration with another writer.
Tim Robbins shines in one of his finest roles (the first in a string of four
great performances including The Player, Short Cuts, and The Shawshank
Redemption) ever to grace the medium of celluloid.  We are also greeted with
Elizabeth Pena, perhaps the most mysterious seductive woman ever on film
(step aside, Sharon Stone, you have company).
 As the mystery of the strangely lyrical film unfolds in front of you, one
can't help but wonder why the horror genre, the bastard child of
psychological thrillers, ever came to be at all.  They are this good without
die-hard killers, big-busted screamers, and humorless humor.  Without those
elements, they possess the power to actually frighten someone, a skill that
seemed to be lost until this film came out.
 What to say to convince someone to see a film that I know to be excellent?
Should I say that it actually is an excellent film?  Should I tell you that
it is the finest psychological thriller that I have ever seen?  That it is a
mysterious, beautiful, and terrifying film?  I think I should tell you all
of these things, and more, but I have no means to organize my praise for the
film I am extolling.  I only hope that you pick up where my words leave off,
and see the film.

Title
Review for Killing Time (1998)
Written by Casper Berry, Fluer Costello, and Neil Marshall
Starring Kendra Torgan, Craig Fairbass, and Nigel Leach
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The problem with the movie Cube is that it couldn't decide which it wanted
to be: studio or independent.  Cube was your basic horror movie, filmed for
about $300,000 on a single 14' by 14' set with a total of seven people in
the cast.  It was a concept easily pitchable to the studios and done with
corresponding quality, ending up coming out a fair disaster yet it persisted
in giving the same cheesy enjoyment as any 80s schlock horror film.  It
wanted to be done independently, with all of the special attention and
allure that Independent films get, yet wanted all of the look and advantages
of a mainstream studio audience.  The result is always a cosmic fluke.
 Similarly, 1998's Killing Time is a cosmic fluke.
 It's one of those films that was easily done on what looks to be a
shoestring budget that has all of the look of an independent motion picture
(i.e. most of the action takes place in a single hotel room).  However, it
is just as contrived, just as boring, and just as idiotic as an action
picture.
 When I saw the preview such a long time ago I was positively sure that
Killing Time had promise.  It had a good premise (hire an assassin to kill
someone and then kill the assassin so you can skip on the bill).  It had a
good soundtrack (an excellent song from Portishead worked great with the
preview). It had the kind of extra-grainy look that comes from either a 16mm
or an 8mm.  Yet, when push came to shove, Killing Time seems like an extra
waste of my time.
 The entire movie spends its time killing off people that do not need to be
killed off and waiting for a tram to arrive at 5:40.  Italian Assassin Maria
(Kendra Torgan) speaks absolutely no English and kills everyone and anyone
she wants to.  She kills at least a dozen people in her first attempt to get
her target (Nigel Leach), then kills the four people who were supposed to
kill her when the job was done (and a Hotel page, just for the hell of it).
 She misses a few times, hits on target.  She plays William Tell with one of
the hitmen.  She stands in one place and all the bullets fly right by her.
 In short, just your average action movie.
 The Portishead track that worked so well with the preview only plays a
couple of times in the movie (both times misplaced), and the rest of the
soundtrack plays like a dud.  There is no score to help the movie along.
The cinematography is as poor as the script.
 British action filmmakers put out this piece of crap, thinking that they
would be like the Americans.  A tip for Western European action wannabes:
American Action films are nothing to mimic.  We've only done one good one in
years, and that's The Matrix.  The rest of them were done by Hong Kong
expatriates.  Stick to those nice little parlor dramas and dark comedies you
seem to be so great at.


Title
Review for Billy Madison (1995)
Ah, the joy of the newsgroup.  These psuedo-anonymous message boards can be
home to freaks, weirdos, and just about anyone else that would like to walk
in the door and put their opinion on the ground myself included.  They also
can be home to the flame war, a particular brand of argument with well
thought-out yet often incoherent point-counterpoint arguments that more
often than not sound like the ravings of a truculent drunk (go ahead, flame
me for that comment, see if I care).  Of course, I'm not exempt from this.
My profession as a critic makes me the prime target of many a flame war,
such as one going on at present at alt.movies discussing the fate of the
cinema, and whether the entire form has gone to crap.
The key argument in this has been that younger individuals are incapable of
writing a screenplay: a point I vehemently disagree with, yet my antagonist
has missed a prime example: Billy Madison, Adam Sandler's attempt at getting
out all of those demons of k through 12 school (God knows what will happen
when he gets out those collegiate demons a former classmate of Sandler's
described him as `the kid who thought he was really funny that just annoyed
everyone.').  After all, with a concept as unimaginative as a man going back
through all of his grades so he can inherit a company, how far can your
really go?
The movie reeks of desperation.  Nonsensical musical numbers, imaginary
penguins, and cheap sex jokes they're all here.  No one will escape the
wrath of Adam in his quest for laughter and a better tomorrow.
In case you really wonder about the plot, Adam Sandler is Billy Madison,
loony toon son of a millionaire who stands to inherit a hotel chain if only
he'll stop acting like a moron.  But instead of placing Billy around mature
individuals to accomplish this, his father sends him back through every
grade, giving two weeks for each one.  Billy goes to school, falls for his
3rd grade teacher, and sings crazy selfmotivational music numbers as he
attempts to pat himself on the back so he can make it through high school.
Adam Sandler, please learn that many (extending the `I' here) don't like
your catharsis, and you should keep the moral message in check and just
deliver an idiotic comedy.  As an idiotic comedy, Billy Madison almost
works  after all, Sandler is immature enough to nail the part  but the
film also has misguided attempts to insert such goody-goody messages as
`love thy [insert unloved party here]' that just interrupt what would have
been enjoyment.  The result: a dumb comedy that I can only stand if I'm
watching it out of the corner of my eye and paying attention only during
certain scenes.
This, needless to say, is not great filmmaking.
Oh well.  Like The Blob, there is no escape from the Adam Sandler film.
They have become cultural icons, films that are regularly broadcasted when
they should have been boycotted.  But now I have been there, I have done
that, and I would love it if Adam Sandler would just leave us alone.
Director: Tamra Davis
Producer: Robert Simmons
Writer: Adam Sandler, Tim Herilhy
Starring: Adam Sandler, Bridgette Wilson, Bradley Whitford, Josh Mostel,
Norm MacDonald, Mark Bletzman
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Written by Ronald Bass and William Broyles, Jr.
Starring Sean Connery, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Ving Rhames, and Will Patton.
     Someone find me a cure, I'm obsessed with film.  Sure, there's your
general movie buff, who digests about a hundred or so films a year.  Then
there's your true obsessive-compulsive film watcher.  He has HBO, Showtime,
and a fair sized video collection and still watches about three hundred
films a year.  Then you have your movie fanatic.  A man who can recite, word
for word, the script from a movie you've never heard of, he has all the
premium channels, watches edited films on cable, and a fine video
collection.  Then you have me.  In my best year, 1996, I saw 2/3 of the
films in national release.  I have a video collection of about three hundred
EP tapes, plus several tapes I have bought.  I have two premium channels
that I watch at least three movies on a week and I am steadily building a
DVD collection.  When there is a sneak preview, I will be there.  When I can
get videos for reduced cost or for free, I will get them.  Like Candance
Bushnell is reputed to buy shoes, I buy movies.
     So, when the chance presented itself to see Entrapment early, how could
I resist?  I was willing to travel more time than it took me to see a movie,
end up back home at about 11:00, and get my first fix of seeing a sneak
preview in about a year and a half.
     Seeing it, I remembered how refreshing sneak previews are.  I
remembered why I started going to them in the first place (aside from my
neurotic need to see a movie before anyone else does) people cheered.
    This may have been the general air of the screener, one of excitement as
fairly ordinary people's days are lit up by seeing a movie before it comes
out. Of the prizes won, the prizes lost, but, you know what, I'm willing to
think that it was the movie that made people cheer.
    Entrapment is not really anything new to the world of crime fiction as
far as books are concerned. In books, we see capers so well planned that you
can't help but love them. Entrapment, however, is the first movie I've seen
with exceptionally planned robberies, ones that go above and beyond the norm
of the break in and do the job antics that populate Hollywood. It goes
beyond nicely plotted, it goes beyond nicely planned. Both are cinematic
aspects planned to a T.
    The story is basically one of love among thieves. Sean Connery is a
crack jewel thief (the best in the world, of course Monty Penny) who is
being chased by Gin Baker, a woman working for an insurance company (at a
desk). As they are brought together by a high profile heist of a Rembrant,
the two begin to develop a strange love-hate relationship. Connery and Gin,
begin to plot to get an ancient Chinese mask worth $40 million with an even
better heist planned after that.
    I'd love to tell you more, but part of the fun of Entrapment (besides
pulse-pounding action, and the sex appeal of Catherine Zeta-Jones for men
and Sean Connery for women) is not knowing for sure what's going to happen
next. Yeah, you know everything will turn out honky-dory, and you know that
they'll make it through their heists, but you don't quite know what's
coming. You have general ideas, but they won't help you that much.
    Unlike Jon Amiel's previous film, Copycat, Entrapment does not have more
plot holes than stones in a graveyard he learned from his mistakes and used
some spackle to cover what could be some potentially irreconcilable damages
to the plot. It takes care to answer every how, why, when, and what.
    In fact, on this film almost everybody does their jobs. Sean Connery
shows the same off-kilter charm he showed with every one of the James Bond
films. Catherine Zeta-Jones is always able to look as good as she acts, and
Ving Rhames is able to show off the basic street charm that's made him
famous. Will Patton plays as good (or bad) of a jerk as he always has. The
cinematographer does his job by throwing in some very impressive shots. The
writers do their jobs by making an action movie a critic can enjoy.
    Yes, as always, I'm not going to completely laud the film. I have my
stupid gripe, and for Entrapment it would have to be that Catherine
Zeta-Jones can't keep her voice steady for the first half of the picture.
It gives you the sense that she was basically like `Yes, I'm acting with
Sean Connery, now let me act like a ditz!' Not to say she did a bad job she
didn't, but either her or the mike operators screwed up.
    Well, that's about all I can tell you, except that with Entrapment, the
best thing to do is sit back, relax, and let Entrapment trap you.

Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
A Night at the Roxbury is a night to forget.
It's all a conspiracy towards cheap movies. It's all a conspiracy towards
cheap movies because some of them have become not an object to entertain but
a calculated bomb. Something that was made cheap, made quick, and made bad.
They [the movie execs] know it will bomb. They know that people will come
out of the theater feeling as if they wasted their money. But, friends,
Roman, countrymen people who will hat the movie with a religious passion
they also know we'll see it, and they know they'll make up their budget.
It's something they do with their Madison Avenue boys. They teach them mind
tricks and manipulations, slights of hand, scams, lies, and cheats. They
teach them how to make the worst movie seem like a pile of good jokes,
glitz, and glamour. They did such a thing to A Night at the Roxbury.
To sum it up in a sentence: A Night at the Roxbury is a cheap, dumb movie
that makes Firestorm and The Wedding Singer look like fine art, made by a
couple of members of the BAA (Barfly Association of America) who act
themselves on Saturday Night Live weekly at the exact moment when we decide
to turn off our TV sets and go to bed. There is no humor; there is no
redeeming value. There is no possibility of fun at this movie. Sure, a few
very stupid eight-year-olds laughed behind me once or twice, but, aside from
that, the theater was silent enough to hear crickets. I have nothing against
SNL. I loved Wayne's World, like most of the works of Adam Sandler, and
would never say a bad word against Chris Farley. It's just that this wouldn'
t work as a skit. It wouldn't work as anything. Wait no. It would work very
well for target practice.

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
I don't know why I didn't see it before. I saw Natural Born Killers, which I
will go out on a limb
and compare it to (minus excessive senseless violence and profanity and
Oliver Stone's foray into the surreal). I simply am left, in the first five
minutes after watching it, like I was caught inside a whirlwind of activity,
of insanity. Like I just watched a twisted version of the OJ Trial in an
hour and a half.
And indeed, that is the best analogy, for To Die For, Gus Van Sant's
screwball black comedy about a woman obsessed with being on television... to
the point to have her husband killed to do so (they even have the Star
Spangled Banner playing as she walks towards the cameras on the night of her
husband's death). It's just a perfect illustration, a perfect satire of the
black comedy which is violence in America. For an hour and a half it entraps
you in the world you're already in, but in such a way as to make you realize
just how twisted a place it is. Gus Van Sant preaches to the converted and
to the disbelieves and has em all coming out of the theater blinking twice,
doing a double take and wondering ... did this really happen? The answer...
it did.
No: Tom Cruise isnt' dead by the hands of Nicole Kidman (who plays the very
disturbed main character), but dying left and right are the NBKC, The
Natural Born Killers copycats, thrill-killers who seek to be immortalized
for their crimes. Psychopaths inhabiting our world, obsessed with the media.
The violence in film issue, the death of Brandon Lee on the set of The Crow,
Kurt Cobain copycat suicides. All of it shows this film for what it is...
Not a fiction but a mirror. This is not the world according to Gus Van Sant
(which I will stop and watch anyday), but, like Drugstore Cowboy, one of the
director's first and most realistic works, a showing of the world as HOW IT
IS. Watching this movie, I recognize this, and the line pops into my head
from a book in an equal vein of reality, American Psycho : ABANDON ALL HOPE
YE WHO ENTER HERE is scrawled in blood.

Title
Review for When Harry Met Sally... (1989)
It was the 80s, the time when acid washed jeans went, the Ephrons could
turn out a decent script, Rob Reiner could direct something worth
watching, and Billy Crystal hadn't succumbed to the sequel curse.  And
Meg Ryan?  Well, Meg Ryan's still pretty much Meg Ryan: sickeningly Top
40, an actress who seemingly lives in fear of picking a role that could
be too controversial (never mind her recent marital scuffle).
When Harry Met Sally... closed out a decade fondly remembered by Grosse
Pointe Blank and Romy and Michele's High School Reunion and darkly
satirized by Bret Easton Ellis' American Psycho.  It's a romantic comedy
that has spawned a plethora of knockoffs so terrifying that, like its
counterparts in all other genres, it may have been better if the script
were never penned, if only to save us from the aftermath.  But still, we
have to give When Harry Met Sally... credit for what it did: Make one of
the few romance films that bears any kind of truth without also being a
dark comedy.
Two people who want absolutely nothing to do with each other in the
beginning of the story, Harry Burns (Billy Crystal) and Sally Albright
(Meg Ryan) end up driving together to move into separate apartments in
New York City after they both graduate from college.  By the time they
reach the Big Apple, they're talking about their disbelief that
friendship and sex can coexist, and as we all know from experience (and
now cliché) they eventually hook up -- it's unavoidable.
Rather than make the mistake that countless copycats have by making
their tryst a quick cut away from a sex scene to appease the MPAA, When
Harry Met Sally... takes its time to the inevitable end.  And I mean
takes its time: For 10 years Harry's and Sally's paths weave back and
forth like Robert Downey Jr. trying to walk the white line.  At
years-long intervals they befriend each other, drift apart, befriend
each other again, and, at long last, find themselves testing their own
theory (to the inevitable happy ending).
As for why When Harry Met Sally... still contains cinematic merit a
dozen years after its initial release, it actually has all of the
strengths that make a movie last.  Nora Ephron's dialogue is sharp,
witty, and intelligent, Billy Crystal shows us a movie in which he
(mostly) acts instead of does a stand up routine with other actors
present, Rob Reiner directs a simple story instead of trying to preach
on God-knows-what-tangent, and even run-of-the-mill Meg Ryan takes a
huge risk with her squeaky clean image by faking an orgasm in a deli (a
now-legendary scene worth the rental alone).  And don't forget Harry
Connick Jr.'s stellar soundtrack.
While to this day it is a mark of masculine shame to admit to actually
liking the movie, I personally am not afraid to give it my seal of
approval.  And I'm awfully manly.
[Editor's Note: The new DVD release features a ton of extra footage,
commentary track, and a making-of documentary.  Worth checking out.]
Director: Rob Reiner
Producer: Rob Reiner, Andrew Scheinmann
Writer: Nora Ephron
Starring: Billy Crystal, Meg Ryan, Carrie Fisher, Bruno Kirby
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Hi-Line, The (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/b4c2639b9da39a0c882568d7005f5d8d?OpenDocument
Everyone wants to be a director.  Actors, producers, writers, actresses,
sometimes even critics.  But sound mixers?  Shoot me if I see a film
written and directed by The Dust Brothers.
Yet I have just finished watching The Hi-Line, an incredible simple
narrative ditty by two-time Academy Award winning sound guy Ronald
Judkins (Jurassic Park, Schindler's List, and Saving Private Ryan), and,
much to my surprise, the film wasn't all that bad.
Marketed completely wrong, one would see the tagline of The Hi-Line
(`Vera Johnson is about to make a big discovery herself') and assume
that Rachel Leigh Cook completely cashed out last year with She's All
That and began to make nothing more than Hollywood dribble.  Yet The
Hi-Line never goes down that terrible road to bad acting and incredible
melodrama.  Instead, it does what the last film from its executive
producers (Instinct) did not: provides a decent character drama.
In The Hi-Line, Vera Johnson (Rachel Leigh Cook) is just like a lot of
rural girls: she wants out of her Montana town.  Her particular
escape-of-choice is as clichéd as her character originally appears to
be: Vera wants to model.  Sam Polvino (Ryan Alosio) comes into town
claiming to be a scout from a department store in Chicago, but we know
from the get go that his motives are a little different.  In truth, Sam
knew Vera's real father, and Vera was one of those children who was left
by her mother.
Rather than go the ultra-sentimental route and place in tons of
symphonic crescendos, thus turning The Hi-Line into a melodramatic POS
resembling a beat-up-Ford, The Hi-Line takes the high road into a
journey of self-discovery.
For a sound man, Judkins manages his cast to perform just as well
talking as silent.  Newcomer Alosio turns out a very impressive
performance as a man struggling not to become a drifter, while Rachel
Leigh Cook acts up a very quiet storm as a woman facing internal
struggles that her small town life has not prepared her for.
In the end, the characters bend inward, examine themselves, and come to
the sort of resolution that you only get in movies.
Therein, of course, lies my gripe as a critic.
For such a thoughtful and nontraditional film, The Hi-Line manages to
end so Hollywood that you begin to wonder what ever happened to that gem
of originality.  Although I enjoy happy ending as much as the next guy,
I wonder if a more ambiguous ending would suit The Hi-Line better.  To
get an idea of a movie very similar to The Hi-Line that does this, watch
Ed Radtke's The Dream Catcher, a film that is making the festival and
European circuits but has not gotten the acclaim it deserves here.  Yet
when dealing with The Hi-Line, an art house film sure to draw quite a
few teens on the appeal of Rachel Leigh Cook, a more resolved ending
will probably prove to be just what the audience ordered.  My other
gripe is with director of photography Wally Pfister, who underlights the
majority of the movie, resulting in a very unprofessional look.
Yet The Hi-Line takes the high road over these flaws as well.  It ends
up being mystic, intelligent, and a welcome break from what is beginning
to look like a very ugly cinematic summer.
Director: Ronald Judkins
Producer: Collin Phillips, Molly Mayuex
Writer: Ronald Judkins
Starring: Rachael Leigh Cook, Ryan Alosio, Margot Kidder, Stuart
Margolin, Tantoo Cardinal
http://www.thehi-line.com/
---
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
There's a reason why there are more romantic comedies than slapstick movies:
they cost less, are easier to make, and are a more sound investment. After
all, we all want to fall in love, and what better place to do so that at the
movies? In nearly makes me shudder at the number of relationships that were
broken up last year by Adam Sandler's previous attempt at humor The Wedding
Singer, an exercise not in creative humor but uninspired dryness.
So he tried to make people fall in love; who can blame him? Well, I can,
but, as a critic, I have to not hold a grudge, or an opinion going in, or
any hold on reality inside of the theater because otherwise I'd have gone
insane long ago. So what has Sandler done now? He has atoned for his sins.
The Wedding Singer, well beyond sin and into blasphemy, which made me laugh
once, was perfectly counterbalanced by the slapstick comedy The Waterboy,
about a slow waterboy who decides to take his aggression out on the football
field. If it were a sports movie, it would be trite, but instead it is a
comedy, and we get to all enjoy ourselves.
At this point The Waterboy has a special place in my heart. Only a few
movies have tried to kill me with unexpected laughs. There's Something About
Mary almost did it with a kernel of popcorn that went down the wrong tube at
an unexpected second and this comedy, which I will never drink soda during
again. Make more like it Adam: your sins have been forgiven.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
Starring Francis MacDormand, Steve Buscemi, William H. Macy
     The Coen brothers have a good track record with dark comedy.  Everyone
who knows the business knows this.  With Raising Arizona, the gave us the
funniest chase scene ever captured on celluloid.  With Fargo, however, they
through their track record with comedy out the window and attempt to be
serious.
     Well, not really.  Fargo still contains an offbeat humor.  It still
contains a sense of the quirky and strange.  However, it takes it into a
darker, more insane level.
     Fargo, like The Big Lebowski, and Raising Arizona concerns a
kidnapping.  This kidnapping's perpetrator is Jerry Lundergard (William H.
Macy).  The target of the kidnapping is Jean Lundergard.  Jerry, a car
salesman as dirty as the deals he does, is in debt.  He hires a couple of
thugs (including Steve Buscemi) to kidnap her.  They're going to be paid out
of half of an $80,000 ransom, a ransom which Jerry is telling his
father-in-law (who's paying the ransom) is $1,000,000.
     Unfortunately, something goes wrong.  When a cop stops the thugs car on
the road outside of Brainard, he is shot and killed, along with two innocent
people who witnessed the murder.  The thugs demand the full $80,000, and
tensions start to develop.  The smart Chief of police of Brainard, Marge
(Frances MacDormand) is brought in to investigate the murders and we have
the makings of an intelligent mystery.
     Taking its cue to generate humor on the Minnesota accent, the film is
dotted with it's famous (or perhaps now infamous) line of `yah', which
almost every character says at least once.  The profanity, as characteristic
of the area, is also low.
     Also, the Coens create one of the most startling works of imagery done
in recent years.  Using the snow as a symbol for both a moral and physical
bleakness (this was also used by their friend Sam Ramni in A Simple Plan),
the entire movie is set in the winter of Minnesota and North Dakota, an area
startling cold as anyone who's ever been there can tell you.  The characters
seem to be as cold as their environment.  Also, in another feat of imagery,
the statue of Paul Bunyan in Brainard is often displayed in a film noir
aspect: it is lit from below and shown at night to be a menacing item.  The
entire film has an aura of cruelty about it.
     In fact, cruelty seems to be its point.  Not being cruel to us, but
proving how bad cruelty is.  It displays its openly essayistic point a
little too blaringly at the end although moral ambiguity dots this film, no
one can misinterpret the message.
     That is the only fault I can find in this film.  The script, although
frighteningly odd and not at all part of any conventional formula, is
excellent, worthy and winning the Best Original Screenplay award in 1996.
The acting is top notch, earning it another Academy Award for Best Actress
(Frances MacDormand).  The direction is steely.  For this excellent film,
all I can say is I have no other complaints.

Title
Review for Fast Times at Ridgemont High (1982)
What, you ask, is this movie of movies? This one which you've heard about?
It's an eighties thing, with not much appeal for the modern troupe because
its slower paced, less funny, than what you might see today. But, like a lot
of eighties movies, it holds its own merit. This adaptation of the book by
Cameron Crowe (don't know who he is? I'll give you a hint. He wrote and
directed the famous line "Did you know the human brain weighs eight pounds?"
That's right, the maker of Jerry Maguire and Singles) is a coming-of-age
drama about a young girl making the choice all of us make, sex or a
relationship.
Sure, we tell ourselves that both can exist, and they can, but there is the
line that she draws: if she wants to sleep around or if she wants to have
something to hold onto. And the movie, in a nutshell, is about that. It
follows her and her friends during their last year in High School in the
small town of Ridgemont. Where each one of them ends up with their troubles,
ranging from no girlfriend to an abortion to adultery.
It sounds serious, right?
The movie has its serious moments, but it has its funny moments too: from
two girls practicing blow jobs on a carat at a lunch table to a guy cruising
for chicks dressed in a pirate cap. The movie is sublimely funny. And
interesting. It's very sad, in my mind, that those things are so rarely seen
in the 90's.

Title
Review for Rugrats in Paris: The Movie (2000)
Well, the Rugrats are back, and, as usual, they're way too sophisticated
for their audience.  The Simpsons of the Nickelodeon Network has
meandered its way back onto the big screen, and this time they are
hitting the streets of Paris with more Freudian slips than a
sexually-charged first date.
To start with, Grandpa Lou has gotten remarried (leading into, by the
way, an excellent parody of The Godfather in the first scene) and all
Chuckie wants is a mommy.  Meanwhile, Stu Pickles gets a call from Paris
demanding that he come to fix a giant mechanical Reptar (a wonderful
running Godzilla/Pokemon spoof gag from the series) which he designed.
After discovering the mommy button on an airplane (the flight attendant
button), Chuckie decides that Paris is the perfect place to find a new
mommy.  The group proceeds to EuroReptarLand, where we discover that one
Coco LaBouche (Susan Sarandon) needs to become a mother so she can move
ahead in the Japanese conglomerate for which she works (oh, all the
feminist implications one can see in this).  Manipulative as Coco is,
she decides to romance Chuckie's dad via her secretary Kira's knowledge
of childrearing.
>From here on in the plot flows predictably, and the movie inserts its
share of both lowbrow puns and intelligent humor throughout the entire
film, making for a satisfactory viewing experience... a kid's movie the
rest of us can stand (or even enjoy).
Of course Rugrats in Paris is hardly exemplary.  It lacks the witty
parodies of the first Rugrats film, and goes for too many
fart-and-diaper jokes that are strictly kids-only.  The show would
better serve itself to go completely the route of The Simpsons and
dropping all pretense of being kiddie fare, instead using its writers'
satiric wit for all it's worth.  But, as the Rugrats franchise will be
raking in quite a few pretty pennies, don't expect anything like that to
happen anytime soon.  Instead, expect that these movies will gradually
get less and less intelligent, until one day Rugrats is nothing more
than just another one of those dumb kid's movies you can't stand.
Director: Stig Bergqvist, Paul Demeyer
Producer: Gabor Psupo, Arlene Klaspy
Writer: David N. Weiss, J. David Stem, Jill Gorey, Barbara Herndon, Kate
Boutlier
Starring: Joe Alaskey, Christine Cavanaugh, Melanie Chartoff, Cheryl
Chase, Elizabeth Daily, John Lithgow, Debbie Reynolds, Jack Riley, Susan
Sarandon, Kath Soucie
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Starring Cate Blanchett, Geoffrey Rush, Joseph Finnes, Richard Attenborough,
and Christopher Eccleston
     Of all of the things that Whoopi Goldberg said at the Academy Awards,
outrageous, often unfunny, and definitely uncreative as s most of them were,
the one most true was her opening.  Her opening stated, while she was
dressed in full Elizabethan regalia, that `this is a year about movies made
to honor me.'
     Elizabeth is one of the two movies with the Virgin Queen (hah!) of
England in them, the other, and far better one being Shakespeare in Love.
It follows Elizabeth, portrayed by a much thinner Cate Blanchett, through
being a princess to being the target of multiple assassination attempts to
eventually marrying herself to England.
     I will grant the film a point of merit on the account that, in my four
years of work as a film critic, I have never once watched a political
thriller set in the 16th century.  I will also grant it a few kudos on
performances, on costumes, on lighting, cinematography, and rather skilled
direction all together.  But, please, Best Picture?
     Normally, when viewing the nominations for the awards, some of them
(i.e. Sound F/Xs Editing and Special F/Xs) have only three nominees, three
films which were judged to be the best.  Why can't they do Best Picture the
same way?  This year we deserved tie between Saving Private Ryan,
Shakespeare in Love, and Life is Beautiful, three excellent films that all
equally deserved the prize.  However, as our shoo-in nominations we gave The
Thin Red Line, a nod (which it didn't deserve, although I maintain my
support of the film) and we also gave Elizabeth a tap on the shoulder.
     I can understand The Thin Red Line.  For one, it is a much better film.
For two, it was directed by Terrance Malick, a man who is the J.D. Salinger
(or Thomas Pynchon, if you prefer the truly postmodernist trend) of
filmmaking.  Here is a person who hasn't made a film in 20 years and still
hasn't lost his touch.  Counter this with the Shekhar Kapur, a man who has
never made a film I have heard about much less seen.  Not to say that a
first major work of a director isn't always a bad thing (i.e. David Lynch,
Jim Jarmush, Kevin Smith, Gus Van Sant), but please make it something that
just doesn't ride Hollywood's latest binge of the costume drama.
     I am not saying, mark you, that the film was bad.  Far from it, it is
actually one of the best films of the last year that I saw, but let us
contrast this with the concept that, in order for a film to be nominated for
Best Picture, it should display a mastery, not a plain old good job, of all
aspects of filmmaking.  Elizabeth, although featuring outstanding
performances, falters on storyline.  Were this political thriller set in
modern day, with the same performances, I would review it terribly.
However, it is not.
     Elizabeth does have certain interesting qualities, which are the only
aspects that make the film enjoyable.  For one, it displays a brilliantly
dark character in Geoffrey Rush's portrayal of Sir Francis Walsingham, a
cold-blooded killer.  Christopher Eccleston similarly gives an excellent
performance of the `villain' of the film, although with a movie like
Elizabeth, Mr. Hyde would seem like a nice guy.
     The biggest flaws in the film are very simple, and the same mistake
that A Perfect Murder made: all of the characters are so utterly unlikable
that the story has no hold over you.  Even knowing the ending (based on
history), I personally wanted Elizabeth to get killed.  It's not bad acting:
the acting was great.  It's bad parts.
     I will spend my last little bit complaining about the writer.  The
writer, a no one named Michael Hirst, will be completely forgotten after
this review.  Aside from people like Stephen Zallian, no one knows who
writes the movies, and thus this man will be forever forgotten for taking a
movie that had excellent potential and sinking it like a submarine in
`Battleship.'

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/4cfe62b59fbbd38b8825687c002b92c0?OpenDocument
Produced by Cathy Konrad, Marrianne Maddalena, Kevin Williamson
Starring Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Patrick Dempsey,
Scott Foley, Lance Henrikson, Parker Posey, Emily Mortimer, Liev
Schreiber, and Deon Richmond
 Normally, as a critic, we are exempt from the cost of seeing a movie.
Normally, we get in for absolute zero when we attend a press screener of
a film.  However, since Dimension, for what appear to be highly
mysterious (and controversial) reasons, cancelled the screener of Scream
3 I had to pay.
 I saw this film in a theatre with about 700 other people, and the place
was full to overflowing.  Watching Scream 3 was reminiscent of watching
a full-blown cult screening of The Rocky Horror Picture Show.  People
were dressed in full Mr. Ghost Face regalia (albeit without the knife),
and the audience clapped, cheered, jeered, and chanted at practically
every moment of the film.
 To imagine the theatre I was in, imagine the theatre in the first ten
minutes of Scream 2, remove the homicide, and multiply by ten.
 In a lot of ways, seeing the movie in such a setting is probably for
the best: I would have felt like such a silly ass loudly rooting for the
killer in front of the rest of Cleveland's press contingent.  My
generation was raised on slasher flicks: they're our genre and our
domain, and seeing Scream 3 with people of my generation was a
refreshing switch from eating Thai food at the Ceder Lee cinemas with
the rest of the critics.
 Of course, it wasn't just the overwhelmingly `this is campy, and I like
it'-atmosphere that made me enjoy the film Scream 3 wasn't half-bad
either.
 Seeing as Dimension has already handed down their edict up on high from
the Greenwich Village thrones of Bob and Harvey Weinstein that no one
shall tell the details of Scream 3, and since I don't want them to have
an excuse to bar the Internet critics from their next
the-NSA-couldn't-break-this project, I will not tell you much.  What I
will tell you is this.
 Mr. Ghost Face is at it again.  I obviously won't tell you who Mr.
Ghost Face is, only that he has had a few upgrades.  One, he can imitate
people's voices (this is revealed within the first scene), and two, this
guy packs a second knife (not revealed until later, but I thought you
should know).  This time he's killing the cast of Stab 3 in the order in
which they die in the movie.
 Only one problem.  Stab 3 and Scream 3 have comparable security levels,
so Stab 3 has multiple drafts of the script so that no one quite knows
who is going to be next.  Of course, Mr. Ghost Face is going after
whoever is left from the original cast (by now we have whittled it down
to Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Liev Schreiber, and Neve Campbell)
while he is at it.
 By far the campiest of the Scream trilogy, Scream 3 is undeniably fun.
It isn't even structured so that it is guilty pleasure.  It is
structured so that it is following the rules of a sequel, not a trilogy,
and thus everything is much more elaborately planned.  The pace is
quicker, the jokes are funnier, the IQ of the movie drops by at least 20
points.
 Scream 3 chooses as the target of its insults not the horror genre but
the Hollywood system.  Stab 3's cast is wonderfully postmodern (each
person corresponds to a member of the surviving original cast), but
plays its insults to actors, actresses, directors, and producers instead
of to serial killers, shower scenes, axe murderers, and chesty victims.
 Ehren Kruger is able to step into the voice of Kevin Williamson without
missing a beat, but is sadly not quite able to pull off a script without
plot holes.  The biggest thing that Scream 3 has going against it is the
plethora of plot holes that exist in this film.
 In the end of Scream 3, when all is said and done, you are left with
the feeling that you have just roasted marshmallows, made out in a
drive-in, skinny-dipped in the lake, and done all of the other things
that are both incredibly youthful and asking for it should you happen to
find yourself in a serial-killer situation.  The film is youthful.  The
film is Gen-X.  But above all, it's fun, and it doesn't ever pretend to
be anything more.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Dudley Do-Right (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/168141c42ac38421882568580004debb?OpenDocument
 About two years ago I wrote a short story called "Cinemascopia."  The
story envisioned the movie critic's hell as being stuck inside one of
his own reviews.  I revise this.  Hell, for me, would be eternally
watching Dudley Do-Right.
 Dudley Do-Right, a film from Hugh Wilson, the director of Blast from
the Past, is a movie so unbearably stupid that it is an utter insult to
the industry as a whole for it to have even been created.  In Dudley
Do-Right, the title character (Fraser) is pitted against his arch-rival
Snidley Whiplash (Alfred Molina) when the town of Semi-Happy Valley
falls victim to massive consumerism after Whiplash takes over the town
and creates an artificial gold rush by placing gold in the streams.  At
the same time, Whiplash and Do-Right engage in a battle for the
affections of Nell (Sarah Jessica Parker).  This battle includes, but is
not limited to, miniature golf, Indian tribes from Brooklyn, and
paint-by-numbers portraits.
 For those who will say that I should remember the audience of this
film, I will say that I have not grown so old that I have forgotten what
little children laugh at.  Wilson's script tries to be incredibly
highbrow instead of going for the gut jokes that could actually make a
little kid laugh.  Because Hugh Wilson is -- in this critic's opinion --
a gigantic moron, his highbrow material only comes off as pretentious
and unfunny.
It is clear that Hugh Wilson is trying to get parents to laugh with the
entire return of 60s nostalgia which has brought back things like the VW
Bug and George of the Jungle.  It is clear that he is banking that you
will both remember watching the original series and then be overcome by
a massive nostalgia for a television show that you stopped watching
because it was no longer funny.  It is also clear that Hugh Wilson then
will turn around and pander to your four-year-old by inserting several
times where a moose falls down on Do-Right, or a floorboard hits him in
the face.
But what is clear above all about the film is that it is unfunny.  It is
beyond unwatchable.  Dudley Do-Right is the kind of movie that makes me
stop believing in movies.  Dudley Do-Right is the kind of film that
makes you believe that hell is something that could really be torture if
the devil only tried.  Dudley Do-Right is a zero for the genre.
Whatever you do, don't watch Dudley Do-Right.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Written and Directed by Andy Wachowski & Larry Wachowski
Starring Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburn, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe Pantoliano,
Hugo Weaving
    It's about damn time.  The last truly great action film I saw on video
was John Woo's Hard-Boiled.  The last one in theaters Woo's Face\Off.  Sure,
there have been ones in between here and there that I enjoyed, but nothing
that stunned me as completely as did The Matrix.
     No film, including Face\Off and Hard-Boiled has contained such a
complete mastery over all aspects of proper action filmmaking:
well-choreographed shoot-outs, fight scenes.   Hair-raising tension,
psychological and physical.  Special F\Xs that are sure to at least be
nominated for the 1999 Best Visual Effects Academy Award (although they will
definitely end up going to Star Wars: The Phantom Menace).  A plot that's...
wait a second... plot's not supposed to be part of an action movie?
     But, in The Matrix, it is.  A formula is not employed per se.  What is
actually employed is dozens of formulas, a hybrid that becomes so original
on the merit of combining things never combined before.
     The Matrix is a marriage of science-fiction, kung-fu, and shoot-em-up,
much like 1997's Dark City was a marriage of science-fiction, film noir, and
mystery.  Perhaps it is best to describe the plot in similar terms.  Like
Dark City, The Matrix deals in false realties layered one over the other.
     As you may have heard, it focuses around a world where Artificial
Intelligence is the dominant life form.  We, in the words of the movie, are
equivalent to their Duracels.  We generate power and heat for them to run
on, and, as their paying us back in spades, we become part of a complex
virtual reality called The Matrix.  There, I've told you more than any other
critic will tell you, but only because that is the simple part of the story.
     Like many movies that the newborn production company Village Roadshow
peddles, its plot does sound so used and ludicrous that one would wonder how
it could possibly ever be good.  For those who have seen it, I will remind
them of Analyze This, from about two months ago, which has an equally used
plot and still ended up being a pretty good movie.
     The Matrix is the second film by brothers Andy & Larry Wachowski, who
previously released the overlooked crime thriller Bound, which, if you can
accept a few liberal aspects, is a wonderful yarn to rent.  It is to these
people that the acclaim should be sent.  Admittedly, Fishburn and Reeves
(who both had fairly disastrous encounters with science fiction in the form
of Event Horizon and Johnny Neumonic, respectively) give fine performances,
but the fraternal duo deserves most of the credit.  As they have adeptly
demonstrated, they have the golden touch.  They are able to turn rags to
riches, garbage to gold.  They have the lacking ingredient in the modern
director: an ability to actually tell a story that is enjoyable.
     Like they did with Bound, they littered the script with countless
references to items within the genre.  Bound, a crime film, did The
Godfather, Casino, and countless others.  The Matrix inserts references to
Virus, Dune, Terminator 2, Dark City, Blade Runner, Total Recall, and just
about every other sci-fi film, cult or popular.  It is my personal belief,
perhaps biased by respect for the authors of this film, that they have done
this as a way of saying: hey, we have a story to tell, so listen and we'll
entertain.
     The Wachowskis prove themselves once again as excellent storytellers:
masters of the screen but very conscious of the audience's desire for some
pulp.  The Matrix, as is Bound, is both great story and great pulp.   To
screw around with the slogan of Nike: Just See It.

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
Is it just me, or did Cinderella used to be a lot NICER?
Directed by Andy Tennant (Fools Rush In)
Written by Susannah Grant (Pocahontas)
Starring Drew Barrymore (The Wedding Singer), Anjelica Huston (The Grifters)
I guess its women's lib and now that I've gone and said that, all the women
liberals I know will hunt me down and kill me, so this may be my final
review. I guess its women's lib that's made this new version of Cinderella,
and I guess its women's lib that decided to put America's sweetheart who's
only good-roles-was-getting-hacked-in-"Scream" and rubbing noses with
aliens. And I'd also guess its women's lib that tried to make all under the
Hollywood blanket of pop-culture while retaining a complete stranglehold on
all of the balance that SHOULD be in the film. And it makes sense that it'd
be women's lib: after all, women are they're audience.
Yes, it's the latest trite little chick flick to hit the screen, set 500
years in the past yet still having a female main character who gets to
overshadow everybody, say all the good lines, give all the coy smiles,
deliver the punchlines, and endear herself to the audience of women who are
nestling their heads in the nearest barely awake man. Thus is my MOVIE
WARNING: DO NOT BE ALARMED IF YOU HEAR SNORES DURING THE COURSE OF THIS
FILM.
Although it clocks in at about 2 hours, it feels like 6. The story itself
takes a fairy tale that was bearable and makes it unbearable, drawing it out
further and further like a little hair before PLUCK it snaps, taking your
mind along with it. The fairy tale we all know: Cinderella. The twist we all
know: a Cinderella that can hit a moving target with an apple at ten years,
expertly fence, read classics, give a mean left hook and still have time to
check for dirt underneath her nails.
Girl's you have your little hero-girl of the month to look up to. Guys be
warned, this is a chick flick, bring your walkman, tune to the latest
Pirates game, sit back, close your eyes, and go to sleep. But guys: don't
forget your batteries.

Title
Review for Mostro, Il (1994)
Written by Roberto Benigni, Michel Blanc, and Vincenzo Cerami
Starring Roberto Benigni, Michel Blanc, Nicolette Braschi, and Franco
Mescolini
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 I suppose that the problem with subtitled films is one of being literary.
Sure, you can watch intelligent films until the cows come home, but the
passerby on CNN's "Showbiz Today" said it best when he said "I don't like to
read when I go to movies."
 The fact is that most people don't like to read anymore.  I am highly
unusual in my affinity for the written word (I not only read books, but
write them as a hobby), in my love of conversation as an art form.  A small
percentage of America likes that.  This is the latter half of the 20th
century.  The information age where the only things that we like to read
anymore are WebPages.  Our stories are told to us through movies.  Our book
reports are done courtesy of Cliffs (who, don't ask me why, did
"Slaughterhouse Five", one of the easiest reads ever).
 Who really blames anyone nowadays for having "subtitle-itis?"  I have a
friend who wouldn't see Life is Beautiful until his editor demanded it, and
he's a critic.  Perhaps this is partially because we have this association
in our minds with subtitles being "high brow" and "intellectual" films that,
much to my personal pity, the general public is not interested in.  Perhaps
it is just because literacy has been shelved.
 Kurt Vonnegut said in "Slapstick" that in 20 years there would be
scribes -- a select few which would be able to read and write -- once again.
Of course, that book was written more than 20 years ago, but who cares?
 Back to the subject of "subtitle-itis", this new epidemic has existed for
years.  We have this expectation that we don't have to read more than a few
notes when we go to movies.  Hell, some people have a problem that
Trainspotting didn't get dubbed into American English because of heavy
Edinburgh accents.  The subtitle translates to the average person as a stay
away sign because it means that they'll actually have to use their brains at
a time when they normally wouldn't.  Not to mention the films that people
associate with being translated are the ones that are touchy-feely stories
without any macho lines.
 To address this I offer a film review and a factoid.  The factoid, for guys
who think foreign films have nothing to offer them, is that 1939's Ecstasy,
with Hedy Lamar, was the first film to feature nudity.  So there.  The film
review is that of 1994's Il Monstro (The Monster), an Italian sex-comedy
from the director of Life is Beautiful.
 Loris (Roberto Benigni) is a short con man who does odd jobs and slacks off
on his maintenance bill.  Through a mishap with thinking an old lady is a
nymphomaniac and a later mishap with a chainsaw going out of control, Loris
becomes suspected of being Il Monstro, the serial killer stalking the
streets of the city.  An obsessed detective assigns Jessica (Nicholetta
Braschi) to trap him by using her... charms to catch him red handed.  As put
by the detective, "we need to trap his hand in the cookie jar, and one of
you needs to be the cookie."
 Almost as childish as There's Something About Mary, I can assure you that
there is absolutely zilch that is high brow or ultra-intelligent about Il
Monstro.  It's childish, it's fun, and you can get it without understanding
a single word of Italian... well, maybe not the third part but you still
don't have to use your brain all that much.
 For those who didn't want to be depressed by the Holocaust in Life is
Beautiful, Il Monstro is the Roberto Benigni film you should check out.
It's a guaranteed cure for "subtitle-itis."


Title
Review for Kicking and Screaming (1995)
Written and Directed by Noah Baumbach
Story by Noah Baumbach and Oliver Berkman
Starring Josh Hamilton, Sam Gould, Catherine Kellner, Eric Stoltz, Olivia
d'Abo, Christopher Eigeman, and Parker Posey
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The question that one is immortally faced with as a critic is one of
personal interpretation.  You see a movie and it could be taken one of two
or more ways, often making the difference between a completely terrible film
and a great literary document.
 In a more outlandish example we had 1997's Starship Troopers, a film that
could very well be viewed as an anti-fascist document and a representation
of Nazism.  However, with exuberantly high and seemingly useless body count,
Starship Troopers got a bad review from me on the account that it was your
standard-edition, boring-as-anything, action film.
 There were people who took Starship Troopers in just this aspect, said that
it was a great film, and had a points so good that they could not be
logically countered.
 Similarly, we are faced with the 1995 film Kicking and Screaming, which was
said to do for college what Dazed and Confused did for high school.  Yes,
it's undeniably funny.  Yes, its dialogue is so razor sharp that it cuts
through any obstacle and right into your funny bone.
 But the problem is that, in the method it is done, one would expect a huge
point to come at the end of it.  Sadly, it doesn't.  It is one of those
films that does not end, only stops dead in its tracks.
 Were this just any film with just any apparent point of illustration I
would decry the pointlessness of the movie simply stopping and leave it as
just a mildly entertaining movie.  But here's the rub: Kicking and Screaming
is an illustration of the directionless nature of post-college life.
 As far as plot goes, that's just about it.  Grover (Josh Hamilton) is
trying to get over Jane (Olivia d'Abo), who went to Prague.  Max
(Christopher Eigeman) is trying to decide where to go in love and life after
a basically useless philosophy degree, but ends up just spending time
sleeping with freshmen.  Chet (Eric Stoltz) is trying to finally work his
way to a degree but is content to merely be a student.
 The ending of Kicking and Screaming, which doesn't even have a fade out
(the credits just suddenly start), could be viewed as an illustration of the
lack of direction that the characters have.  However, it could also just be
viewed as a bad ending... an anticlimax.
 The movie is able to pull its weight with an incredibly witty repartee
throughout the 96-minute running time, but is unable to go beyond the point
of just jokes.  Were this from the studio world, which is strictly a
business and is more for love of money than trying to do art, I could
understand and write the lack of a good ending on script doctors who are
only good with good lines, but instead this is what is called "an
Independent masterpiece."
 To me this spells a slight bit of hypocrisy on behalf of the viewing
public.  If someone were willing to patron and love Kicking and Screaming on
the merit of repartee alone, than, by that argument, great one-liners would
make a great film.  On this same line of logic, a movie with great action
sequences is a great film.
 You could subdivide and say that a movie with great dialogue makes a great
independent film, but that would be another cop-out.  Studio films may not
always have great dialogue, but neither do Independents.  In fact, the only
difference I have ever discerned between Studio films and Independents
(budget aside) is that most Independent films could not successfully be
pitched to studios.
 Perhaps I am seeing this all wrong.  Perhaps pointlessness being the point
is something that has just flown over my head this time.  But, you know
what, if someone has to wonder if you have a point or are just out for cash,
you didn't do a good job.

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
There comes a point in any critic's life when he is watching a movie and
finds himself naming people from the cast and crew from their habits. At
that point, they realize that they have seen way too many movies and are
quickly losing all that's left of their minds. Myself, I reached that point
during the peacemaker when I realized who had done the music to it without
even looking at the credits (Hans Zimmer of "The Rock" and "Crimson Tide").
That was the high point of that movie.
The Peacemaker is a film about terrorism, about a psycho with a bomb with an
intent to blow up Manhattan (woulda done the world some good). Where have we
seen this one before? George Clooney of "ER" and "From Dusk 'till Dawn" is
the star power of this movie, acting opposite to Nicole Kidman, and the
roles they play are so stereotypical that its insane. Clooney plays the
good-guy rambo type bent on saving the world (with the modern twist of
actually having a brain beneath that thick skull) and Kidman plays the woman
who is just trying to save the world while salvaging her latest failed
romance. Be still my lunch.
The film does have its good points, the action scenes are well done (which
comprise most of the movie) but they have the tendency to drag on a little
longer than necessary. Again another try at getting a good movie. Again
another failure. Rent it on a rainy day.

Title
Review for Dropping Out (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/ab14e15ef3d6cbf5882568b7000c4a22?OpenDocument
Starring Kent Osborne, David Koechner, Vince Vieluf, Adam Arkin, John
Stamos, Katie Segal, Fred Willard, Doug Savant, Jennifer Elise Cox
 Emile (Kent Osborne) is a pretty humble guy.  He just wants one simple
thing out of his life: for it to be just as picture-perfect as the TV.
The opiate of the masses known as television is Emile's drug of choice
as he wanders through the world of the nicotine-stained San Fernando
Valley.  Everything is, as in the television, just fine and dandy until
one day a squirrel lands on Emile's cable, disconnecting it.  So,
confronted with an absolute dearth of television reception, Emile
decides to slit his wrists.
 From there on in, we enter into one of the funniest and most meaningful
dark comedies since Happiness.  You see; Emile's suicide attempt is
interrupted by a call from the manager of a hotel, at which Emile begins
to work the night shift.  One night, after the local supermarket is out
of chicken potpies, Emile announces to Henry (David Koechner), his
co-worker, that he wants to commit suicide.  He also requests that Henry
will send the tape to Emile's ex-girlfriend and clean up after the act.
 Henry decides to bring in Andrew , a Hollywood wannabe to help him with
the mess, only to discover that Emile has repeatedly flubbed what he
wanted to say to his girlfriend.  Andrew, upon looking at these flubs,
begins turning Emile's suicide into a full blown documentary.  Pretty
soon, everyone is in on it.  The entire hotel staff has quit their jobs
to be on the production crew of the film.  A major Hollywood studio has
signed on to pay for trailers for Emile and the crew not to mention
provide 35mm cameras (rather than Mini-DV, the format that Andrew had
originally been using).
 Of course, since Emile's entire desire to end his life was because his
life wasn't like the movies, Emile must now deal with the desire to
live and his so-called friends' reactions if he does.
 Premise alone could carry this movie to side splitting laughter from a
college or teenager target audience, and premise serves to provide for
some of the darkest lowbrow comedy I have ever seen (i.e. Henry draws a
diagram on the correct way to slit one's wrists while Emile helps a
terrified hotel patron check out), but the script has some more
surprises in store for us.
The film takes every opportunity to scathe the Hollywood system, to
boost the power of the Independent revolution, and to take on America's
obsession with fake reality (better known as `reality based television
shows').  The maxim `if it bleeds, it leads' is especially prevalent
when, at one point, the studio pressures Andrew to ensure that Emile
actually not only goes through with the suicide, but also provides
Andrew with a gun for Emile to use.
Beyond this absolute mastery over the narrative, director Mark Osborne
(who did the Academy-Award nominated short More) serves up a technically
brilliant film.  Making use of the same tactics as Blue Velvet and
Happiness, Osborne over-lights sequences in which Emile imagines his
television world in order to make them especially removed from reality,
and then under-lights the `reality' so that it takes on a
nicotine-stained quality.  He switches from slow-motion to regular time
with absolute ease, giving the impression at times that we are watching
an extremely sick and twisted version of a Nuclear family TV show.
The fact of the matter is that Dropping Out is one of those films so
absolutely great that everything you end up saying is either clichéd or
repetitive.  The performances were great.  The direction was great.  The
script was great.  The entire damn film was great.  It is a must-see.
It is brilliant.  It is all of the other spiels that a critic says when
they are forced to make blurbs and sound intelligent, and when all they
really want to do is convince someone to go and see it.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
This is what everyone's been waiting for, a movie that's funny, scary,
brilliant, and has a message at the same time. Enough blaming of the movies
to satisfy the Christian Coalition. Enough creative one-liners to make
anyone laugh. Enough black comedy to have us all forget the body count. And
enough corn syrup (fake blood) to satisfy even the wackiest of gore-hounds.
SCREAM has something for everyone.
What is it? Not a horror movie or a comedy, or even a dark comedy, but a
cross-over between all of these, incorporating parodies with fright,
brilliant cinema with purposefully terrible acting. A human element that
rubs off as so surreal in context that its almost laughable. And characters
you will never forget.
The plot is that of any slasher movie from 1970 onward, put in the words of
Neve Campbell in the line "What's the point? They're all the same: some
stupid killer stalking some big-breasted girl who can't act who's always
running up the stairs when she should be going out the front door..."
What's worse is all of this happens to the characters, making for a darkly
comic in an Edward Scisscorhand's type fashion, making you laugh in
hindsight. And then there are Randy's (the movie-freaked mind that may or
nay not have lost its reality base) rules to surviving a scary movie: all
both followed and broken.
What's the best thing? The mystery. This movie doesn't just slice and dice,
telling you who the killer is right off the bat, but instead waits until the
end to explain it all, and has fun every step of the way. Sit back, relax,
enjoy, and throw your popcorn into the air as the knife comes up one to
slice through the air as the person is to be silenced in one final SCREAM.

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Its been how long since I've seen something like this? Well over a year.
After all, it was about when I moved here a year and a week or so ago when I
last viewed my copy of Silence of the Lambs, and got down to the business of
being challenged on a psychological level. Wait, no. I watched Heat a few
weeks after that, and THAT is the last movie that even measures up to The
Negotiator.
F.Gary Gray (director, "Set it Off") was actually trying to match (in
character chemistry and psychological suspense) "Heat", the Michael Mann
crime saga in which it was plainly stated that, in the game of cops and
robbers, there are no bad guys. In this film, however, there ARE bad guys:
just none of them are the main characters. Not to say they're angels no
way. The film dances in the namesake of the director: the Gray.
The plot is simple nothing out of the ordinary that we haven't seen: Clean
Cop A (Samuel L. Jackson) is a star man on the force, but is still falsely
accused of murder, so he tries to bring in Cop B (Kevin Spacey) to clear his
name, while Cops C and D don't believe him, and IAD Cop E (The final
performance of J.T. Walsh) is downright psychotic about getting him pinned
with the murder. One difference in this one, though: he decides to get
nasty, screw having us sit through a length legal movie or the standard cop
investigation, and takes four hostages in the IAD department in a federal
building. (at last, DEVIATION FROM THE NORM!).
OK, down to the review. I went to see the movie at about 10, and, with
movies that late, I sometimes end up just falling into that trance between
asleep and awake that happens when you watch Nascar for 6 hours on end. Not
this time, not this movie. No way, no how. To put it in a tidbit sentence
The Negotiator is an edge of your seat psychological thriller, with razor
sharp suspense, intense action, and enough raw thrill to let me quit coffee
for a week (and with all the coffee and cappuccinos I drink, that's one huge
thrill.)
I said earlier that Armageddon was the best summer movie. I hate to say this
more than anything as a critic, and this is twice that I've done this since
I've been reviewing here, but this time I'm sure: THIS is THE summer movie
of the year. And it's THE crime drama of the year (unless they come out with
an LA Confidential sequel or adapt another Elmore Leonard, which somehow I
doubt). And it's THE cop movie of the year (unless above conditions are
met). And it's THE  well  you get the point. SEE IT.

Title
Review for Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977)
Around a quarter century ago, a nerdy little kid fresh off the success
of some shark movie decided he wanted to turn his focus to little green
men.  And somehow he turned out one of those rare films that imprints
itself into the cultural psyche so far as to be able to be referenced by
just about anyone (whether they've seen it or not).
But just in case you really are from another planet and have no clue
just what the hell I'm talking about, the year was 1977, the director
was Steven Spielberg, and the movie was Close Encounters of the Third
Kind.  Per the film, there are three kinds of alien contact, two of
which nobody really cares about.  The third kind is the close, personal
relationship forged between man and alien when a person gets abducted...
and, well, that's the focus of most of this film.
Roy Neary (Richard Dreyfuss) starts out as an angry father in a job he
doesn't seem to care for all that much, all of which is changed when
some friendly aliens give him a sunburn and give his town a lightshow
that puts concert pyrotechnics to shame.  This experience makes Roy a
little off-kilter; he begins sculpting shapes he's never seen, having
the feeling that he should be going somewhere soon.
In the meantime Claude Lacombe (François Truffaut) is going about the
globe picking up planes and ships that disappeared a half century ago,
and he finds them in the middle of the desert, to boot.  And with
mysterious fly-bys happening to modern day aircraft around the world...
well we don't need rocket scientists to figure out what's going on.
Close Encounters is really such a simple movie that it doesn't warrant a
helluva lot of discussion.  Were it not able to hit our cultural
pressure points so well, it probably would have faded off the of
cinematic map -- but Spielberg is nothing if not adept at punching our
buttons and making us puppets in his hands, and Close Encounters is no
exception.  While, storywise and on filmmaking levels, Close Encounters
might not be the greatest film ever, I'll be damned if when you're
watching the aliens communicate through music, you don't feel like it
is.
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producer: Julia Phillips, Michael Phillips
Writer: Steven Spielberg
Starring: Richard Dreyfuss, François Truffaut, Teri Garr, Melinda Dillon
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Starring Wesley Snipes (US Marshals), Stephen Dorff (City of Industry), Kris
Kristofferson
(Lone Star), N'Bushe Wright (Dead Presidents)
Who knew? Who knew that there was a brain beneath the thick skull of Wesley
Snipes, able to not only produce, but to choreograph? And good God can he
choreograph a fight scene. I haven't seen such elaborate ones since the John
Woo cult action Hard-Boiled (which, sadly, you must experience subtitles in
order to enjoy). I came into the lobby of the theatre with 0 expectation,
and, after being cajoled and told how great it was by one of the workers
(talk to them, people, they're good conversation), figured it might not be
so bad.
The film, based on a Marvel comic book, is about a half human, half vampire
(his mother was attacked while in labor) who psychotic evil vampire Stephen
Dorff (did he get the role in the Ray Ban commercial after the role in Blade
or visa-versa?) needs in order to become a vampire god. Check this guy out,
he looks psychotic off the bat.
It grabs you in the opening credits, showing a particularly graphic picture
of an innocent man taken into a nightclub full of vampires dancing to techno
music, then cascading into an excellent fight scene in which Blade
dispatches most all of them. If you have a hard stomach, it's a treat and
worth it.
It's not without its bad points. Like most action movies, it still needs
lines that any one of us would ever say in our right minds, characters we
can attach to, and victims we care about. But, wait a sec, this is a
hard-core action flick we're talking about. To hell with having a brain it
was FUN!

Title
Review for Joe Gould's Secret (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c0d6e455b2f67551882568ca005e094f?OpenDocument
Produced by Beth Alexander and Stanley Tucci
Starring Ian Holm, Stanley Tucci, Patricia Clarkson, Hope Davis, Steve
Martin, and Susan Sarandon
 When Mel Brooks played the Louis XVI in The History of the World, Part
I, he often commented, `It's good to be the King.'  Joe Gould, a
voluntarily homeless man, thinks that it's good to be the Bum and it
shows.
 Joe Gould spends his days in Greenwich Village, making notes on the
subject of humanity.  He is compiling an oral history of mankind, a
series of transcripts of conversations and essays on the nature of man.
He does this by writing at every opportunity in composition books and by
mooching off of rich Beatniks during the 50s in New York City.  Amongst
his supporters: painter Alice Neel (Susan Sarandon), E.E. Cummings,
gallery owner Vivian Marquie (Patricia Clarkson) and publishing
executive Charlie Duell (Steve Martin).  These supporters frequently
allow Joe Gould to stay at their homes, as well as contribute small sums
of money to the Joe Gould fund.
 One day, Gould catches the attention of a New Yorker writer from North
Carolina, Joe Mitchell (Stanley Tucci), who writes an article about Mr.
Gould in his magazine, and, by consequence, is forced into the role of
being Gould's best friend.
 Per one's expectations from such a bizarre plot, Joe Gould's Secret
proves to be blessed by being funny, mildly touching, and highly in
touch with the Beatnik atmosphere that was prevalent in New York during
the 50s.  The flip side to this coin is that Joe Gould's Secret is
cursed by being somewhat corny, slightly melodramatic, and very
pretentious (as most of the Beatniks were).  Holm will launch into a
hilarious speech one second and a soliloquy the next.  Tucci will be a
serious journalist one minute and a recovering hick the next.
 The movie simply cannot make up its mind.
 Holm (The Sweet Hereafter) acts up a storm, per his usual.  Tucci, with
his trench coat and newsman's hat, looks like he used his wardrobe from
Winchell.  Sarandon is bland, as is Martin, who appears briefly in this
movie seemingly only to prove that The Spanish Prisoner was not a
fluke.  Tucci's own work behind the camera is decent, but, as is par for
the film, is not noteworthy.  Big Night it ain't.
 Joe Gould's secret really isn't that hard to figure out, but the film
is entertaining enough that it doesn't quite head down that road to
being terrible.  Thus figuring Joe Gould's secret is like the crossword
in the New York Post.  You'll finish it, but its so easy that it's a
sort of hollow victory.  But hey, at least you had fun.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Starring Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, and Chazz Plamantari
     We've seen it before.  We've seen Bobby DeNiro as a gangster in
Godfather, Part II, in countless Martin Scorcese films, as Al Capone in The
Untouchables.  But, what we haven't seen before is the humor.  Never before
has Robert DeNiro tried to parody himself, to make fun of his own standards
and stereotypes.  Sure, we don't get a parody of the monologue from Taxi
Driver (`You talkin' to me?'), but we get a steady does of mob film spoofs,
including a shot-by-shot parody of The Godfather.
     Harold Ramis takes the helm of this risky project about the original
risky business.  Paul Viti (Robert DeNiro) is a mobster with issues.  His
best friend has just been killed, and, to be honest, he's conflicted about
being his harsh old self.  He's having panic attacks, he's not willing to
beat information out of someone.  Let's face it, it's crimpin his style.
So, taking advantage of  a run-in (literally, Billy Crystal hits the back of
a sedan with a person on his way to be killed in it) with psychiatrist Ben
Sobol, he starts going to a shrink.
     Sobol is just your garden-variety shrink, leaning a little too much
towards the `Fraiser' side.  His son's a smart Alec, his fiancée (Kudrow) is
a bimbo.  He listens to the problems of neurotics all day long.  Of course,
when a gangster steps in the door, everything changes.
     Viti starts following him everywhere.  He becomes his only client
because he need to have a therapeutic breakthrough before a meeting of the
heads of all the families in two weeks.
     The fact is, though, that we have seen this before.  This was the plot
of The Don's Analyst, with Robert Loggia.  It's also the plot of the HBO
Series The Sopranos.  However, Analyze This does it's job much better than
The Don's Analyst, which was dry and unfunny, ever could.
     Despite the fact that the script was plagued by last-minute rewrites
and a director who's only product that I've seen and respected was the
moderately creative (although now hackneyed) Groundhog's Day, it actually
doesn't seem as openly contrived.  It does its job: mix humor with a serious
plot fairly well, and it's fun to see Robert DeNiro break into tears at a
Prudential commercial.  Robert DeNiro, too, does his job.  He turns out a
performance that's good for him, a man who has won two academy awards and
is one of America's finest living actors.
     The real disappointment in the film, despite a lack of originality in
plot is Billy Crystal.  Crystal turns out a lackluster performance as the
psychiatrist, and seems to merely sit around and be glad he landed a role
with DeNiro at all.  He delivers a few good scenes, such as the one where he
tries to act like the consillieri.  Lisa Kurdrow also does a good job as the
bimbo fiancée.
     As I've said, there aren't that many holes in the script.  One little
thing that bothers me is that, considering how much Kudrow seems to hate
Crystal, she ends up with everything honky-dory with him at the end.  Once
again, idiotic characters are constructed, but that's the price that is paid
for a funny movie, and it is a funny movie.
     Analyze This isn't really quality cinema, but it's fun.  It's fun to
see people parody themselves.  It's fun to watch someone admit that they've
been doing to same part for so long (albeit, doing it great).  It's also fun
to watch this film, and is one definitely worth heading out to the theatre
to see.

Title
Review for Firestorm (1998)
Being a critic is like having a Ph.D. in Theology, you are constantly
questioning everything you've every known about your field of study. As a
Ph.D. would wonder about the particular meaning of a bible verse and if it
does or does not mean transubstantiation is real or not, I wonder, seeing a
particular movie, why such trash is turned out by the movie industry day
after day after day.
I find myself sitting in movie theater after movie theater, staring
mindlessly at mindless movies that depress me further and further because
they are so idiotic that no one should have written the story in the first
place. They are ideas that should have never been thought up, things which
should have never been created, like the IRS or the KKK. Movies like
"Firestorm", something that has no purpose whatsoever as a film, makes me
wonder "why?" more than any other type of film.
To give you an idea of what the worth of it is, I'll go through the basics.
The first thing we can cross off our possible list is quality; the film was
one of the poorest quality films I've ever seen, with people tripping over
lines, faking Canadian accents that sound more like something out of
"Fargo", and embarking on a Sierra-Club like mission to save the birds.
The next thing to go kaput is merit as an action movie. Watching the screen,
for myself and, I think, the entire movie theater, was like sitting through
a foreign film without subtitles, or, worse, like a college lecture in a
subject you hate. As each person was killed, as each thing happened, at
least one member of the audience groaned. The special effects were no star
at all, mustering all the realism of cardboard cutouts for a TV movie. And,
the saddest merit that a film can ever offer as its sole bit (being able to
connect people to Kevin Bacon in six steps or less), won't help anybody...
the only person who's in, or worked on, this movie that anyone would
remotely recognize is Scott Glenn, and he plays a bit part.
I propose something for you viewers. If you're bored, why as why?, Don't see
"Firestorm"

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Directed by Jerimah S. Chechick (Diabolique)
Starring: Ralph Finnes (The English Patient), Uma Thurman (Pulp Fiction),
Sean Connery (The Rock)
There's a little kid in all of us. My little kid is kept under triple locks
with a contingent of Marine guards with Bowie's, .45's, and M-16's outside.
Dressed in a straight jacket, banging itself against the padded walls of the
back of my mind, it has a desperate little voice screaming to be released.
To have fun, to wreak havoc with swordplay and find a friend to play cowboys
and Indians with. My inner child recent found a cohort to free it, and a
friend to play with, in the new release The Avengers.
Based upon a sixties TV, book, and film series (like last year's boring The
Saint), The Avengers is a spy film with a twist-- It goes for the gut of the
other spy films. I went into the theatre, and I wasn't looking for something
intelligent. I wasn't looking for something smartly scripted or original. I
wasn't even looking for something that has less cheese than a Green Bay fan
in January. No. I was looking for fun. And fun was what I received.
The Avengers is a spy movie that has a psychotic lemon twist and a cherry on
top, leaving you a bit shaken AND stirred by the rough 90 minutes of
havoc-wreaking fun. To surmise a plot in the regular equation style: Bad Guy
(Sean Connery), steals the machine of Sexy Scientist (Uma Thurman), which,
by the way, can control the weather, and Secret Agent (Ralph Finnes) has to
get it back. Oh, yeah, did I mention we've got a backdrop cast of characters
who leave you laughing by their names alone (i.e. Mother, the handicapped
man in charge of the super-secret agency "The Ministry", and his blind
female counterpart "Father").
Stick in a few action scenes and you've got your core audience hooked. But
the thing is, it takes you on a wild ride not with its action, which it
delivers in semi-modest quantities, but in its psychotic, surreal humor.
Ranging from evil villains dressed in teddy bear suits to helicopter bugs
half the size of a Volvo with machine guns and missile launchers, the events
rival the oddball characters in their bittersweet fun. It's cheese, but,
thank God, it's different cheese.

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
I swear, if I weren't such an incurable romantic I would hate all the movies
out there. Yes, I'll admit I loved "The English Patient" more than life
itself, and yes, I would see a romantic comedy over a B-rate action flick
any day of the week. Those are the reasons I forgave the shortcomings of
Great Expectations.
The movie in and of itself is an attempt to be artsy, a loose modernization/
adaptation of the Dickens classic (which I hate), with almost every
character re-named and remoded into whatever fits. With Pip renamed as Finn
and re-casted as an artist and Robert de Niro taking on the role of the
felon Magwitch, re-dubbed Lusting. The only thing seemingly kept the same is
the basics, the name Estella for Finn's lifelong love, and the basic Marxist
theme to the entirety of it.
It basically succeeds as an artsy film, making a appealing version of the
classic, but the re-naming of the characters, the choppy dialogue and the
write-your-script-in-a-three-day-weekend contest winner script make a
complete lack of appeal. Go ahead and see it, you probably will find
yourself enjoying the movie. But, whatever you do, don't try to watch the
movie to do that book report.

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
Written and Directed by Mark S. Waters
Based on the stage play by Wendy MacLeod
Starring Parker Posey, Josh Hamilton, Tori Spelling, Freddie Prinze Jr.,
Genevieve Bujold and Rachel Leigh Cook
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 It has often been said that films are like drugs.  Let us expand upon this
and say that films, in fact, are drugs of sorts.  Not in the line that they
are completely addictive and that one will begin to need a sort of Methadone
to ween off of them but instead that they are drugs along the lines of
caffeine.  That each different type of movie is akin to a different type of
coffee.
 With this in mind, an analysis of dark comedies is possible.  Dark comedies
are triple-espressos drunk at two in the afternoon when your not tired but
are already wired.  In short, they are strong, biting, and only for the few
that are immune to the residual effects.
 The House of Yes is extreme even for the realm of dark comedy.  It is one
part British parlor drama, one part My Dinner with Andre with a sense of
humor, and one part psychological thriller.
 The Pascal house is one of those upper-crust homes outside of Washington
where the neighborhood was born rich and will die rich.  They live next door
to the Kennedy's and feel a perpetual envy towards that group.  They spend
time being the last bastion of American royalty: the blue blood rich.
 On Thanksgiving, 1983, 20 years after the assassination of JFK, the Pascal
family has gathered for their Thanksgiving holiday in the midst of a
hurricane.  On the regular roster of invitations are the three full-time
residential Pascals, mother (Genevieve Bujold), little brother Anthony
(Freddie Prinze Jr.) and older sister Jackie-O (Parker Posey).  Coming back
from his home in New York City is Marty (Josh Hamilton).  Marty has brought
along his fiancée Lesly (Tori Spelling), a blue collar to their blue blood
who was born in Pennsylvania and works as a waitress at a Doughnut King.
 Of course, as with all families of blue blood we have the hidden secrets.
Begin with the fact that Jackie-O is insane.  So insane, in fact, that she
wore a Pink Chanel suit with fake blood and brains on it to the Ides of
March party after Kennedy was assassinated.  One could normally write this
off as a morbid sense of humor combined with a complete lack of tack and
presence of bad taste, but Jackie-O's madness goes far beyond that.  In the
opening frames she begins obsessing over the aesthetic difference in hair
brushed with a comb and brushed with a brush, so you can tell she ain't
playing with a full deck of marbles.
 Like The Ice Storm, the whether serves as an appropriate backdrop to the
situation.  As the hurricane approaches the eye, the situation gets worse
and worse.  When the storm has finally passed, the movie is over.
 This serves as an example of the weakest aspect of the movie, which is
surprisingly the direction and not the presence of Tori Spelling, which for
once strengthens the film.  All of the performances are top-notch with the
exception of Genevieve Bujold, who annoys me despite the fact that I have
never seen her before.  On the good side, she plays a bit part.
 As anyone who has seen the previews or heard anything about the film knows,
this is a comedy about incest and the Kennedy assassination.  Although it
may not be as blatantly dark a blend as Very Bad Things, The House of Yes
comes damn close.  So, unless you're ready for a complete blast of darkness,
step back and let someone else rent it.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Written and Directed by Stephen Sommers
Starring Stephen Dunham, Brendan Fraser, John Hannah, Arnold Vosloo, Rachel
Weisz, and Kevin J. O'Connor
     Normally, when a movie is really bad, the best part of watching the
film is watching the previews.  When watching The Mummy, Stephen Sommers
"not-quite-a-remake-but-really-is" of the 1921 version, I didn't even get
that satisfaction.  I think one of the previews was good, but not good
enough for me to remember its title.  I remember that Jan de Bont is coming
out with a new chic horror film called The Haunting of Hill House or
something equally cheesy, which looks to be worse than his last one.  I also
remember seeing a preview for a new Arnold Scwatzenagger movie that didn't
even dare put his name on it after him having been in the double-trouble
combination of Eraser and Jingle all the Way.
     No, to dispel a rumor it is not a remake of the 1921 film with the same
plot, same title, and same main idea.  To those people in charge of movie
studios who are telling me this, I ask you: what is it?
     Going on with my ripping the film to shreds, I will say that it has as
cheesy of a plot as The Mummy (no matter what year) has ever had: "it" boy
Brendon Fraser (portraying a French Legion Soldier who happens ot be an
American) has to save the world with British-thief Jonathan (John Hannah,
hopefully no relation to the talented actress Daryl) and
more-frigid-than-Antartica archeologist/librarian Evelyn (Rachel Weisz) have
to save the world from a very dumb, very ugly "mummy" (although he ends up
with a fairly good complexion and a full bunch of skin before he is killed),
played by Arnold Vosloo.
     Let's face it, every time that Brendan Fraser tries to do a mainstream
role he either fails miserably or psuedo-fails.  In George of the Jungle,
which I will only now admit to seeing, he made something that was already
stupid like dumber.  In Blast from the Past, a medicore movie due to its
script, he almost took a wrecking ball to it.
     Vosloo and Hannah are people that I've seen before but haven't remember
enough of to pay attention.  Stephen Sommers is someone who continues to be
a thorn in my side after killing two Mark Twain books and then coming out
with Deep Rising.
     Sommers' very own tailor made script shows that people should not buy
books on "How to Write your Screenplay in 21 Days" or "How to Make a Movie
that Sells" on a matter of princeple.  Sommers tries and fails at juggling
Adventure, Romance, Comedy, Action, and Horror around all at once.  In the
desparate attempt to keep the balls from hitting him on the head, he ends up
placing one-liners right next to screams of terror as a flesh-eating...
BEETLE?... devours someone from the inside.  Also we get to see Rachel Weisz
go from sub-zero to just plain zero as she "warms up" to Brendan Fraser.
     This is a film at which I took my own advice.  My advice: always get a
head start on an
angry mob.  Hence, I watched the last thirty seconds from the back of the
theatre.
     As promised by the preview for The Mummy, the special effects are good.
They are not, however, anything compared to what we normally see in the
pre-summer gameshow.  And, when I say special effects are good, you know
what that normally means...  It did also live up to its tagline, but not in
the way intended.  Let me tell you, personally, BEWARE OF THE MUMMY.

Title
Review for Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993)
Starring Woody Allen, Diane Keaton, Alan Alda, Anjelica Houston
     OK, I like New York.  Unless you're from the city, or have ever lived
in it, you probably hate it.  But, as the opening song of Manhattan Murder
Mystery states, Woody Allen happens to like New York.  Because he likes New
York so much, almost every movie that has him in it, including, although it
isn't quite revealed until the end, Antz completely takes place in the Big
Apple.  A couple, Manhattan and Manhattan Murder Mystery, have even taken
their titles from it.
     Woody Allen fans shoot me here, but I've never seen Manhattan.  Going
from Manhattan Murder Mystery, though, you might wonder if he's playing to
the stereotypes.  Playing to the stereotypes is my only complain in this
bizarre mystery about a next-door neighbor's plans to murder his wife.  It
takes the easy punches at New Yorkers.  But, hey, with a place that has as
many people in need of electroshock as New York does, can we blame him?
     Manhattan Murder Mystery follows a couple (Woody Allen and Diane
Keaton, seen before in Annie Hall) whose kid has left for college and are
now living their lives out on the Upper West Side.  They go to Rangers games
and the theatre and the opera.  They hang out with their divorced friends,
plan their dreams of resturaunts, and go to work.  Oh, yeah, and this couple
suspects their next door neighbor of murdering his wife.
     Although Allen is trepidatious about confronting a murder at first, the
bland urban lives of Allen, his wife, his wife's friend (Alda), and the
writer Allen edits (Houston), get caught up in the Manhattan murder mystery
offered before them.  It is a chance for a bunch of paranoid urbanites to
have fun: a rare oppertunity.
     Going to Jersey for late-night discussions on how to nab the killer,
sneaking into apartments, faking phone conversations.  All of this is in the
mix for the four bland individuals given a chance to be psychotic little
children for a change.  It is all a game to these four.  There really isn't
a concern about morals, only about having fun.
     Also thrown into the mix is an interesting arangement.  Woody Allen
suspects that Diane Keaton is in love with Alan Alda.  She, in turn,
suspects that good old posterchild for neurotics Woody is in love with
Angelica Houston.  And, of course, they're trying to set up Houston and Alda
at the same time.
     Besides Woody Allen's unique touch, Manhattan Murder Mystery is a
fairly normal and mainstream film.  What bothered most critics, but will
never bother me, is Woody Allen's diatribe of neurosis.  As always, the
compound insanity that he delivers, the one liners that insult himself and
New York, and other things that convince you that you may not be the
craziest person in the world make the film entertaining.
     As far as acting goes, its as solid as you'd expect from such a
powerful cast.  When it comes to directing, it's what you'd expect from
Woody Allen: conservative.  He takes his camera and will shoot an entire
scene with only one shot.
     The script is suprisingly postmodern: it contains wonderful bits of
Woody Allen self-reference.  For instance, the title Manhattan Murder
Mystery alludes to the film Manhattan, and you have the wonderfully
brilliant scene in which Diane Keaton decrys wearing a tie with a skirt: the
very look that became chic in 1977 with her role in Annie Hall.
     Do not expect interesting plot twists.  You will not get them.  Do not
expect high art, you won't get it either.  Instead, expect a film that will
delight and entertain anyone who hates, or happens to love, New York.  What
a hoot!

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Featuring the voice of Tommy Lee Jones
Once again good intentions are ruined by bad executions.
If I had a dime for every time that happened in movies, I could make a movie
where that didn't happen, but instead I'm a poor, unpaid slob who ends up
doing nothing but being your humble servant watching film after film so you
don't have to.
Small Soldiers yet again shows that Hollywood is just one giant limbo
contest, and, although Small Soldiers isn't as low as they come, it's got
its ear near the floor. To sum the movie up, you have a bunch of
hyperviolent action figures manufactured by a toy company bought out my an
arms conglomerate (??), and the suck up of the company accidentally puts
artificial intelligence chips in the toys, which go wild and start attacking
the other toys, and, then, the humans.
If you're not yet convinced by the implausibility, ludicrosity, and insanity
of the plot -- and I know you skeptics aren't -- then I'll go on. You have a
toy maker unwilling to carry violent toys who goes away for the weekend,
having his son end up putting the hyperviolent toys on the shelves. Of
course they start trying to kill each other and their violence only spills
over into the realm of hurting humans.
Yeah, the toys use chainsaws, nailguns, flaming tennis balls, Frankenstein
barbies, and just about anything else that isn't in a plausible arsenal and
try to kill everyone who helps out the other toys, which are peaceful little
buggers who just want to get home. (E.T. HELLO!)
Having gotten this far and not gone to the bathroom to puke, I'll say the
only review I really need to give you about this limbo movie, it's by far
the most violent PG-13 movie I've ever seen. And it's not wacky violent,
it's not funny violent. It's just stupid violent.
I vote we strangle the movie makers with the limbo pole. Who's with me?

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
Written by Mark Rosenthal and Lawrence Konner
Starring Charlize Theron, Bill Paxton, David Paymer
     I'm beginning to get fed up.  Over my four years as a critic, the thing
which has kept me going is the moderate balance of films.  The good balances
the bad.  I try to see both in equal proportions.  But Disney's Mighty Joe
Young remake marks the fourth week in which I haven't seen a truly terrible
movie.
    It's a backwards machismo, I suppose, the urge to see the things which
you so loathe; but I need to see a bad film every once in a while.  And, you
know what, Mighty Joe Young doesn't qualify.
     Far from being bad, Mighty Joe Young is actually a family fun movie.
It's enjoyable, appropriate, cute, cuddly, and all of those other things
that I've been seeing in every movie since A Bug's Life.
     Mighty Joe Young tracks a 2,000 pound gorilla in the wilds of Africa
that is taken to a reserve in ... California? ... for safe-keeping.  Okay.
A little unrealistic, but who ever said a kid's movie had to have the
slightest hint of realism.  The first half of the movie is a Gorillas in the
Mist-esque hatred of poachers woman-of-the-wild motif.  The second half is a
straight up parody of King Kong, awestruck onlookers and all.
     Mark one down.  I'm feeling relaxed.  It is, as a point of fact, an
extremely un-creative movie.  But, as a vetern, I can say quite honestly
that creativity doesn't count for as much as it should.  So that saves
Mighty Joe from my wrath, although my colleagues and cohorts and surely
bashing this film at this very moment.
     This is not the film to take a girl on a date to.  It's not the film
for you.  It's the film for you and your family.  When you're right
alongside your kid, all of the normal rights and wrongs slip away.  The same
thing happens when you watch a horror movie or an action flick.  It becomes
fun.  All you have to do to enjoy Mighty Joe Young is shut up and watch.

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
Buffy, the Vampire Slayer (1992, PG-13)
Starring Kristie Swanson, Luke Perry, David Arquette, Donald Sutherland
 I'll admit to it  I watch the series.  Occasionally, I'm tuned to
Pittsburgh's WB 31 and it just happens to be Tuesdays and I decide: OK,
tonight I'm going to watch cheap horror and dammit, I'm going to do my best
to enjoy it!  Why `Buffy, the Vampire Slayer' is my drug of choice I don't
know.  I've only been watching it for a few weeks and teen angst films and
TV shows were never perennial favorites, but I'd like to think I see
something in the show that most people don't.  What is it?   I would have to
say that, like `The X-Files," `Millennium," `ER," and `Ally MacBeal," four
other shows that I watch about every week, `Buffy, the Vampire Slayer' has a
sick sense of humor.
 I've always been a fan of dark comedies, as anyone reading my reviews for a
long time will know, and I've always found that, if a dark comedy doesn't
try to have any point beyond humor, it's much more enjoyable.  `Buffy, the
Vampire Slayer', in catering to the acne center of the nation (both
figuratively and literally), ends up putting all of this stupid crap of love
and relationships and `well-built' characters which are actually cardboard
cutouts.  It would be much stronger without all this teen angst crap.
 Even the people who like my reviews are probably saying, GET TO THE MOVIE,
ALREADY!  The truth of the matter is, through the last two paragraphs, I
have been explaining to you why I liked the movie Buffy, the Vampire Slayer
more than I like the show.
 The movie, Buffy, the Vampire Slayer doesn't waste time getting into its
unique brand of sarcasm.  You are first greeted with seeing an ancient
slayer and a voice-over introduction with a caption `Europe  The Dark Ages'
, and then cut to an LA mall with Buffy, LA prep and soon-to-be-slayer and
the caption `Los Angeles  The Lite Ages'.  This kind of sarcastic pace
keeps up through the entire movie.
 The performances, admittedly, are lacking.  The direction is downright bad,
and the storyline really doesn't help much, but all of this is made up in
spades with one of the most finely crafted formula scripts courtesy of Josh
Whedon.  This is the type of guy Kevin Williamson would hang out with,
someone who is able to take a genre and say: `OK, I'm going to work with
you, work within you, and still make fun of you at the same time.'  He even
throws in a cheap romance between Buffy and Pike (a name and a fish!),
played by Luke Perry back when both he and 90210 were `the thing'.
 Yes, it's one of those films my sister would go `oh, that's so sweet' to
while I'm laughing my ass off.  I'm sorry, but when I see something as
utterly hilarious as a relationship based upon attraction, sex, love,
leather jackets and riding the world of undead minions, I just have to
laugh.
 I'm aware that, after reviewing both this and She's all That with positive
reviews, I will either be shot at by other, vehemently disagreeing critics
or cause critical praise for Friday the 13th, but I'm saying my mind and my
mind tells me that this is bad.  Wait, hold it, my mind does tell me this is
bad, that it is cheesy horror crap and it keeps telling me `shouldn't you be
seeing Life is Beautiful instead of sitting around and watching a HORROR
film?', but my soul -- thank God the part of my body I review with  -- tells
me that this one is worth renting.  That is, if you can stand a horror film
instead of some high-brow crap and want to laugh.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Movies are like murder laws. It's a question of intent. If you meant to kill
them, it's murder 2. You planned it, it's murder 1. If it was an accident,
you get manslaughter. If you got a dark comedy and you came for a horror
movie, you're disappointed. You got a drama and you came for a comedy,
you're disappointed. Sometimes.
Myself, I like it when it's different from my expectations. It's because I
like change in general. When it's different, I'll take it. I took Urban
Legend (like a pill with some water), and liked it enough to see it once and
at a Halloween party if my girlfriend drags me, but don't really care to see
it again.
The movie, which has the same plot as every single psychokiller movie except
this time they're knocking 'em off with urban legends, would have never been
good if it weren't for the saving grace of a comic element. It has to be
intentional, in my mind, because the places it was put in are so ridiculous
that they have to be plotted. You can't be that good by accident.
It has things in it like the person from Dawson's Creek yelling "Oh, God"
when "I Don't Want to Wait" by Paula Cole blasts on the radio by accident,
the song "Turn Around" on in the background as the girl is about to get her
head chopped off, and a killer that will keep you smiling for days. It has
more freaks than a circus show, but they're fun to watch.
And, like everything else on the face of the Earth, I have a philosophy
about fun, too. Let it happen. Forget plot holes when its fun. Forgive
murder when its fun. And, most important, have fun when its fun.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
Starring Jason Biggs, Shannon Elizabeth, Alyson Hannigan, Chris Klein,
Natasha Lyonne, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Tara Reid, Mena Suvari, Eddie Kaye
Thomas, Seann William Scott, Jennifer Coolidge
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 All right.  I never saw Porky's, I missed Animal House, and the entire
genre of sex comedy isn't really my forte, but I know good movies when I see
them, and take it from me, American Pie is good on its own.
 The funniest movie I have see so far this year (although that may change
when I see South Park), American Pie is the story of the common high
schooler on the common high school quest: to get laid.  And, like any man
faced with the prospect of unwillingly going to college a virgin, they are
going out of their minds.  So, in the morning after a beer party at which it
appears everyone was having sex but them, the four (led by Kevin (Thomas Ian
Nicholas), who just lost his girlfriend over his desire to go all the way
instead of settle for getting head.) make a pact to get laid by the prom.
Of course, the funniest thing about this is the speech Kevin makes about the
virtues of helping each other get laid --Sometimes, when you're exercising,
you need a spotter, someone to make sure you keep going," he says.  That, he
proposes, is the function each of them will serve for one another.
 Jim (Jason Briggs) attempts to go about this by helping a Chezch vixen,
Nadia (Shannon Elizabeth) with her studies and offering to help in more
obscene matters.  When a netbroadcast goes terribly wrong, he turns to the
already infamous flute-girl Michelle (Alyson Hannigan), and if you don't
know where the flute goes, you can be pleasantly surprised.  Oz (Chris
Klein), jock to the core, joins the choir to get girls like Jessica (Natasha
Lyonne).  Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) decides that he should learn how to
return his girlfriend Vicky's (Tara Reid) favor.  And finally Finch (Eddie
Kaye Thomas) decides that the best way to go about getting laid is to pay
Heather (Mena Suvari) to sing his sexual praises.
 Like all plans that virgins have to deprive themselves of their
predicament, they inevitably go awry.  As in any comedy of errors, the how
is the funny part, and thus I can't tell you.  What I can tell you, however,
is that the movie takes every crude joke it can get and then takes a few
intelligent ones.  For a good description, imagine There's Something about
Mary with a pastry and a flute.
 The film isn't for virgins, because they won't at all respect the jokes in
there.  American Pie, although over the top, is remarkably true-to-life as
far as how we all grow up.  It brings back memories of those awkward talks
with Dad, those even more awkward moments of foreplay, the rumors, the
insanity, and the crazy desire to act cool while you fail utterly.  As far
as any guy or girl past highschool goes: we've been there before.
 Despite the fact that our own personal demons may be more or less
frightening, and we may or may not want to revisit that bizarre quest to
psychosexual maturity, American Pie's ability to strike a common chord is
part of its great charm.  Because we've been there before, we can get all
the jokes, immediately relate to the characters (who represent all of the
high school sets from jock to nerd), and love the movie all the more.  The
kids that had snuck in or were going with their carded friends or boyfriends
didn't laugh nearly as much... or as hard... as everyone who was of age.
 American Pie is this year's funniest sex comedy for sure and probably this
years funniest film period.  Crude, rude, and in the groove, it's not one to
miss.

Title
Review for Freedom Song (2000) (TV)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/d7d9a2e0f6e7f14d88256909005df932?OpenDocument
Long and annoying have been the boasts of TNT of its status as "the best
movie studio on television."  With that celebrity narrator whose voice
you know by heart and whose name always escapes you, TNT's
advertisements for its latest western directed by Bill Pullman, or, in
this case, Gandhi-rip off starring Danny Glover pop up right in the
middle of the TV edit for an old movie that you could probably go
without seeing and normally cause people like me to switch to the
upper-channel echelon of HBO, Cinemax, Showtime, and The Movie Channel
where I don't have to bother about hearing from some moron boasting that
their station produces really good "made-for-TV" movies as if this was
something to be proud about.
Having finally caved in and sampled TNT, having sampled HBO on a fairly
regular basis, I can now say without a doubt that not only is TNT not
the best movie studio on television it is by far one of the worst. 
With large payments towards directors who do not demonstrate fair
ability, TNT seems to reward the kind of schlock-TV that has made
"TV-movie" into a status symbol in the film industry.
A case in point is Freedom Song, yet another "based on a true story"
TV-movie that is slightly above the limbo bar set by Lifetime.  With
shaky camerawork, a simplistic script, a simpler purpose and characters
that seem to be cut out of the pantheon on the civil-rights movement
clichés (the outsider, the old soldier who gave up, the subversive who
has been fighting in his own way his entire life, and, of course, the
narrator with a conflict that he has to get over), Freedom Song just is
another example of why TV movies are only examples of what couldn't make
the cut of the silver screen.
Freedom Song deals with the civil rights movement in the really deep
south of Mississippi where Owen Walker (Vicellous Reon Shannon) is still
sore over being spanked by his father because he accidentally walked
into the Whites Only waiting room at the train station.  His father
didn't want to spank him, but was forced to by whites, and because of
this his father has lost his own spirit for fighting for The Movement,
only to watch his son grow into the person who eventually desegregates
the Whites Only washroom (by staging a march on City Hall and getting
the Freedom Riders to desegregate the place).
Now I am of the generation (and race) that never had to deal with the
Jim Crow laws, but this should not stop me from saying what needs to be
said about "Freedom Song:" that it is a gimmicky movie-of-the-week
quality made-for-TV movie that should have never been aired, let alone
released on video.  I've read the history books, I've watched Gandhi,
Malcolm X, and Glory... all of them more than once do I REALLY have to
see yet another flimsy excuse at filmmaking when I could just read the
books (history ones, that is), and get at least as good of an idea at
Freedom Song offers, or watch some incredible films dealing with racism
(such as American History X), and get a better idea of the message
behind Freedom Song?
Please.  No more games, no more gimmicks, and, above all, no more claims
that TNT is the best movie studio on television because, with films like
Freedom Song, you can rest assured that it is not.
Director: Phil Alden Robinson
Producer: Amanda DiGiulio
Writer: Phil Alden Robinson, Stanley Weiser
Starring: Danny Glover, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Vondie Curtis-Hall, and
Glynn Turnman
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html"> 
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Swingers (1996)
Starring Jon Favreau, Vince Vaughn, Ron Livingston, Patrick van Horn, Alex
Desert, Heather Graham, and Brooke Langton
     I love swing.  I can jump, jive, 'n' wail.  I can flip a beautiful baby
and jump with her tonight.  In my spare time, I teach my friends how to
swing dance.  I have seven CDs that are strictly swing music, and one that
happens to have swing on it.  I know the underarm turn, the overarm turn,
the cuddle.  I know some East coast, some West Coast, and some improv of the
two.  I know the Charleston, the Jigwalk.  I'm working on the Hollywood
Whip.  Gimme time.  Right now I'm listening to Big Bad Voodoo Daddy's "Mr.
Pinstripe Suit" reflecting.
     I'd like to say that Doug Liman's hip flick Swingers started it all,
but it didn't.  I was interested a bit before that, but hey, I'm always into
doing the new things.  I liked the music about six months before I saw the
movie, but it was the movie that got me started on the ability to dance this
stuff.
     The movie has been classified as a cult flick, but lets forget that
label.  It isn't a cult flick.  Anything that wins an MTV movie award, the
most fickle type of award ever granted (i.e. whatever's "in" at the time) is
way too big to be a cult flick.  Swingers is instead, something that should
be cult, but isn't.  It should apply to only Los Angelenos or people who
like Swing music, but it doesn't.  Thanks to a brilliantly witty script by
the star Jon Favreau, Swingers has an appeal to everyone who's ever been in
and out of love (or the hopeless romantics who are just dying for this
chance).
     It's got a very old plot: we open with boy having already lost girl.
She's been gone for six months and she hasn't called yet.  Boy (Mike, played
by Jon Favreau) is under tremendous pressure from his friends to get back in
the game of dating.   Boy goes to Vegas with Trent (Vince Vaughn) where he
spoils both of their chances of getting laid by telling his sad story to a
Dorothy from the MGM Grand and talks French philosophy over pancakes with a
waitress at 5 Am.  Boy's friend, Rob (Ron Livingston) was Hamlet two months
ago, has been in boy's situation before, and is now faced with the prospect
of becoming the Disney character Goofy because he doesn't have a job.  In
the meantime, Trent and a boy named Sue (Patrick Van Horn) are pushing the
boy to get back in the game where he ends up having an entire relationship
with Nikki's (Brooke Langton) answering machine and gets to swing dance to a
live performance of Big Bad Voodoo Daddy at the Derby with new girl,
Lorraine (Heather Graham).
     The thing that is so impressive about Swingers is that it has the
ability to be effortlessly cool while, at the same time, making fun of being
cool.  Jon Favreau puts his characters in situations as bizarre as any
Stephen Wright story but at the same time, suspends our disbelief of them.
Like the Nick Hornby novel "High Fidelity", Swingers offers a comprehensive
view into the clandestine world of men's feelings.  Sure, there are movies
upon movies about the girl trying to find love and telling us about their
inner thoughts, but how often do they get the same thing from us.
     Doug Liman, doing cinematography for his first time ever, is a constant
surprise.  Armed with a stedicam he takes an entire movie down all by
himself, not only operating the camera, but also being the only camera
operator.  He is able to handle everything from too much natural light in
the Stardust in Vegas to too little light in the alleys of LA.  He amazes me
constantly as one of the finest cinematographers of our time.
     Wrapping up my tirade, Swingers isn't a cult flick.  It's mainstream.
It isn't a guy's movie.  It's a date movie.  And, despite what the genres on
the imdb tell me, its a comedy through and through.  Watch it with your
beautiful baby for some laughs.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/26d2b7f0e671d82188256902000457dc?OpenDocument
Since the beginning of time (or at least the domestication of animals),
the chicken has been man's feathered enigma.  Like so many of its
feathered friends, it has fallen into the realm of the metaphor (i.e.
`He's a chicken.').  Unlike so many of its edible counterparts, it has
survived the hassles of religious communities unscathed (no one will
persecute you for eating a chicken wing).  It has found its way into the
realm of ontological questions (which came first: the chicken or the
egg), as well as into sanguine curiosity (why does a chicken continue
moving around after you cut its head off).  It has become the basic
standard for all foods (taste's like chicken).  It has changed with the
times, entering the debate about genetic engineering (see the
accusations against KFC using frank-n-roosters).  It has even, through
its progeny, entered into the world of our children (I do not like green
eggs and ham, I do not like them Sam I am).  As long as civilization has
existed, the chicken has haunted our collective hubris with its
often-charming idiocy.
Amongst both edible entrees and feathered friends, the chicken is the
idiot God
In fact, let's admit it: there's NOTHING interesting about chickens.
Even at a petting zoo, your four year old would rather take the chance
of having his shirt chewed up or being spit upon by a lama than bother
at all with the chicken.  These dumb animals simply run away whenever
you get more than five feet from them and, after those few minutes of
chasing chickens at the petting zoo when you are in your younger years,
your fascination with chickendom cracks like an egg broken for the
omelet.  So even after seeing Peter Lord and Nick Park's feature debut,
Chicken Run  by far the single smartest family animation feature I have
seen since Toy Story  I still wonder what the hell enticed these guys
into crafting a story about chickens in the first place.
I don't know why they did it, and I probably never will.  All I know is
that I am glad that they did.
Chicken Run, a version of The Great Escape with Ginger (Julia Swalath)
taking over the part of Steve McQueen, tells the story of a farm full of
chickens at the Audubon-Auswitzch of the Tweedy egg farm.  At the Tweedy
egg farm, things are fairly routine try to escape when you can and lay
your eggs, or it's off to the chopping block for you.  Ginger doesn't
like this life, and dreams of living anywhere outside of the farm.  Baba
(Jane Horrocks) is a complete lemming and has no trouble following
anyone, but believes that whenever Ginger is put in solitary confinement
(the trash can) she is on holiday.  Fowler (Benjamin Whitrow), a former
RAF rooster, reminisces about the good old days of fighting Jerry.
Meanwhile, inside of the farm, Mrs. Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) focuses
herself on transforming the slave labor camp into a full-blown death
camp (by use of a pie machine) while Mr. Tweedy (Tony Haygarth) tries
(and fails) to outsmart the chickens.  Everything continues along said
routine until Rocky the Flying Rooster (Mel Gibson) arrives, having
accidentally hit the weathervane on a misfire from the circus.  His
arrival gets Ginger cooking, and pretty soon she lays the golden egg
that may lead to freedom from the farm they will fly out.
Numerous attempts to do this fail, laughs ensue, and the movie speeds
along at a chipper pace towards a conclusion that makes the rocket
sequence in Toy Story look like child's play.
Chicken Run's main strength as a family film comes in its ability to
seamlessly meld humor that can pander to the children and not go under
adult heads and give more intellectual parodies to adults that will
still seem funny to children, and it does this by always being aware of
just how bizarre a version of The Great Escape with poultry in it really
is (i.e. the advertised line `I don't want to be a pie' is followed by
`I don't even like gravy.').
In the realm of claymation, Chicken Run finds itself only in the company
of itself and other Oscar nominees.  1999's Humdrum (Peter Lord and Nick
Park's Oscar-nominated short), in which shadow puppets played with
shadow puppets, had the same level of detail in character animation,
whereas 1998's More (Mark Osborne's (Dropping Out) Oscar-nominated
short) featured the same level of detail in claymation sets and
lighting.  However, Chicken Run marks the first time near-perfection in
both arenas has come together to form near-perfect claymation it raises
the bar for the genre as a whole.
Of course realistic animation isn't the point with claymation, so don't
expect Chicken Run's chickens to look like the ones you pick up at the
store: therein lies the source of their charm.  While the average
chicken may hold as much interest to you as a dead duck, this film's
chickens are well-defined characters that make you laugh, feel worry for
them, and then laugh even more.
All that, and you only get one `chicken and the egg' joke.
Director: Peter Lord and Nick Park
Producer: Peter Lord, Nick Park, and David Sproxton
Writer: Karey Kirtpatrick
Starring: Mel Gibson, Julia Sawalha, Miranda Richardson, Phil Daniels,
Lynn Ferguson, Tony Haygarth, Jane Horrocks, Timothy Spall, Imelda
Staunton, and Benjamin Whitrow
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Todo sobre mi madre (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/386ecdfa63236c958825684b000a144d?OpenDocument
 Director Pedro Almodovar explains the relationship between tunnels and
the main character of Manuela (Cecila Roth) in All About my Mother with
the line: "Manuela runs away.  She always runs away on a train, through
endless tunnels."
 Indeed, Manuela is always moving.  With the untimely death of her son,
Estoban, she moves to Barcelona to embark upon a search for Estoban's
father.  In Barcelona, she is constantly moving from one place to
another, doing something or another for someone.  Save a transsexual
prostitute here (Antonio San Juan), help a pregnant nun there (Penelope
Cruz).  Help smooth out the turbulent lesbian relationship between two
actresses (Marisa Paredes and Candela Pena) here, usher an older woman
(Rosa Maria Sarda) into a great understanding of life there.  She never
stops.
 It seems so odd, then, that the one thing that All About my Mother
would have needed to be a really great film was a better pace.
 All About My Mother is an interesting, somewhat surreal and oftentimes
bizarre journey of self-discovery that comes during the search of
Manuela for her transsexual ex-husband, Lola.  Admittedly, it is one of
more bizarre foreign films I have seen (although this is not a long list
and Il Mostro was pretty trippy, too).  However, All About My Mother
does end up being an incredibly interesting film to watch.
 Penned and directed by Pedro Almodovar, All About my Mother succeeds is
doing several noteworthy things.  The first of which is making critics
laugh.  I saw this at a Cleveland press-only screening with five other
critics, and we all had at least a few moments where we unleashed our
tongue to let loose a chuckle.  The second of which is accomplishing
what amounts to a nearly all-female cast.  In the cast we have one
supporting male, the boy who plays Estoban.  The rest of the film is
comprised of women, and thus it is like watching a Spanish version of
the cafe scenes in "Sex and the City" for about an hour and
three-quarters.  The third and final thing is accomplishing a movie
which deserves a second glance.
 To fans of the surreal, who normally can handle subtitles, All About my
Mother will be quite a treat.  It is a film that is able to easily
provide interesting imagery (a joint effort of the great directing on
behalf Pedro Almodovar and the haunting photography of Affonso Beato),
incredible dialogue, and at the same time make you ponder over it.
 Despite these three major strengths, however, All About my Mother is
lacking in one major element: pace.  Certain movies can engage
themselves upon thought alone.  Others rely on action.  Because All
About my Mother has absolutely no action to it, it must rely entirely
upon thought for pacing.  The thought in All About my Mother is enough
to fill perhaps a thirty-minute short.  There is simply not enough
pacing present to sustain this film.
 All About my Mother has been voted the best foreign film of the year by
several major critics circles.  To say this about All About my Mother
makes me wonder what the other foreign films were like this year.  It's
good.  It gets a lukewarm recommendation.  But its not that great.
 Then again, that's the problem when you have to give a film points just
for being foreign.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Angela's Ashes (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/b34ca772a99978fc8825685f001bd6c3?OpenDocument
 The title: Angela's Ashes refers to cigarettes and not cremation.  If
someone had told me this before I had entered the film, I might have
enjoyed it more than I did.  Then again, if someone had told me about
the rest of the film, I might have asked for a final cigarette before
going in to Angela's Ashes.
 Such is the price of not reading your press packet.
 Angela's Ashes is Alan Parker's adaptation of Frank McCourt's
Pulitzer-Prize-Winning book.  Like most Pulitzer-Prize-winners and their
film adaptations, the adjective "long" is a good way to describe the
movie.  Despite having a shorter time than the three-hour Magnolia
(Angela's Ashes clocks in at two-and-a-half), Angela's Ashes feels much
more drawn out.
 Angela's Ashes, unlike most films that never have a resolution, does
not feel like it is going nowhere fast.  It feels like it is going
nowhere very slowly.  Coming out of the theatre, that is the basic
impression that I lifted off of the film.  In the beginning, McCourt
claims that "Worse than the ordinary miserable childhood is the Irish
miserable childhood, and worse yet is the miserable Irish Catholic
childhood."  The rest of the movie attempts to drill in this point.
 While it is drilling in this point, the film also attempts to tackle
(but never knocks down) such issues as prostitution, alcoholism, and the
Catholic Church.  I saw it, in fact, at a special screening for critics
and Catholic clergy.  The film takes on classically Irish and local
topics, and has its actors adopt a thick Irish accent (as if Emily
Watson and Robert Carlyle didn't have thick enough accents already.).
The script is thick with colloquialisms.
 Despite a wonderful managing of the struggles of making an American
film about the Irish, the film does a terrible mismanaging of its plot.
The film is very unfocused, jumping from topic to topic and never having
a resolution along any lines that the film accentuates.
 To its strong credit, I found that Angela's Ashes is able to push my
emotional buttons.  This is not to say I liked the film.  It is to say
that Emily Watson delivers an outstanding performance, Robert Carlyle
does his usual work (that is, an exceptional job), and Michael Legee
plays Frank McCourt to a tear-jerking (almost) T.  John Williams helps
everyone out with a score that, devoid of which, the film could not have
survived.  Also, a degree of religious humor helps the film's pacing.
 I must admit that this is a film that I believe only Irish Catholics
can enjoy.  It is so regional and so tied in with Catholicism that it
shuns the outsider.  Since I am neither Irish nor Catholic I wouldn't
really know, but the Irish Catholic audience seemed to enjoy it, and
since the film has little else to its credit, that has to be the
explanation.
 It has to be, because without local support and acting and music, the
film can't stand on its own two emaciated legs.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
Starring Harrison Ford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Charles Dutton, Bonnie Hunt, and
Sydney Pollack
What does Hollywood have against us?  Year in and year out, we fork over
millions and millions of dollars to see movies that are consistently bad. 
Sure, a few of them are good and more than a few of them are enjoyable, but
most of the movies are bad.  Yet we still pay.  And still they proceed to
torture us with movies like Random Hearts.
Torture is the correct term for such a movie, one that spends two hours and
twenty minutes evoking boredom, yawns, and snores from the audience.  There is
no kinder way to put it.  However, I could be completely honest and say that
this is perhaps the worst two and a half hours I have spent in a movie theatre
all year and I've seen a lot of really bad movies.
Random Hearts is the long, drawn out, unbearably slow story of Dutch Van Der
Brock (Ford) and Kay Chandler (Thomas), an IAD Sergeant and a congresswoman. 
Both of their spouses are cheating on them when the adulterer's plane crashes
in the Chesapeake Bay.  This is twenty minutes into the movie.  The next two
hours are spent in the midst of a frizzled romance between the two.
Besides this, several subplots including Kay Chandler's running against a
religious fanatic and Dutch's attempts to secure charges on a corrupt cop
waste time during this film.
I try to be nice.  I try to say a few good words about every movie, if only
in the spirit of optimism.  But Random Hearts does not lend itself to this
chivalry.  Instead, Random Hearts bores the audience.  Here are some examples
of how:
The entire movie is dialogue based and the dialogue is terrible.  The style
lends itself towards a slow pace (slow conversation, slow plot, slow pans,
slow transitions).  Harrison Ford proves that he has lost whatever acting
talent he ever had, and Kristin Scott Thomas has made a major fall from grace
since her 1996 Oscar Nomination for The English Patient.
The flaw in this movie lies in so many places.  In the acting it would be in
providing a British actress with an American role.  Kristin Scott Thomas
handles the part so badly that she cannot even lose the accent, let alone
adopt the body language of an American.  She seems too reserved, too proper. 
Add to this Charles Dutton (normally an interesting character actor) in a bit
part that just annoys, and you have what amounts to a terrible ensemble cast.
I cannot say something kind about this movie.  There is nothing kind to say. 
What I can do is simply be nice enough to it to not go on because I could sit
here insulting this film for hours.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
There are really two types of crime movies: the ones that suck you in with
their complex plots, interesting characters, and intense situations, and the
ones that you spend two to three hours in front of a television bored out of
your gourd. With two Academy Awards (Best Supporting Actor, Kevin Spacey,
Best Original Screenplay, Christopher MaQuarrie), I shouldn't have to tell
you which category "The Usual Suspects" falls under.
The movie, filled with intricate plot twists, follows a five-criminal bunch
who you love to hate as they get their revenge upon the NYPD for arresting
them one too many times  only to discover that the scheme itself has more
to it than it seems, cumulating with 27 bodies on a pier in San Pedro,
California and $93M sitting in a truck.
Believe me, no matter how smart you are, the ending to "The Usual Suspects"
will never strike you as Usual.

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
OK. Here's a movie about five people with fifty guns and unlimited ammo.
Robert de Niro with his pleasant little mole is our friendly neighborhood
ex-CIA mercenary. The mathematician from Good Will Hunting is our favorite
ex-KGB traitor. The guy from The Professional? He's a nice French mercenary,
probably ex-French Secret Service. All of them are killers, all of them
darkly comic and all of them after one thing: a nice steel box which has
something in it that both the IRA and the Russians want.
It's a movie of one-upsmanship: each scene is better than the last. Each car
chase claims more cars, each shootout more lives, each scene, more time.
>From the French countryside to the highway tunnels under Paris, Ronin takes
you, willing or unwilling, along a complex winding plot of people searching
for a mysterious box because of the money not to mention one or two of them
may have an anterior motive.
Somehow, this psychotic inner child has a brain all of its own, coming up
with its own plausibility and interesting traits (not to say it would be
standard without them it's one of the finer action films I've ever seen),
such as the title itself (a Ronin is a Samurai without a master). Then it
turns around and has a car chase that makes Speed look like a little kid on
a scooter. Yeah, come to think of it, it has so much fun shooting this way
and that, it makes any action film look like a kid on a scooter or worse.
Some of them are still learning to walk next to this sweet thing.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Written by William Goldman and Christopher Bertolini
Based upon the novel by Nelson DeMille
Starring John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, and
Leslie Stefanson
 I should have trusted Madeleine Stowe.  I should have trusted James Woods.
Both of these people have never disappointed me in a film, yet, when I heard
that Simon West was helming The General's Daughter, my first reaction was
that of an anorexic approached with an all-you-can-eat buffet: I wanted to
stay away from it.
 As the date of release approached, the buzz got worse and worse.  A critic
or two gave it positive reviews, but it was (no pun intended) generally
loathed.  A good friend of mine in New Jersey expressed his utter revulsion
for this film in words that I cannot print casually.  When I went to the
film itself, I expected complete and utter crap.
 I did not get high art.  I didn't even get a good film, really.  But, the
point of this review is: The General's Daughter is not as bad as it is made
out to be.
 Simon West still can't handle a camera for anything longer than the
duration of a music video (his normal format).  He can't coach actors.  The
script still has the trademark William Goldman lines, bits and pieces of
dialogue so utterly terrible that you want to find out his address for the
sake of killing him.  John Travolta doesn't give an Oscar worthy
performance, but a Razzie may be coming his way if he keeps this kind of
crap up.
 Yet The General's Daughter is enjoyable.
 The plot holds more water than most of the William Goldman screenplays,
probably because of the fact that it is based off of a novel, which offers
much less opportunity for Goldman to screw it up.  In short: Captain
Elizabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) is found tied spread-eagle and
strangled on her father's (a prestigious general considering a career in
politics, which means that he's off to a fine start) military base and a
bunch of Criminal Investigations Division warrant officers (played by John
Travolta and Madeline Stowe).
 From a few minutes into the movie its fairly easy to see who the villains
are and what will end up happening, but what happens next is sketchy.  You
know the end, but not the middle.  Such a combination makes for what will
come off on the average viewer as a good mystery and come off on the
intelligent viewer as mindless fun.
 Unlike Con Air, which had no plot, the plot of The General's Daughter is
sufficient to carry it through the 116 minute running time, albeit with a
few times where it appears to drag its feet.  James Woods remains my drug of
choice for any movie which has a manipulative, dark character and he plays a
psychological warfare Colonel to near-perfection.  Madeleine Stowe proves
once again that she is one of the hidden treasures of Hollywood, an actress
able to make a proverbial shwing and actually perform well at the same time.
James Cromwell continues his typecasted-as-sinister routine.  All through
the movie, I kept hearing "Boy-o", his most used line from LA Confidential.
 All of that said and done, The General's Daughter lacks in more respects
than it has assets.  For instance, Simon West wastes John Travolta as an
actor; not to mention doesn't expand on the ideas that should be expanded
upon.  He is one of the many ex-MTV directors who have no clue how to handle
film past four minutes.  Face it boys, if you can't change a reel, don't
ever get into the features.  The script is terrible and the action is worse.
You never really feel care or tension.
 But, it's fun.  And, in summer, fun is all that matters.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
Open Your Eyes -- A review of Eyes Wide Shut
Written by Stanley Kubrick and Frederic Raphael
Based upon the novel "Traumnovelle (Rhapsody: A Dream Story)" by Arthur
Schnitzler
Starring Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Todd Field, and Leelee
Sobieski
 I feel as if my life up to the current point should be divided into three
parts.  The first part consists of having not seen or heard of Eyes Wide
Shut.  During this period, I may have seen a few Kubrick efforts (Dr.
Strangelove, The Shining, 2001: A Space Odyssey and Spartacus), but I did
not know of his current, highly controversial project: Eyes Wide Shut.
 The second part is made up of the two and a half years since I discovered
that Stanley Kubrick was making this film and the day -- today -- that I saw
it.  At the time, I had already been a critic for a year and a half.  I was
beginning to consider doing retrospectives, was renting as many films as I
could afford. I saw The Shining again and again, rented Full Metal Jacket
and A Clockwork Orange (FMJ I didn't care for... as crazy as it sounds, I
loved A Clockwork Orange), and began my long period of waiting.
 This period of waiting, of the collective millions of Kubrick fans and
thousands of movie critics keeping their eyes and their ears open for any
news of the final result was a quieter mirror to the louder (yet equally
obsessed) fans of Star Wars, who awaited George Lucas' next effort.  Several
of us wavered, headed into the Star Wars anticipation camp, but the faithful
remained.
 I can almost picture some publicist at Warner having the mixed reaction of
sorrow and raw joy.  Everyone knew, at that point, that you couldn't buy
publicity like this.  A few days before his death there was the infamous
teaser of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman doing it in front of a mirror.
During the season finale of "ER", the full teaser hit home and everyone was
talking about this movie.
 For my initial reaction, check out www.filmcritic.com 's features section,
where you will find EYES WIDE *&!@?: Why Eyes Wide Shut will not succumb to
the hype curse.
 For the next two months we were bombarded with hype about Eyes Wide Shut
with few words being said.  Magazines did features on the movie asking
various questions, and getting no answers.  Certain people speculated
correctly and incorrectly about what happened in the movie.  We all heard
about the NC-17 or R debate concerning the orgy sequence.
 Time featured Tom licking Nicole.  Rolling Stone had Nicole's breasts being
guarded by a cowboy hat.  Esquire had her in that "oh so nice" dress and had
the balls to say what every other magazine knew but wouldn't admit to:
Nicole has a nice ass.
 Us speculated that the movie was going to be the sexiest film ever.  Yet,
aside from a few sequences that are revealed to us (the majority of which
are cards played in the first hour of the 2:33 movie), we saw nothing of the
movie, and knew nothing much about the plot.
 Opening day greeted it with glowing reviews from everyone except
Entertainment Weekly, who gave this film a lackluster review.  Yet none of
them, in my mind, fulfilled their functions as a critic as far as a movie
this big is concerned.
 The function of the critic is not only to inform over the quality of a
picture (whether it is a good film or a bad film), the entertainment value
of the film (whether it was fun to see or made you want to sleep), but also
on the nature of the film itself.  On its soul.
 I was once having a discussion about the difference between drawing
(doodling, not to say that actually drawing itself isn't art) and art with a
poet and a painter.  "Drawing," the poet stipulated, "was when a piece
contained none of the person."  "No," the painter replied.  "Drawing
contains less of a person that art, but drawing still contains some of a
person."
 "You're both wrong," I said.  "The difference between drawing just plain
old anything, and the definition of art itself, is that art crosses the line
between being a part of a person and having a consciousness all of its own.
It is not to say that art is artificially intelligent: a man-made sentience,
but instead that it chooses to mimic sentience.  It becomes its own being,
and, although we are its creators, we have little control over altering it."
 Eyes Wide Shut, a film truly able to be called art, does contain a mimicry
of sentience.  Like all great art, the mimicry is so complete that you are
indeed able to convince yourself that this is a sentience, that this is a
reality.  It may not be yours, but it is a reality.
 Like all realities, Eyes Wide Shut contains people (not characters), it
contains places (not locations), it contains events (not things that
happened).  The distinction between all of these pairs lies in tone.
Whereas someone can be quite a character, they are not truly a person until
you know them.  Where as you have the location of the movie being New York
City, its place is somewhere surreal, dreamlike (hence being like
Traumnovelle, or Rhapsody: A Dream Story).  While things occur in all
movies, only events alter.
 Like our reality, Eyes Wide Shut contains heavy amounts of decadence, sex,
and profanity.  It contains drugs and alcohol, good and bad.  It contains
unfavorable people, sinister events, and moments of revelation.
 To begin dispelling rumors Eyes Wide Shut is not, as Us magazine claimed it
would be, the sexiest film of all time.  In fact, having watched literally
thousands of films, I do not hesitate to call Eyes Wide Shut the most
thoroughly unsexy movie of all time.  Unlike the characteristic sex in
movies, which is literally a thing that happens, with no consequences, Eyes
Wide Shut shows the side of sex that Hollywood truly loathes: sex as an
event.
 Eyes Wide Shut is about sex in the fact that it concerns the grave effects
that sex has upon people.  As described, it is a thriller of jealousy and
sexual obsession.  It is not a thriller in the American sense, with guns or
psychopathic killers.  Nor does it contain anything of pure evil (although
there are points at which you will no doubt feel that it does).
 Instead, Eyes Wide Shut is both Kubrick's final film and his final step in
becoming an expatriate.  It has nothing American left in it... it is, at its
core, a very British film.  The suspense is neither physical, nor visceral,
nor psychological, but instead intellectual.  There are points where we have
Bill Harford (Cruise) being followed by the tall dark stranger and where we
have an-oh-so-cruel smile by Alice (Kidman), but these are the only moments
where any hint of psychological terror comes to mind.  Instead, we have more
intellectual frights; twists of plot that shock us, and a flawless mastery
over filmmaking.
 To describe the plot, it concerns an argument between Bill and Alice about
a Christmas party at which both were the subject of highly amorous advances
(Bill by two models, Alice by Hungarian mystery man who acts like a complete
snake).  In this argument, which contains perhaps the most intelligent
banter ever to go back and forth on the nature of jealousy and desire, Alice
admits to having an erotic encounter with a sailor in Cape Cod the previous
summer.
 As the pain of adultery hits home, Bill is called to see one of his
patients' daughter, because the patient has just died.  The daughter, facing
marriage, admits to a love she has harbored for Bill and offers herself to
him, only to be interrupted by her fiancé's arrival.  Bill, startled by this
revelation, leaves the house and spends hours wandering the streets of New
York.  He finds himself near a prostitute, and almost commits adultery
himself.  Via jazz musician Nick Nightingale (Todd Field), he discovers
about an orgy for the rich that occurs weekly at a different location each
time.
 He goes to this place, again trying to delve himself into decadence, only
to be faced with death and be saved by a woman who takes his place.  He also
runs into a costume and tuxedo salesman who pimps his 15 year old daughter
out (played by Leelee Sobieski, who steals the scene away from Cruise (and
we're talking Cruise's finest performance ever)).
The masked men behind the orgy (which is almost druid-like in nature) have
him followed and threaten his family.   Cruise, seeing the mask from the
party in his place in bed, realizes his mistakes and promises to confess
everything.  To an American audience, this will come as a highly
disappointing climax to a film that, despite a lack of physical action, is
thoroughly gripping.  However, I, a lover of independent and foreign cinema
as well as intellectual films, tend to enjoy these types of climaxes.  The
moments at which a full change is realized.
 Eyes Wide Shut is probably the most highly anticipated film (by film
lovers, that is), in years, and, although most people expecting tons of sex
will be highly disappointed by the film's lack of rampant sex (although it
is very high in nudity), I am very pleased at the result.  In fact, this is
the point in the review where I call it THE BEST FILM OF THE YEAR.
 One gripe that many seem to have with Eyes Wide Shut -- its look of
artificiality is what I consider to be its greatest technical asset.
Although Cruise, Kidman, and Pollack will score nominations for Best Actor,
Actress, and Supporting Actor, the cinematography in the film and the set
design are both worth mentioning.  The film was shot not in New York City,
but instead on soundstages in London, England, and thus it contains a
slightly off-kilter feel to it.  It looks like New York City on the surface,
but then tiny things seem different.  This place seems to have too many
extras, and that place too few.  The people are too nice at one moment and
too cruel and the next.  Certain parts of the city are too bright for New
York, and certain parts are too dark.  Because of this, we have the feeling
that we are both in and out of New York City.  That the film is being both
realistic and unrealistic at the same time.
 The film grain is either similar or identical to that used in A Clockwork
Orange, which gave off the same sense of artificiality.  In A Clockwork
Orange, we felt that the film was like a nightmare.  Eyes Wide Shut displays
the same brilliance.  Both of these aspects make the film dreamlike, which
is what Eyes Wide Shut is about... a dream world.
 Also of note is the fact that Cinematographer Larry Smith is the very first
cinematographer to be so skilled that you feel as if he is literally playing
with the shadows.  He overlights the initial party sequence, uses natural
lighting for many of the scenes on the street, and underlights in the
bedroom and in the already infamous orgy sequence.  He also chooses, as does
Kubrick, to not focus on the act of sex but instead upon the aftermath (the
scene in front of the mirror, which is 30 to 90 seconds in the ads,
depending on a censored or an uncensored version, is only about 15-20
seconds in the movie itself), opting often to slide right past the sight of
copulation to focus on something else that may be more trivial (it is a
perfect metaphor, that the camera, like us, should want to both stay and
turn away at the same time).
 Eyes Wide Shut should be see as Bill's odyssey to become bad contrasting
his failure to do so.  Although he attempts to commit his own adultery, Bill
eventually fails.  He is, at his heart, a good man, faithful to Alice to the
end... no matter what may come between them.
 Thank you, Stanley Kubrick.  If, after all that waiting, you turned out
something bad, I could never forgive you.

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
Written by George Miller, Judy Morris (Luigis Ladies), and Mark Lamprel
Starring: James Cromwell (LA Confidential), Magda Szubanski
With the voices of: Elizabeth Daily (Babe), Danny Mann (Babe), Steven Wright
(Deep Rising)
The problem with sequels is that they try too much to be like the original.
Sure, there are a few exceptions. I can't think of any right off the top of
my head, but rule #665 in The Critic's Bible: there are exceptions to every
rule. Babe, by all accounts, was an intelligent, thought out movie. Babe II:
Pig in the City, tries and tries but can't quiet do it.
Sure, the humor is moderately intelligent and the narration includes things
like a mention of the chaos theory, but when it boils down to it, Babe II
was just like every other sequel: an attempt to carbon copy the original.
But, friends, the great copy machine known as Hollywood is broken, and has
never gotten a repairman, so we are doomed to watch screwed up attempts at
copying, remakes gone wrong, and things screwed up.
Babe II disappoints. It disappoints so much that I'll give you the plot
summary and then leave you be because talking about it makes my relive the
relative boredom of sitting in front of the screen with talking animals on
it.
Babe comes back from winning the sheep-herding contest he won last movie
and, when the farmer is injured and the farm goes into debt, Babe has to go
to the city. Of course he's separated from his human and of course he saves
the day for man and animal alike. There's really nothing that's anything but
simplistic about it. It's a movie void with laughs.
Now I promised I'd shut up so I will, but if you see Babe II, don't come to
me complaining about it.

Title
Review for Ladies Man, The (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/845fb5161e1558bd882569770011bd2f?OpenDocument
Ok.  Where in the contract for an SNL cast-member does it stipulate that
they will finance your ill-conceived film, no matter what it is?  What
kind of shyster agent dreamed that one up?  And why does said movie ever
have to be granted approval to be released to the general public?
These three questions, along with "How the hell does a lisping moron
actually have game?" predominate a thinking viewer's mind as it wanders
through the cerebrally deficient film The Ladies Man.  But then your
brain reminds you that you're not here for it.  You're here so your
brain can turn off for a long, long time.
The Ladies Man is the latest of those SNL skits to turn "pro" as a
feature length film.  Joining the ranks of such greats as Wayne's World
and such abysmal failures as A Night at the Roxbury, The Ladies Man only
earns the modest title of being one of the better SNL spin-offs thanks
to the utter failure of most of its competition.  Sure, there are some
laughs.  And you can count tem on both hands, but will you even bother
renting this film?  I doubt it.
For those who don't know the story (which is to say, the lead
character), Leon Phelps (Tim Meadows) is the ladies man: a lewd Chicago
sex show host that comes off like Howard Stern with a speech impediment
and a lower IQ.  Fired from his radio station after breaking FCC codes,
Leon and his producer Julie (Karyn Parsons) head off in search of new
jobs, a mysterious millionaire benefactor, and true love.
Although this proves to be minimally enjoyable at times, and although
there is a musical number about a group of people devoted to killing
Phelps that will make you bust out laughing, the rest of the movie
proves to be so poorly constructed that it's almost unbearable.  While
I'm not yet yearning for It's Pat, the Sequel, the prospect of ever
seeing The Ladies Man again sounds too unbearable to stand.
Director: Reginald Hudlin
Producer: Lorne Michaels
Writer: Tim Meadows, Dennis McNicholas, Andrew Steele
Starring: Tim Meadows, Karyn Parsons, Will Ferrell, Lee Evans,
Tiffani-Amber Thiessen
http://www.ladiesmanmovie.com/index_net.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Lenny Bruce: Swear to Tell the Truth (1998)
Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth (1998, NR)
Written, Directed, and Produced by Robert B. Weide
 Having proved his ability to handle writing and producing narrative film
with Mother Night, Robert Weide and the crew of WhyADuck productions take on
a much more difficult medium with Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth.  The
documentary, highly easy to do badly, can be just as emotional touching,
just as engaging as the narrative film.  The majority of them, obviously,
are not.  A very select few are able to touch you like the narrative film
can, are able to pull you in and make you experience them.
 I have seen probably fifty documentaries in my time.  I have reviewed four
of them.  Only two of the documentaries I have ever seen have been able to
engage me like Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth did.
 Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth tells of social satirist and comedian
Lenny Bruce, who, in the process of exercising his own personal demons,
offended just about everyone and made a good half of us laugh during the
1960s.  All right, I wasn't even alive in the 1960s, but he still was
capable of making me laugh even after his death.
 We've probably heard his name mentioned.  We may even know a few of his
bits.
 Lenny's humor, as the documentary illustrates, was often marked towards the
Catholic church. It took on issues that America simply did not want to talk
about and stuck them right out in the open.  He became a marked man,
offending the wrong people and getting arrested in nearly every city in
America for obscenity or drug charges.  However, he stuck to his guns about
opposing the hypocrisy in everyday life, something which we now admire in
comedians such as John Leguizamo (from Freak: "Dad, why don't you just quit
drinking? Because I'm not a quitter") and Chris Rock (from Bigger and
Blacker: "Old black men didn't have to deal with that I can't get a cab
shit.  He was the cab.").  It was a position that cost him his career, his
fortune, and, eventually, his life.
 Sparsely narrated by Robert DeNiro and composed mostly of archival footage,
you are given the feeling that you are not as much watching a documentary as
watching a story unfoldthe exact goal of good documentaries.
 The film is short, bittersweet, and to the point.  It is reminiscent of
Julian Schnabel's first and only film, Basquiat, which paints a similar
portrait of the lives of Andy Warhol and Jean Michael Basquait, both pop
artists who died tragically.  It also reminds me personally of my friend
Ronald G. Shafer's documentary Donald Hall and Jane Kenyon: "Keeping you
Safe Beside Me", about the tragic death of poet Jane Kenyon.
 The lesson to be learned from this would be simply that, occasionally, true
life is better than fiction.  The truth is better than what we concoct.
And, if shown properly, it can bring you to the point of tears in a way all
the more powerful because of its truth.

Title
Review for Producers, The (1968)
Starring Zero Mostel, Gene Wilder, Dick Shawn, Kenneth Mars, Christopher
Hewett
 Mel Brooks' directorial debut occurred in 1968.  It was his gift to the
world.  And, you might ask, what was his gift originally titled?  Springtime
for Hitler.  Springtime for Hitler, re-titled The Producers (probably for
reasons of political correctness, which the film appears not to give a damn
about), was a movie about two theatre producers who take it upon themselves
to make a fortune off of a flop.
 This unlikely scam features the seduction of old ladies for financing, the
purchasing of a script titled: `Springtime for Hitler: A Musical Romp with
Adolf and Eva', the hiring of the worst director and actor possible, and, of
course, setting it all to music.
 The best way to characterize this film is as a charicature of Hilter as a
cheaply-drawn cartoon with his pants down around his ankles singing at the
top of his lungs.  It is both that striking, that immature, and that funny.
Zero Mostel, although not giving a great performance, does his best with the
role offerred to him and excels in it, as does Gene Wilder, who plays and
accountant-turned-producer with as much neuroses as Woody Allen.
 The film doesn't have speed to it: it lumbers along, taking it's time to
get to punchlines which strike the viewer as perfectly delivered.  Instead
of speed it has a brilliant script, filled with jokes and quips and
wittiness and turned out by Mel Brooks himself, allowing us all to view his
genius at an early stage.
 I don't normally watch films from the sixties: I don't make an effort not
to watch them, but I don't go out of my way for them, either.  This film,
however, was recommended to me by a friend and I, in turn, recommend it to
you.  It's childlike in its silliness, adult in its message of how utterly
idiotic starting WWII was, and downright brilliant besides.  This film, like
Casablanca, Citizen Kane, Touch of Evil, and Gone with the Wind is worth
going out of your way for.
 It won the 1968 Academy Award for Best Original Screenplay, and wins my
respect for the way the lines are deliever.  Gene Wilder's most memorable
moment is when he goes into hysterics, holding his blankie (literally), and
delivers the line `I'm hysterical!  I'm hysterical, I'm hysterical, I'm
hysterical!'  when water is put in his face he pauses for a moment and
screams and says, `I'm wet and I'm still hysterical!  I'm hysterical and I'm
wet!'  When he is then slapped he screams again and says, `I'm wet, I'm
hysterical, and I'm in pain!'
 Mel Brooks has always delivered a strange mix of message and humor (with
the exception of Robin Hood: Men in Tights and Dracula: Dead and Loving it,
which simply delivered humor), and it is prevalent  in this film.  He uses
this opportunity to make fun of Hitler and Nazism in general, as well as,
without once mentioning Hollywood, the strange system that exists in the
City of Lights.
Sure, you see films like Get Shorty and The Player and The End of Violence,
set in Hollywood and dealing with producers, and you know it's a satire of
the system, but, when you watch The Producers, it's not the first thing that
occurs to you.  It is, like message should be in all good films, hidden just
beneath the surface.  Having the director being sure that he's funny and
having the producers butter him up for directing a flop picking an actor
who does good by mistake.  It has gumption to be this subversive, and is all
the more lovable for that.
 As I've said: it came recommended, I'm sending it off recommended.

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c59282bf90b124ce8825686f00209bc9?OpenDocument
Story by William Malone and Daniel Chuba
Starring James Spader, Angela Bassett, Robert Forster, Lou Diamond
Phillips, Peter Facinelli, Robin Tunney, and Wilson Cruz
 When near objects of immense gravity such as black holes, it is said
that all things bend.  Perhaps it is only fitting that a movie such as
Supernova, which poses as sci-fi / mystery / horror and that takes place
near an object of large gravity, should have the plot twists bent.
Common sense tells us that if you bend something that is already bent it
will either become more bent or straighten out.  Supernova's plot twists
straight out, and the result is something completely by the books.
 Supernova is the story about a rescue vessel sent into deep space to
pick someone up from a rogue moon.  To make a short story shorter, they
find both the person (who is, of course, accompanied with creepy music)
and an alien artifact capable of creating new matter.  Every person who
touches the stuff becomes endowed with superhuman strength.
 Since the creepy guy the crew picked up from the planet has touched the
thing, and since he is obviously the bad guy, the rest of the crew
spends all of their time trying to stop him.
 That's about it.  I have eliminated your need to see it.
 Supernova is so absolutely traditional that it voyages into the realm
of idiocy.  It is as if someone had taken the morons guide to sci-fi and
used it to create a film, step by step, with no originality.
 The cast is remarkably top-notch for the occasion.  Angela Bassett,
James Spader, Robert Forster, Robin Tunney, and Lou Diamond Phillips
help comprise the cast of what amounts to a very bad movie.  If they had
all combined their talent, rewrote the script, and filmed it themselves
they could have done better.
 As proof of how much this film is terrible, even the director didn't
want it on him.  Although the director is credited as Thomas Lee, he is
actually Walter Hill of 48 Hours and Last Man Standing.  Any time a
director tries to conceal the fact that they made the picture, it is bad
news, and Supernova is proof of this thesis.
 The last really, really cheesy sci-fi horror about a rescue vessel,
Event Horizon had some Latin in it: liberte tutu meus ex inferni.  The
translation of this is "Save yourself from Hell."  Save yourself from
Supernova it's a step in the right direction.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Mother Night (1996)
Written by Robert Weide (Lenny Bruce: Swear to tell the Truth)
Starring Nick Nolte, Sheryl Lee, Alan Arkin, John Goodman, Kristen Dunst
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 As a critic, I try to do justice to a film.  If the film is bad, this is
incredibly easy.  It is much easier to destroy than to create, to rip than
to extol.  As I have often mentioned, it is the good reviews that are
difficult to write.  I have a conflict between the desire to write a review
worthy of the movie as well as to write a review different than the ones
that I see every day.
 You see, bad reviews vary endlessly.  When faced with the raw anger one
feels towards a bad movie it is easy to channel this rage into a sort of
maligned creativity and to bring forth a new, humorous, and often refreshing
movie review.  When a movie is good, however, the critic is faced with the
difficulty of coming up with something good to say about it.  Put in
layman's terms, we are often faced with writer's block.
 At least a dozen times I have watched Mother Night.  At least a dozen times
I have been blown away by its lyricism, by its dark humor and by its raw
dramatic power.  At least a dozen times I have had absolutely no clue how to
word my praises.
 My undying desire to be somewhat original in my critique has led me to the
conclusion that what I do so often is not a critique per se, but instead a
column.  A pondering on the nature of things where I try to offer a new and
interesting perspective on an old debate.
 With this self-revelation, the subject of the debate brought forth by
Mother Night is why people are so threatened by touchy subjects that they
ignore perfectly great films.
 Mother Night, the story of American spy Howard W. Campbell, Jr., a man who
has worked his way up to the top of the Nazi propaganda ministry, lost his
wife (the only thing that made his life worth living in his eyes), and now,
15 years later, is being forced to confront the question "did I do more harm
than good?" is one of those films that is perfectly inoffensive to all who
watch it yet pissed everyone who didn't see it off on principle.  It deals
highly with moral questions, coming to the point early on in the quote "be
careful what you pretend to be, because, in the end, you are what you
pretend to be."  Yet the chief complaint that I have heard about the film is
that it is too offensive, too anti-Semitic to watch.
 On pure cinematic grounds, the film is excellent.  It has perfect story
structure, humor at the right parts, seriousness when necessary.  It has
mystery, it has tension.  It has a believable set of characters (although
the group of Nazis living in New York including the Reverend Doctor Lionel
Jones "D.D.S., D.D." are perhaps the funniest charicature of the stupidity
and hypocrisy of prejudicial behavior.).  It has a plot that is not too far
out there considering the numerous other true stories involving spies in the
propaganda ministry.
Nick Nolte (although this sounds the very cliché I wish to avoid) plays his
part to such steely perfection that you cannot help but identify with him
and his plight, but understand his actions.  Sheryl Lee takes a break from
her idiosyncratic routine of being the weirdo ("Twin Peaks", Twin Peaks:
Fire Walk with Me, John Carpenter's Vampires) and shines in what translates
to a very large supporting role and John Goodman does a lot better in Mother
Night than he has in any film in the past twenty years.
 Yet something about this film annoys so many people that it was overlooked.
 It came out in 1996, the year where The English Patient made its sweep at
the Academy Awards.  Mother Night is much better than Secrets & Lies, the
shoo-in nomination, and at least as good as The English Patient, if not
slightly better.  I realize I have spoken treason at this point in time but
am beyond caring.
 The fact it is that Mother Night is one of a cadre of films that is swept
under the rug due to the fact that it hits some cultural hot button to the
average (slightly prejudicial) person.  These films are so great that they
deserve to be nominated if not win awards but instead become just your
general word-of-mouth only films.  In 1996, it was Mother Night, a film
which dealt candidly with Nazism and poked fun (in a satirical way) at the
ideals of that completely idiotic belief system.  In 1997, it was Chasing
Amy, which spoke openly about lesbianism, and modern sexuality and was fond
of using profanity (but no more fond than half the films by Oliver Stone or
other A-list directors.)  In 1998, Lolita and Smoke Signals were swept under
the rug.  Smoke Signals was allowed to be shown in this country and dealt
with father-son relationships and Indians without particular axes to grind.
Lolita, closely based on the novel by Vladmir Nabaknov, was one of the few
films that admits that not only are teens having sex, but that all people,
no matter what their ages, are capable of understanding the power that it
can hold over someone and capable of abusing it.  The film was not allowed
to be shown in the United States, and can only be found now on Showtime or
in your local video store.  It showed little nudity and contained no
profanity.
 Similarly, going back to Mother Night, this film uses no profanity that our
society considers "serious", nor is it excessively violent or sexual.  With
the editing of a few frames, it would be suitable for network broadcast with
no further complications.
 All of these films deserved Best Picture nods (come on, did we really need
to nominate The Full Monty, The Thin Red Line, or Elizabeth).  All of these
films did less than 20 million in the box office.  All of these films are
excellent.
 The thing which all of these films share is that the general public trusted
what they heard as spoken by a few conservatives who did not give these
films a chance.  Anyone who has seen any of the aforementioned movies knows
that, although they hit on subjects that are touchy, they are careful not to
 tread on toes.  They know that Mother Night is not, as some people have
claimed, anti-Semitic, but instead anti-anti-Semitic.  They know that
Chasing Amy and Lolita are both films that, in the end, contain heavy
morals.  They know that Smoke Signals is not a political statement but not
saying anything but instead a simple story about forgiving one's father.
 I make a call to all movie patrons.  To all people reading my message.  It
was said in Mother Night that National Socialism will exist as long as
people are thinking with their guts and not with their minds.  Although the
Nazis in the film cheer at this, this is a backhanded insult towards them
and a joke at their hypocrisy and stupidity.  This same hypocrisy is shown
when people prejudge a film based on profanity, or violence, or a political
or sexual message that they do not yet know of.  Stop following the people
telling you that this film or that film is offensive.  Stop following the
politicians that say that movies and violence on television corrupts your
mind.  The true moral in Mother Night, in addition to not pretending to be
something you're not, is that you have a mind, and that you should exercise
it instead of going on the propaganda life spoon feeds you.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Starring Ben Affleck, Sandra Bullock, and Maura Tierney
     Scratch the thesis set forth in the review of Never Been Kissed.
Hollywood, as the year goes on, becomes progressively worse.  Why?  Because
you don't expect it to be bad.  Through some constant naiveté that the movie
buff displays of believing that movies will somehow ever improve, they
forget that the movies are destined to fail.  In January, when we all expect
bad movies, they are not as much of a disappointment.  In February, as
things start to improve, they are mildly surprising.  In November and
December, they're downright shocking.  In April I was greeted by the
terrible movie Forces of Nature, after seeing a streak of fairly good
movies.
     Forces of Nature follows Ben Holmes (Ben Affleck) in his undying quest
to marry his undying love, Bridget (Maura Tierney).  Note the key word here
is undying.  No matter how much you want someone to croak, no one does.
     Ben, your basic neurotic blurb writer whose afraid of flying, goes down
to wed his bride in good old Savannah, George on a flight out of La Guardia
that doesn't make it off the ground due to birds flying in the engine.  This
is only the start of his troubles.  He saves the life and befriends the wild
and tediously uninteresting Sarah Lewis (Sandra Bullock), who manages to get
him a ride with pot smoking Vic, and basically manages to screw up every
single chance he would ever have of getting married.
     Ben, Sarah, and Bridget are your basic stock characters, pulled out of
the closet of Dreamworks' dying creative ability.  Ben you would find in the
dictionary under neurotic, stupid, and sappy.   Sarah you would find under
psychotic, can't hold a job, and new-age.   Of course, as always in the
cinema, opposites get over their initial revulsion to one another and
attract, ending up being a match made somewhere in hell.
     Of the many virtues that screenwriter Marc Lawrence declined to give
this film, comedy and drama reign supreme.   Although you can see that the
film is trying to be funny, is trying to touch your heart, it ends up about
as touching and funny as your standard action film.  If the guy really
wanted to turn out something enjoyable, he should have handed Uzi's to the
two main characters midway through the movie and had them shoot their way to
Savannah past drug dealers on their tail.  It would have at least been an
unexpected plot twist.
     The only thing the film actually succeeds in doing is being
predictable, which any old idiot with a pen can do.  I talked to a theatre
employee afterwards who had a much better ending to the movie than the one
put in front of me.  In its effort to make a twist, the film ends up taking
a turn for the worse (if such a thing is possible) at the ending.  For that,
I suppose you can say that it will come as a surprise to the majority of
moviegoers... but not to this one.
     I would like to claim that without the stupid and supposedly surprise
ending the film would be half-decent, but it wouldn't.  Who are we kidding,
anyway?  Forces of Nature not only was the terrible film of the day, it was
the terrible film of the year.  It was almost as bad as The Mod Squad, which
set a new low for the already low genre of action movies.  Forces of Nature,
too, bottoms out its genre.  Even The Wedding Singer, my previous pick for
worst romantic comedy ever, made me laugh at one point.  In Forces of Nature
the only time my mouth opened was to say, "I've been there" when the two
main characters arrive at a place called "South of the Border" which is
about an hour south of my old home.  Yeah, they don't get much worse than
Forces of Nature.
     But, hey, look on the bright side: if you're a masochist, it's just
what the doctor ordered.

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d1ef9e765c4d12e388256887006315e7?OpenDocument
Starring Bruce Willis, Matthew Perry, Amanda Peet, Michael Duncan,
Natasha Henstridge, Rosanna Arquette, Kevin Pollack, and Harland
Williams
 Let the record state that I expected the worst from The Whole Nine
Yards.  February release date, the girl from Species (all right, so that
was the good part), Bruce Willis (again) attempting comedy.  As a Magic
Eight Ball would tell us, `outlook not so good.'
 Let the record also state that, while watching a bad movie, I either
carry a scribble pad or make mental notes of possible pot shots that I
can shoot off at the movie in my review.  Since I am afforded no
`possible insult' rating system, I translate the pot shots into stars.
For about every ten easy insults a film gives me, I subtract a star from
its rating (baring Airplane, which is designed to cooperate with the pot
shot system and thus is immune to its barbs).  The Whole Nine Yards gave
me thirteen pot shots.  Rounding, we get our current star rating.
 The Whole Nine Yards, like 1997's Grosse Pointe Blank, is the tale of
hit men (and, in Whole Nine Yards, women) in love.  To give you the
quick version of as Byzantine of a plot as I have witnessed in a popcorn
film in a long time, Nick `Oz' Ozeransky (Perry) is worth more dead than
alive.  This fact, combined with the fact that his wife (Arquette) is
pretty much el puta anyways, prompts her to attempt to hire a contact
killer.  Her first attempt declines the offer.  Her second attempt is
the new next-door neighbor, Jimmy the Tulip Tudeski (Willis).  There's
only one slight problem Willis has become a fast friend of Oz's.
 Sadly, due to money problems, Nick's wife has sent him off to Chicago
to rat Jimmy to Yanni Gogolack (Kevin Pollack), a gangster of Hungarian
heritage that never is able to get his j's or v's yust right.  While in
Chicago, Nick meets and becomes smitten with Jimmy's wife, Cynthia
(Henstridge).  Sadly, Yanni has decided to enlist the help of Frankie
(Michael Duncan) to get rid of Jimmy.  Oh, yeah, any Nick's secretary
(Amanda Peet) wants to be a hit woman, too.
 The Whole Nine Yards ends up being both effortlessly funny,
effortlessly hip, and, surprisingly, effortlessly romantic it is
perhaps the oddest Valentine's Day movie to go watch.  Jonathan Lynn,
who handled he aloof but funny dark comedy Clue, manages to provide an
incredibly tight direction for a crime comedy.  Insofar as any comedy
can be truly suspenseful, The Whole Nine Yards is.  Not grading on the
same curve, The Whole Nine Yards still manages to be mysterious.
 The film ends up being an incredibly guilty pleasure not only because
of that fact that it is a dark comedy (and we all know that we shouldn't
laugh at someone getting shot, but such is often the case), but also
because of the fact that the film ends up being incredibly sexy.  Amanda
Peet, in particular, plays the sexy hit-woman intern and, in one scene
where she sticks her naked torso out of the window, we see that her
character's persona isn't the only thing to get perky.
 Aside from the aforementioned easy insult scale, I have to subtract
points from this film for two reasons: Harland Williams and Rosanna
Arquette.  Harland Williams has about five to ten minutes of screen
time, and annoys you for every second that he's on.  Rosanna Arquette
would be wonderful as the annoying wife if she didn't play the part a
little too well.  Also, the film borrows a little too much from its
predecessors (i.e. Grosse Pointe Blank), and seems to be desperate to be
hip although it already obviously is.
 Still, this is the true movie for Valentine's Day.  Forget the fact
that said day will be 11 days in the past when The Whole Nine Yards hits
theatres it's still worth making a date of.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Directed and Photographed by Doug Liman
Starring Katie Holmes, Sarah Polley, Desmond Askew, Scott Wolf, Jay Mohr,
Nathan Bexton, Timothy Olyphant, Robert Peters, Taye Diggs, and J.E. Freeman
     Go is fun.  Go is the kind of fun that makes you want a cigarette
afterwards and, a bad mark on it, leaves some of us wanting more.
 The plot of Go is reminiscient of a country song I once heard: "Why Don't
We Get Drunk and Screw?" except that in Go, the refrain should be: "Why
Don't We Hit Pot and Screw?".  A classic demonstration of sex, drugs, and
rock 'n roll, Go takes us on a non-linear, multi-faceted view of a drug
deal.
     We watch the SNAFU go down from three viewpoints, taking us back and
forth through time and space and ending up where we began.  If it sounds
like Pulp Fiction, you shouldn't be surprised.  In basic story structure,
the two films are near carbon copies.  In Pulp Fiction, it tells the story
of two hits gone wrong with diversions in between, and in Go we see the
story of a drug deal gone wrong, with diversions in between.  There is,
however, a notable difference.  Pulp Fiction was a serious movie with some
comedic elements.  Go is a comedic movie with some serious elements.  That
is why I told people expecting something serious to get lost.
     To go into detail about the plot, we have Ronna (Sarah Polley from The
Sweet Hereafter and Exotica), a girl behind on her rent who decides to deal
drugs and work extra shifts in order to avoid being evicted.  She gets set
up to deal drugs by two gay soap actors working for cops, Zach (Jay Morh)
and Adam (Scott Wolf) and is aided in the act by her friends Claire (Katie
Holmes) and Mannie (Nathan Bexton) and the LA drug dealer Todd Gaines
(Timothy Olyphant).  When the deal goes wrong, Ronna is forced to flush the
real Ecstasy and ends up dealing Baby Asprin at a Christmas Rave.
     Meanwhile, in Vegas, the normal drug dealer, Simon (Desmond Askew) is
having a ball in Vegas.  He loses money, has a threesome where he attains a
new spiritual high, sets a room on fire because one of the girls set tissues
on fire as she plugged her nose in order to take a bong hit.  Running from
that, he teams up with Marcus (Taye Diggs), a black guy who keeps being
mistaken for a hotel worker due to his race.  Marcus, as a revenge of sorts,
steals a ferarri which happens to have a 9mm in it and the two of them go to
a strip club, where Simon steals a bouncer.  The bouncer, of course, has a
psychotic father (J.E. Freeman) who begins to chase them through Vegas and
L.A.
     The film is a technical masterpiece but a sad spot of storytelling.
Incredibly strong in the realm of dark comedy, it then tries to suddenly be
serious and ends up annoying people like me.  Look, if you're going to have
a point than have a point, and if you're not, don't try.
     Aside from that it is an incredibly cool movie.  People obsessed with
the movies will be awestruck at Liman's capability to capture the rave so
completely, which he does by using some of the best lighting effects
captured on the silver screen (furthermore, it does not lack the idiotic
error of seeing the Stedicam's shadow that we saw in Swingers).  People
obsessed with music will love the soundtrack, which includes No Doubt and
Natalie Imbruglia (the No Doubt song, at the risk of sounding like a stupid
member of my MTV generation, kicks ass).  People who are obsessed with drugs
will just love the drugs.
     The film is gifted with scenes funnier than you are normally greeted
with in a drug movie.  In Cheech and Chong, we just saw them act stoned.  In
Go, we see them being high.  Two strange drug sequences occur as an Ecstasy
double-dosed junkie imagines tangoing with a fellow check out lady and is
later talked to about Chinest nationalists by a cat.  Another beautiful
moment comes when a bunch of yuppie teens trick each other into believing
that sinus medicine is Ecstasy in the midst of a Ford Windstar.
     Not a film for anyone who minds drugs, sex, profanity, and the general
yada yada yada that I don't care about, it still comes off as an extreme
dose of fun for twentysomethings and below.  Just know this coming in to Go.
Don't smoke pot during this film: you get all the same effects by just
watching it.

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
Great.  Here I am, writing a review of yet another cheesy, clichéd, Ben
Affleck romantic comedy in which I will probably be flamed by Affleck
fans, Paltrow fans, romantics, teens, and widows.  Yeah widows.  Why? 
Because Bounce is the latest in a string of contrived romantic comedies
to feature a man falling for a widow whom he helped to make a widow.
Yeah it's our old friends Bob and Harvey Weinstein, and this time
they're capitalizing on plane crashes, public relations companies,
alcoholics, and stalkers all in the same wicked stroke.  Here we have
Buddy Amaral (Affleck), just a good-old sweet talking ad rep who happens
to give a free first class plane ticket to a guy named Greg (Tony
Goldwyn) in order to sleep with Mimi (Natasha Henstridge really, who
wouldn't go for that)?  Of course, the plane crashes, and, wouldn't you
know it, he happens to rep the airlines.  So he does what any person
would: He drinks.
Cut to a year later, and Buddy's out of rehab and decides to take Step 8
(Contact those you have wronged and make amends) a little too seriously,
and he begins following the widowed Abby (Gwyneth Paltrow), the former
wife of Greg.  Finding out that she's a realtor, he fixes it so he rips
his own business off to the tune of $100,000, making herself a double
commission to boot.  Grateful as she is, she buys a couple of Dodgers
tickets and the two head down the eventless path towards true bliss.
If this plot thrills you, or makes you coo, "Ah, how sweet," then please
go see Bounce.  Now.  I'm sure you'll enjoy the paint-by-numbers
romance.  But let's face it, this is not exactly a great flick.  In
fact, it's downright terrible.  In fact, the idea of being romanced by
an alcoholic stalker named Buddy is a little more Silence of the Lambs
than Sliding Doors.  Writer-director Don Roos's last project, The
Opposite of Sex, was one of the most honest films about homosexual
stereotypes in recent years.  And I'll give him the benefit of the doubt
that he was trying to address issues of honesty and grieving, but this
time he crashes and burns like the plush 747 O'Hare red-eye that makes a
fiery farewell.
The performances are weak, the script couldn't hold up a toddler, and
the emotional value is slightly above that of a couple of Valium. 
Sorry, Gwen and Ben, but even that oh-so-cute non-romance we read about
at checkout lines daily can't salvage this wreck.
Director: Don Roos
Producer: Michael Bessman, Steve Golin
Writer: Don Roos
Starring: Ben Affleck, Gwyneth Paltrow, Natasha Henstridge, Jennifer
Grey, Tony Goldwyn, Joe Morton, David Paymer
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Written and Directed by David Lynch (Eraserhead)
     Most of the people who follow Lynch, his devoted cult of watchers, got
hooked with the two season "Twin Peaks" television series.  For them, the
line "She's dead... wrapped in plastic" will always have a special place in
their heart.  The newer generation of Lynch watchers were witness to Wild at
Heart and Lost Highway.  The older generation, his mainstream watchers,
probably saw The Elephant Man and Dune.  His very first devotees: Eraserhead
and Stick Figures Getting Sick.
     Although Lost Highway was my first exposure to the director, it was not
what made me fall in love with him.  What made me love the director, love
his talent for storytelling, his dark humor and quiet essayistic nature, was
his 1986 independent smash Blue Velvet.
     Blue Velvet was described to me by an avid Lynch fan that works at
Bristol-Myers Squibb in New Jersey as "about as weird as they get."  Being a
student of the strange, that piqued my interest.
     It opens up with a picturesque small town, then shows a man having a
stroke.  His son, Jeffery Beaumont (MacLachlan) comes home from college in
order to comfort his mother and aunt.  What he finds instead is the most
primal thing that we all love: a mystery.
     This mystery comes while walking in a field.  He sees a wine bottle
near a shack, begins throwing rocks at it, and bends down to pick another
rock up only to find a human ear.
     He informs the police, who really can't do much in the way of
investigating.  On his way out of the house of the detective working on the
case, a woman walks out of the darkness and asks: "Are you the one that
found the ear?"
     This is Sandy Williams (Dern), the detective's daughter, who becomes
equally enraptured in the mystery.  She informs him that she listens in on
conversations that her father has had, and that the name Dorothy Vallens
(Rossellini) has come up a number of times.
     Together, the two set it upon themselves to unravel the mystery behind
the ear.  Along the way Jeffrey is drawn into a dark and violent world,
filled with machocistic women and sadistic killers (Dennis Hopper showing
his true acting prowess).  At the same time Jeffrey finds himself torn
between two women: a completely erotic relationship with Dorothy Vallens and
an increasingly strong love for Sandy Williams.
     Blue Velvet is out there in both style and substance.  As a mystery, it
excels the art form, throws out the templates and draws brand new ones.
Every modern cinema mystery of quality I have found has had some traces of
this film in it.  As a raw story, it comes off as completely surreal.
Although you have a gritty realism to the story itself, Lynch succeeds in
shocking the unshockable: the entire film seems like a terribly realistic
nightmare.
     As far as style is concerned, the entire film is done in a very
subversive directorial style.  Lynch over-lights his days for an industrial
look, an America so superficially beautiful it begins to get on your nerves.
At night, he employs classic noir techniques: little to no lighting to make
the film terrifying.  He also films violence in slow-motion in order to make
it seem stranger, uses classic symbolism and makes fun of it at the same
time.  Also, from a sound aspect, whenever something truly climatic happens,
instead of a false note of music, the film's volume increases and a droning
sound comes on, adding to the sense that this is all a dream and that, more
than anything, you want to wake up.
     The story is best expressed as a brilliant satire of small-town life,
which Lynch has a tendency to be fascinated with (i.e. Twin Peaks).  The two
storylines -- one of the mystery and one of the romance between Jeffery and
Sandy  -- intertwine like snakes and both contain a dark, off-kilter humor.
At one point, as Jeffery is going to sneak into Dorothy's apartment at night
to search it, Sandy remarks to him: "I don't know whether you're a detective
or a pervert."  Jeffery smiles and responds: "That's for me to know and you
to find out."
    The surreal nature also inserts itself into the suspense.  Perhaps the
oddest scene in the film comes as Frank Booth beats up Jeffery to the tune
of "Candy-Colored Sandman."  Although I have not seen this film for about
two months, the look in Frank's eyes is still present in my head as he
recites to Jeffery: "In dreams I walk with you \ In dream, I talk to you \
In dreams, you're mine... all the time."  The look, reader, is one of pure
evil.
     The only flaw in the film that I have been able to discern with about a
dozen viewings is that of the archetypes that are employed, which is only a
personal opinion seeing as the characters were designed to be that way.
     All fans of mysteries and independent films should see this one.  If
you're a Lynch fan and have missed it, make sure you check it out.  If
you're not a Lynch fan, watch it and you will become one.

Title
Review for War Zone, The (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/ec398c1907d09f8f882568d1007599bc?OpenDocument
Produced by Dixie Linder and Sarah Radcylffe
Starring Ray Winstone, Tilda Swinton, Kate Ashfield, Lara Belmont, and
Freddie Cunliffe
 Incest.  Treachery. Betrayal.  Videotape.
 No, I'm not talking about the new version of Hamlet.  I'm talking about
The War Zone, a 21st century Kitchen Sink drama helmed by Brit
actor-who-should-stay-an-actor Tim Roth.
 Tim Roth, who somewhere along the line got tired of being the butt of
European jokes in Quentin Tarantino movies has decided to move along and
become a director.  Rather than use his vast experience in films with
good stories to write his own script, he decided to take Alexander
Stuart's script for The War Zone as his first project.
 The War Zone is the story of a London family who moves out into the
British boondocks.  Soon after moving to said boondocks, the wife (Tilda
Swinton) has a third child, the dad (Ray Winstone) starts getting
restless, and Tom (Freddie Cunliffe) discovers that daddy has been
getting it on with his sister Jessie (Lara Belmont).  Being a pathetic
virgin and having Fruedian issues besides, Tom spends about two hours
debating the `will I / won't I' that you can see done much better in any
rendition of Hamlet, all the while videotaping Dad and Jessie getting it
on in the W.W.II. Bunker nearby and struggling with his own sexual
morals.
 If this sounds interesting in this slightest, I have failed.
 The War Zone is a movie that is so boring that I would have walked out,
were I not a critic.  It wastes minute after minute of time spent in
utter silence as Tom watches the family do some particularly nasty thing
to itself.  This is just bad storytelling.  It's repetitive, unpleasant,
sensationalistic, and only serves as a metaphor for the first five
minutes (the next time Roth want to illustrate how much time has passed,
how about doing a montage instead of the same basic scene five different
times).
 As one would expect from a movie by an actor, the acting is above par.
Swinton is especially good as the mother of a family tearing itself
apart from the inside out, and Lara Belmont's presence as the sexually
abused daughter is probably the only role in which any real dimension is
apparent.
After boring everyone for an hour and forty-five minutes, The War Zone
stops.  Unlike most films that stop and don't really end, I was glad
that The War Zone was over.  I wanted out of the theatre.  Pronto.
Face it, Mr. Roth: The Kitchen Sink drama is dead and it died for a
reason.  Don't try to revive it.

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
I figured it would happen. Directors on streaks of good movies always falter
at some point, and now was the time for Edward Zwick. After directing Glory,
Legends of the Fall, and Courage Under Fire, three fine thriller-dramas
about honor and war, one of the few studio directors left that had literary
content left in him (aside, of course, from the obvious Kubrick and
Spielburg), has now turned his attention to the straight foreword action
movie The Siege.
The Siege tells the story of four terrorist cells reigning fire upon New
York City (Brooklynites aiming at Manhattan, of course). It starts with nice
action and keeps the nice action. It even throws in an element of mystery
with Annette Benning's character, a CIA operative working illegally in New
York. The characters are good, the action well paced, and the terrorists
standard action film villains, never without a bomb or an uzi or a handgun.
Then we have to bring in Bruce Willis. Sure, he's the good-luck charm for
apocalypse movies, and on straight foreword he's the way to go, but when
you're looking to make literary content, he's just not supposed to be at the
top of your list.
Having lived near New York, I was looking forward to seeing terrorists take
it down, and enjoyed the film up until the bring in the nasty old military.
The story was much more fun and intriguing before good ole Bruce shows up.
The military comes and you do an about face. The bombers of the city become
the unintentional heroes, the people to be pitied, and you put Bruce Willis
as ... a villain? Exactly how did the second half make it past the Beverly
Hills screeners, is my question?

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
Written by Tom Stoppard (Rozencrantz and Guildenstern are Dead) and Mark
Norman (Cutthroat Island)
Starring Joseph Finnes (Elizabeth), Gwenyth Paltrow (A Perfect Murder),
Geoffrey Rush (Shine), Ben Affleck (Good Will Hunting), Judi Dench (Mrs.
Brown), and Colin Firth (The English Patient)
 To be clear about things, this is what Shakespeare in Love is.  Shakespeare
in Love is a comedy of mistakes about one gentleman in Verona (or, in this
case, Elizabethan England) desperately trying to concoct Romeo and Ethel,
the Pirate's Daughter by the Twenty First Night.
 Shakespearean puns aside, Shakespeare in Love actually does center about a
young William Shakespeare (Joseph Finnes), righting a play on assignment
known as Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter, in a period of no less than
three weeks.  However, he is making much bother about something: the fact
that William Shakespeare, one of history's most prolific playwrights, has
writer's block.
 In former times, he was able to enjoy himself in adulterous fashion with
everyone from the tired wives of Halifax to Othellina, the Mooress of
Venice.  Not one of the eight wives of Henry VII can do a bloody thing to
complain about this lover.
 Now, however, he is Hamlet, serf of Sweden with his beloved Ophellia.  He
has no inspiration, only angst.  He does not like it as it is. This is,
however, until he finds himself smitten with Viola De Lesseps (Gwyneth
Paltrow).  This temptress causes an emotional tempest.
 But, keeping with the pilgrim's passion, he lusts after a woman engaged (do
I hear Prince Paris in the wings?), this time to Lord Wessex (played by
Colinn Firth, who lost another girlfriend to a Fiennes boy in The English
Patient).  Lord Wessex comes across with all of the charm of Yiago,
Othellina's trusted friend, but he does it in such a funny way that you have
to love him.
 In fact, you have to love the entire movie.  The way that you see the
evolution of Romeo and Ethel evolve into Romeo and Juliet while a similar
play is being shown in their lives is a perfect postmodern device: used
before and equally well with Rozencrantz and Guildenstern are Dead, the
highly satiric and intelligent play that launched Tom Stoppard onto the
literary scene by telling the story of Hamlet from the view of the friends
sent to spy upon him.
 Hey!  I went a paragraph without using a pun!  I'm going to my myself
something from the merchant of Paris!
 The performances are worth writing sonnets about and put Caesar Augustus to
shame, one of them already having earned a Golden Globe for Best Actress
(Paltrow) and the movie is magical to watch.
 What is most interesting to watch, however, is the shrew taming that
Stoppard demonstrates over his script.  Equally included are postmodern
devices and plain old storytelling.   Grounding humor mixed in with things
King Richard the First and Fourth could have been proud of, not to mention
any of the Henrys.   Almost every line is tainted with Shakespearean
reference.  So, when you see someone laughing their head off for almost no
reason, let them: there probably isn't an un-funny line in the script.
 In fact, there are equally many lines there for just anyone.  The way it
opens has Geoffrey Rush bartering a deal with a loan shark to save his feet
from coals.  It has funny quips like, when Shakespeare begins talking in
iambic pentameter, Rush saying "prose, please".
 The fact is that Shakespeare in love is incredibly funny, incredibly
brilliant, incredibly beautiful.  It's exactly as I like it.  Next to Saving
Private Ryan I would have to call it the best film of the year, and boy is
it a close second.  Shakespeare buffs like myself will get all of the inside
jokes, non-Shakespeare fans will be swept off their feet by the love story
and by the humor that they'll get.  Everyone will enjoy, from Timon of the
New York City Homeless Shelter to the King of Lears, Bill Gates.
 It doesn't even have an unhappy ending!  But I can't tell you much more
except this: all that ends well  is well and that's the last pun you'll hear
in this summer's tale of a late winter's daydream.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Written by Abby Kohn and Marc Silverstein
Starring Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, John C. Reilly, Michael Vartan,
Molly Shannon, and Octavia Spencer
     Theory on Film: As the year goes on, the number of bad films
progressively gets smaller.  The chances that a bad sounding will be good
increase, and the chances that a good sounding film will be bad decrease.
This only applies during the non-summer months.  During the summer months,
anything that will make money is put onto the table, and thus my thesis is
null and void during that time period.
     Now it is April.  The movies that I have groaned at the previews of
(i.e. The Wachowski Brothers' The Matrix) end up being ten to twenty times
better than I expect.  Scratch that.  Remembering my algebra, a negative
number times a positive number is still negative.  Hence the movies are
better than I expected by being good at all.
     Never Been Kissed is a classic example.  After watching the terrible
duo of Ever After and The Wedding Singer, the last two films with her in
them that I have seen, I have been tempted to find the girl from ET and do
to her what was done to her in Scream.   So, when Never Been Kissed came
around, I expected to see a terrible film that I would have more fun
perfecting my crackpot aim with the light weight missile weapon known as the
popcorn kernel - a much harder object to hurl than is displayed in the
movies.
     What I found instead was a popcorn film plot with two very gifted
writers and an excellent performance by someone who hasn't given an
excellent performance in three years.  Basically, Never Been Kissed follows
Josie Gellar (Drew Barrymore), a 25-year-old copy editor for the Chicago Sun
Times.   For those not familiar with the newspaper world, that roughly
translates as 30 Grand a year and no respect.
     Josie is fairly unattractive, loves correct grammar and women's
business suits (her constant correcting of incorrect grammar is the perfect
touch put in by writer Abby Kohn and Marc Silverstein).  Oh, yeah, she's a
virgin who has never been kissed.  Well, she's been kissed, but not with the
kind of magic that we find more in movies than in life.  Another nod to the
writers: she describes the first kiss in such terms as would put Juliet on
the balcony to shame.
     By some miracle of her psychotic editor-in-chief, Josie is sent as an
undercover reported into the midst of the den of lions known as High School.
Her goal: to find out about kids today.  Of course, since she was nicknamed
Josie Grosie when she really went to high school, things don't go too well
for her.  Her only friends are Cynthia (Octavia Spencer), a member of a
Calculus team known as "The Denominators", and her English teacher Sam
Coulson (Michael Vartan).  Formula to the core, we all know that she falls
in love with the teacher.
     The funny thing about the movie is that it has humor on both levels.
For the teeny-boppers who go see it thinking that it will be a "cool" film,
they won't be disappointed: a great soundtrack, Drew Barrymore, David
Arquette (as Drew's younger brother) and a bunch of immature humor will tide
them over.  For the rest of us, the geeks, the twentysomethings who have
finally realized what a charade High School was, people with an IQ over 120,
you are treated with wonderful tidbits of humor such as the Calc team
getting pi slightly wrong and the Shakespeare class quote from Henry VI
instead of As You Like It, the subject of the class.
     The performance by Barrymore actually shows that talent may be genetic
(her father was a terrific actor), because she actually makes me care about
a character, something that I normally do the exact opposite of.
     Her basically pitiful High School experiences contrasted with her
current (and eventually very successful) experiences are shown through a
well done series of flashbacks (the director takes care to overlight and use
grainy films in the flashback scenes, to give it the 80s look it deserves),
and we actually get to see Drew Barrymore, a girl stalked since 5 by some
person or another, successfully act very unpopular.  She has braces, she has
greasy hair, and she wears nothing but sweaters.
     It's not a film that lives in the box.  Instead, it lives in two boxes
simultaneously.  One box is the "oh-that's-so-sweet" High School audience,
it's target, and the other is the twentysomethings who may truly enjoy it.
So, if you fall into either category a or b, see the film.

Title
Review for Player, The (1992)
Directed by Robert Altman (Short Cuts)
Written by Michael Tolkin (Deep Impact), based on his novel
Starring Tim Robbins (The Shawshank Redemption), Greta Scacchi (Presumed
Innocent), Fred Ward (Dangerous Beauty), Whoopi Goldberg (Sister Act), Peter
Gallagher (To Gillian on Her 37th Birthday), Brion James (D.O.A.), Cynthia
Stevenson (Forget Paris), Vincent D'Onofrio (Men In Black)
>From the master of independent cinema, Robert Altman, comes the blackest of
satires, The Player.  Postmodern, intelligent, suspenseful, funny,
brilliant.  All of these very useful adjectives apply to this film.  There
is no way around it: The Player is great.
The Player, as I stated, is a black satire from the director of Short Cuts,
M*A*S*H, and Nashville.  It follows Griffin Mills (Tim Robbins), a villain
we love to hate, and, ironically, our main character.  Mills is getting
postcards.  Each one is a threat on his life, and telling others, due to the
fact that his position as a studio exec is threatened by up-and-coming
producer Larry Levy (Peter Gallagher), is a threat on his career.
At the beginning, Mills is charismatic, even likable.  But he's quickly
shown for the snake that he is.  In the words of Tim Robbins, who deserved
but was not even nominated for an academy award for his role, `he's
manipulative, he's a son of a bitch.'  It's true, it's all true.
The threatening postcards lead him to believe that a writer is sending them.
A rejected writer.  However, in the cruel industry of movies which kills
more ideas than W.W.II killed people, this does not narrow it down.  What
does narrow it down is one of the more bizarre moments of the film.  He's in
the hot tub with Bonnie, story editor and girlfriend (and, by, the way, the
only moral character of the movie), when he asks her about his own life.
However, unable to formulate it into his own life, he explains it through
movies.  He gives her a pitch, asks her how long it will be before the
writer-in-question becomes dangerous, and she narrows the selection of
writers down by providing a five-month time period before danger arrives.
 Using this, he selects David Kahayne, hack-writer of the bubonic plague of
Hollywood: the unhappy ending.  David's what movie people call `unproduced',
a writer who's a member of the WGA (Writer's Guild of America, which holds a
fairly good monopoly on writers in Hollywood) but who hasn't sold a script.
He calls his girlfriend June Gudmundsdottir (Gretta Scacchi, pronounced good
man's daughter) and finds out where to find him.  The surprise there, of
course, is that his nickname is, according to June is `the dead man'.
Kahayne is in Pasadena, enjoying himself at the Rialota watching The Bicycle
Thief.  Mills confronts him about the postcards, and, in a fit of rage,
kills him in a parking lot.
Of course, fitting with the Hollywood that it satires so well, he didn't
kill the right person.  And now, Griffen Mills is being investigated by the
police, is falling in love with June, is trying to secure his position as
head of the studio, and, on top of it all, fearing for his life.
The movie is artistically brilliant and interestingly postmodern.  In a very
ironic way, the ending is the beginning: a pitch by the mysterious psychotic
writer of a movie called The Player, about the events you have just seen.
It references itself: naming the record for a tracking shot in an American
motion picture (formerly held by Orson Wells' Touch of Evil) while breaking
it.  Having a main character from D.O.A. being asked if he remembers the
film.  Talking about eliminating the writers from the artistic process the
day after Mills has murdered the writer.
There normally isn't much I can say about a film.  In my life, there are
maybe ten films I could go on and on about, and you have the luck to
hopefully see this one.  It makes statements.  It predicts things.  It was
ironic at the time it came out and is ironic now.
For instance, Griffin Mills is quoted as saying `movies are art, now more
than ever' while, at the very same time in the real world, movies were
flocking back to the existence of the art film.  It is sheltered in a unique
ambiguity: June discovers the Mills killed her boyfriend and doesn't care.
The good are punished, the bad survive: Bonnie is fired and left for
proverbial dead while June and Mills live happily ever after.
This is the film for movie buffs.  It makes you stop and think about what
speeds in front of your face at 24 frames a second.  It states things about
the industry in a uniquely detached manner, where people talk about all the
dark things of the industry as if they were drinking cappuccinos.
For instance, another quote by Griffin Mills, asshole producer but satiric
god, addresses the elements needed in a modern studio film: `Suspense,
laughter, violence.  Hope, heart.  Nudity, sex.  Happy Endings.'

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Written and Directed by David O. Russell
Starring George Clooney, Mark Whalberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonez, and Nora Dunn
Twenty years, one month, and sixteen days before Three Kings was released,
Apocalypse Now sprang onto the war movie landscape, quickly jumping into the
upper echelon of a highly critically appreciated genre.  Now, Three Kings hits
screens, with a similar destiny.
Before anyone objects to the comparison, let me say that it is more by nature
of style than by substance.  This is not to say that Three Kings lacks in
substance to any degree: it doesn't.  This is merely to say that Three Kings
exhibits the same sardonic wit, noirish cinematography, and eclectic
soundtrack that served to provide an ironic twist to the Vietnam War in
Apocalypse Now.
The comparison does not end there, however.  In Apocalypse Now, we are greeted
with a single man on a completely amoral mission.  In Three Kings, it is four
people.  In Apocalypse Now, we have the eventual growth of morals and regret
out of a war that seemed to serve no purpose.  In Three Kings, we have the
same.
Three Kings IS the Apocalypse Now of the 1990's.
Hands down the finest war movie I have seen since Saving Private Ryan, Three
Kings is a disturbing masterpiece.  While taking a look at the soldier's who
have never seen action, who have never taken life, and their desire to blindly
do so, it also realizes the careful contemplation given to the line between
life and death, between killing and not pulling the trigger, once that line
has already been crossed.
The movie concerns four dissatisfied soldiers who discover a map to the
bunkers where gold bullion stolen from Kuwait lies.  As they find the map,
they make a frenzied attempt to get the gold while trying to shake front-line
reporter Amanda Cruz (Nora Dunn) from their tail.
The gold is hidden in the midst of a heavily guarded desert village, where a
rebellion is being quashed as they speak.  Since the Americans have signed a
cease-fire with Iraq, it is expected that the Americans will merely do nothing
as Iraqi civilians get slaughtered.
For the most part, as a country, this is what we did.  However, Vietnam vet
Archie Gates (Clooney) makes the decision to not allow the Iraqis to have free
reign.  From there on it, the film becomes a highly contemplative (and
action-packed) commentary on where morals should and do lie in war.
Congratulations should go to about everyone on the film.  Mark Whalberg
exhibits the same kind of brilliant acting as he did in Boogie Nights. 
Clooney proves that Out of Sight was not just a fluke and that he actually
does have acting gumption.  Ice Cube tackles a serious role remarkably well
considering that the last movie he acted in was I Got the Hook Up.  However
the real star lies in the role of Conrag Vig (Spike Jonze), hick to the bone
that finds that he actually has morals out in the desert.  Normally, whenever
you see a completely ignorant character on-screen, you hate them.  But, Spike
Jonze (in his first major role) somehow manages to turn it in an endearing
quality.  Also, cinematographer Newton Thomas Sigel, who also did The Usual
Suspects, provides some of the most disturbing imagery captured on film in
recent years (up to par with last year's The Thin Red Line).
Three Kings IS, as said, the Apocalypse Now of the 1990s.  It is the finest
ironically-comedic war film of this decade and the second finest war film of
this decade (Saving Private Ryan being the first).  I don't care if you see at
New York City's Sony Theatre, where it costs $9 for a matinee.  It's worth
every penny you spend on it.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Directed by Tony Scott (Crimson Tide)
Starring Will Smith (Bad Boys), Gene Hackman (Antz), Jon Voight (Rosewood),
Lisa Bonet (Dead Connection), Regina King (Jerry Maguire), Tom Sizemore
(Saving Private Ryan), Jason Lee (Chasing Amy)
Well it's about time. Personally, I was getting fed up seeing these bloody
MTV directors going around thinking their making art when all their really
doing is boring us. Sure, they make great videos, but then they come back
and end up not wowing us for the more than three minutes that a music video
is supposed to. They have all the technical talent for the job, just not of
the creative ability to do the task put in front of them.
But now the reign of terror -- which has been dragging on since the video
music era ended and the market for music video directors dried up -- and
we're allowwed to finally view good work from the people. Tony Scott
(Crimson Tide, Top Gun, True Romance) is back with Jerry Bruckheimer
(Crimson Tide, Top Gun) going at forming a cool action flick.
Among the other reunions are Jerry Bruckheimer, Tony Scott, and Gene Hackman
(Crimson Tide) and Jerry Bruckheimer and Will Smith (Bad Boys), and all of
these people finally sat down, decided to get over the death of Don Simpson
and turn out a movie that was more than just spur of the moment fun-once
(Armageddon). It's just as cliched as every other flick they've ever turned
out, but hell, what is lacking in storyline is made up in the F/Xs and
editing, which make the quick cuts of the  Aussie Kiss or Kill look like
child's play.
Will Smith is a labor attorney who's life is invaded when an old college
buddy (Jason Lee: Mallrats, Chasing Amy) passes him a tape in a lingerie
store while running from evil NSA agents. The tape contains film of the
murder of a congressman who was opposed to a congressional bill that would
allow surveillance on everyone, and, of course, Jon Voight, Jamie Kennedy,
and a bunch of NSA cronies who look like they need to get laid end up
chasing after him.
On the run from the NSA, he hooks up with ex-NSA investigator Gene Hackman,
who will together get his life back while the bullets are shooting and the
techno-babble is flying.
So the plot's straight-foreword? So it rips off of the indie character drama
The End of Violence? Who cares? The thing that makes the film cool and
stylish isn't the work of Will Smith (which helps), or the MTV-generation
surveillance experts, to whom intelligence is just a game. It's the editing
that is the music video director's wet dream and the F/Xs that make even the
seasoned vetern smile.
They finally put the MTV experience to good use in the elaborate
surveillance scenes, in which you do everything from view the world from a
satellite's view to the same kind of oddball camera angles (i.e. from
buttons) as The Truman Show so wonderfully displayed.
You go through hundreds, perhaps thousands of shots in all of the chase
scenes, switching from surveillance camera to surveillance camera. The
paranoia is effective and infectious, the angles creative.
They have to start having new Oscars, ones for creativity in Cinematography
instead of ones that show just pretty camera angles. Why? Because someone
should get an award for this.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
Based on the novel "Ishmael" by Daniel Quinn
Starring Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, George Dzundza, and John Ashton
     The character drama, I think I can safely say, is dead as far as studio
films are concerned.  Yes, in 1997, we had Gattaca, the interesting tale of
a futuristic society in which everyone is genetically engineered, but I
haven't seen anything since then.  If I racked my mind, I might be able to
come up with a few examples of studio films with good characters, but not
studio films that are good character dramas.  They're long gone.
     Whenever a genre dies in studio films, there is a period of time where
we experience throwbacks from that genre films that are attempting to
salvage a dying movement in the celluloid medium.  With few exceptions,
these fail.  A prime example: The Mummy, which was an attempt to bring back
the adventure style film of the Indiana Jones trilogy.  Instinct is yet
another throwback.
     Instinct -- a movie that comes across as The Shawshank Redemption meets
One Flew Over the Cookoo's Nest meets Gorillas in the Mist meets Silence of
the Lambs -- spends its time trying to be something it can't possibly be:
good.  Sure, it may be entertaining and, considering the attention span of
the average person, it may bring tears to your eyes, but as far as quality
goes, Instinct falters.
     Instinct follows the intersection of a psychotic killer (Dr. Ethan
Powell, played by Anthony Hopkins) playing a game of cat and mouse with a
student of psychology (Theo Caulder, played by Cuba Gooding, Jr.).  Have we
not seen this before?  Let's change that around a little bit by adding that
Powell doesn't eat people he beats them to death with a club and hangs out
with gorillas.  Again, we have seen this before.  To make it a little less
original, we'll throw in a bit about a brutal prison and a brutal insane
asylum.  Been there, done that.
     Instinct, a film that, as near as I can tell, is meant to pose a
question about the values of a materialistic society, poses another question
for us: have films reached the same level as matter: all engineered parts
built on basic units that we understand?
 There is nothing new to Instinct and, although I have had four years of
this to tell me otherwise, I still hope deep down that originality should be
part of my rubric for grading a film.  So I am an idealist.  It duplicates
each one of the aforementioned movies practically shot by shot (i.e. Cuba
Gooding, Jr. with his arms outstretched, enjoying the rain and bringing up
memories of Tim Robbins' similar performance in The Shawshank Redemption).
     Before you start sinking in your seat, please remember that, although
the character drama is dead, Instinct did not kill it.  Instinct is a
character drama.  The characters are stock, the situations are hackneyed,
and the general impression you get is that the writer was half asleep when
he wrote it.  Still, Instinct remains moderately enjoyable.
     It is funny that I call it this because, this afternoon, I was having a
talk with a friend about the people who truly control your tear ducts at a
film: the cinematographers and the music composers.  With Danny Elfman, an
uneducated but highly skilled man behind the keyboard and Philippe
Rousselot, cinematographer of A River Runs Through it and Interview with the
Vampire behind the camera, you can understand how they play the audience
like a fiddle.
     Sure, the actors doing a top-notch job with bottom-rung roles helps a
lot, but were it not for the clean cut score and the pretty images, I may
very well have angrily stormed out of the theatre or tried to incite a riot
to rush the screen.  But I didn't.  It wasn't quite that bad.

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
Starring Bruce Greenwood, Elais Koteas, Don McKellar, Mia Kirshner, Arsinee
Khanjian, Sarah Polley, Calvin Green, and Victor Garber
     To be quite honest, I expected crap.  I often do, being the pesimistic
person that I am, but I especially expected crap when I rented Exotica.  I
would have never done it if it weren't for the fact that Atom Egoyan,
director of The Sweet Hereafter and The Adjuster was behind the camera.
That and, let's admit it, I'm human.
     Of course, knowing that Egoyan was working on it should have told me
that Exotica wasn't going to be crap.  That it wasn't going to be a simple
striptease film, and that it would be close to as profoundly lyrical as The
Sweet Hereafter was.
     Exotica is a story of the intersection of lives.  On the one hand you
have a pregnant strip club owner, Zoe (Arsinee Khanjian), on the other, a
disturbed DJ, Eric (Elais Koteas).  Also in the cast is a seductive stripper
Christina (Mia Kirshner) and a father of a murdered child, Francis (Bruce
Greenwood).  A customs official (Calvin Green) and a man in charge of a
pet-smuggling ring (Thomas, Don McKellar) are also in the mix.  With the
magic that Egoyan has always had, however, he moves all of this into a
pattern of coherence.
     Their lives intersect, mainly, through the events leading up to and
followwing the breaking of the rules at a strip club: that a stripper is not
allowwed to be touched.  They also intersect with the fact Eric and
Christina were the two that found the murdered daughter.  You with me?
Francis is an accountant sent by the IRS (or the Canadian equivalant) to
confirm that Thomas is involved in smuggling, and Thomas becomes his helper
in answering a question.
     To clear up misconceptions, Exotica isn't a movie about sex.  Most
people will become so caught up in the sex that they won't notice the vivid
portrait of a man so depressed by his daughter's death that he is willing to
pay his niece Tracey (Sarah Polley) $20 an hour to babysit a dead child.  I
did.  And, good Christ, I liked it.
     The performances are nearly flawless.  Bruce Greenwood flexes his
acting muscles as he did in The Sweet Hereafter, portraying a character so
ripped apart by the events in his life that he goes to obsessive lengths to
keep some sembalance of hope.  Mia Kirshner does her job so perfectly that
we do not see a stripper when we look at her: we see a multifacted character
who has a very special relationship with Francis.  Eric, Elais Koteas'
finest role, is a man who has let his love for Christina turn into an
obsession that becomes an inflamed jealousy.  Thomas is a man trying to
salvage whatever is left of his morals while the world turns insane around
him.
     The conflicting obsessions are pitted against one another, forming an
intriguing mindgame that goes into the deapths of each character as we sit
back in awe, watching a truly mythical story unfold in front of us.
     Like with The Sweet Hereafter, Atom Egoyan crafts a tale capable of
academia, rife with symbolism and haunting images.  He drifts us back and
forth throughout time, shows us characters that are to be pitied and loved
at the same time.
     Although I dare not use this as an example in everyday conversation,
Exotica is a film that is a striking example of a lack of a villian.  The
antagonist, ironically, is each protagonist.  Each person's personal demons,
their problems, conflict with each other.  For those who have grown to hate
the archetypal battle between good and evil, this is a very refreshing movie
to watch.
     Let there be several warnings about this film, however.  First, those
who are very conservative or easily offended back off: Exotica is not for
you.  Second, those who are renting it for sex might as well not: Exotica
does not deliver in that department, and features less nudity that any other
strip film I have ever seen.  Third, for those who lack a literary mind you
should avoid this film: it takes a lot of intelligence to decipher.  Fourth,
don't watch it after midnight: you won't get it when it's that late.

Title
Review for Zire darakhatan zeyton (1994)
Zire Darakhatan Zeyton (Under the Olive Trees)
Written and Directed by Abbas Kiarostami
     Let me say that, after I have written this review, I will never be
allowed within the borders of Iran. It will be the basic disrespect I intend
to show towards my first (and probably last) contact with the Iranian Film
Industry that keeps me out.  It will also be my high criticism of the
extraordinarily strict censorship standards that the country holds close to
its very story heart.  For either reason, after this review, Iran is a
country that is out of the question.
     Basically, Under the Olive Trees is the worst kind of dissapointment:
an unconventional film with a very conventional story.  To say it simply, it
is boy-meets-girl, boy-loves-girl, boy-stalks-girl-until-she-marries-him.
The boy is Hossein (played by Hossein Rezai, the low-budget filmmakers
couldn't afford actors that would respond to a name other than their own).
The girl is Tarereh.  Both of them are working on a low-budget film about a
love story that takes place after the 1992 earthquake.
     While watching it, having discovered that it was about the Iranian film
industry, I jokingly stated that it was a Iranian The Player.  Another
person shook his head and said it was more like Irma Vep.  We were both
joking.  It was a terrible movie.
     The cinematography, the sound, the direction: all hold up under the
incredible stress that a terrible script puts them under.  In fact, the
cinematography is the very best part of the movie.  Iran, as displayed in
the film, is a beautiful and somewhat mystic place where a simpler form of
life dominates.  If only that were true
     The cinematography leads me to believe that Jim Jarmush is part of the
standard film school curriculum, because the camera only pans once during
the film, and does the rest in probably less than one hundred shots.  Shots,
folks, not slugs.  I'm not stating that this is a bad thing, I'm just
stating that, after a while, it gets boring.  It takes away the steam.
     On the subject of steam, the simple fact is that Under the Olive Trees
doesn't have it.  It doesn't have steam.  It doesn't have gas.  This damn
film doesn't even have fumes.  It moves along with the pace of a caterpillar
and tempts you to sleep through it constantly.
 As far as plot goes, it basically has none.  I have already outlined it for
you, but, for those hoping to see a violent `Stalker' film, hope again.  The
stalking you witness is rather a constant badgering and following around of
Tahereh.  In America, we have two words for that `Restraining Order.'
     The influence of the theocratic Iranian censors seems alive and well in
the fact that every other word out of any characters mouth is `Praise' or
`God', both of which, theocracy or no, are bad dialouge when used profusely.
The same is true of films on the opposite end of the spectrum, ones that don
't know how or when not to curse.
     It's always a great pity to have your first experience with another
country's film industry be spurned by a completely terrible film.  Let's
face it, we all prejudge, and I've obviously prejudged Iran as have a great
difficulty at turning out films.  I saw, as my first Czech film, Kolya.  An
excellent movie.  As my first Italian film Cinema Paradiso.  Another
excellent film.  My first experience with Japanese movies, Godzilla, which,
let's admit it, is fun as hell to watch.  Hong-Kong: Hard-Boiled.  The odd
apple in my bunch of very pleasing foreign films would have to be this one.
It's bad, and it's bad by American standards

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Based on the Novel "Les Liasons Dangereuses" by Choderlos de Laclos
    What have horror movies taught us?  I guess they have taught us what we
already know, that diluting the same idea that may have at one point been
good isn't a good idea.  Think of it.  All of the franchises, with the
exception of Scream, which is only on its second installment, and, thanks to
the grace of Kevin Williamson, has remained fresh in its sequel, have
bitterly failed.
    Perhaps it makes sense that the only people who would star in a redo of
an idea used at least four times before (3 adaptations of Dangerous Liaisons
and the indie smash In the Company of Men) area all veterans of horror
movies.  Phillippe and Gellar starred together in I Know What You Did Last
Summer.  Witherspoon was in Fear and Freeway, and in the anticipated
American Psycho.
    However -- and maybe this is just the reparations paid by fate -- Cruel
Intentions comes out as a good-luck charm.  The movie, although lacking the
literary content of other films with the same plot, is as entertaining a sex
comedy as you get to see from a studio.  The acting is actually half-decent,
perhaps the most monumental achievement of the film considering the odds it
has against it:
    For one, it has a first-time director.  For two, we have not one but
three stars from the WB network, whose motto should be "good ideas, bad
actors."  For three, we have Ryan Phillipe, someone who has never once had a
good role and, like most of the brat pack of 90s actors, most likely never
will.  Perhaps they were inspired by Reese Witherspoon's convincing
performance as a virgin, which actually is a great showcase of her
versatility considering, only a few months ago, she starred as a slut in the
overlooked creative mind-exercise Pleasantville.
    The plot, as I've said, is shared with three adaptations of Dangerous
Liaisons and with the indie In the Company of Men.  Basically, bad bitch
sister Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah Michelle Gellar, returning to her soap-opera
roots) makes a bet with her step-brother Sebastian Valmont (Ryan Phillippe):
seduce the new headmaster's daughter, Annette (Reese Witherspoon), and
incest will become a New York debutante's common practice.  Fail, and she
gets his '57 Roadster.  Now, with most women, this wouldn't be worth it,
but, hey, we're talking about Sarah Michelle Gellar.
    Basically, Gellar is completely enjoyable as a bitch extraordinaire.  He
new motto for acting (aside from the fact that it would plagiarize Mae
West): "When I'm good, I'm really good.  When I'm bad, I'm better."  A nice
fun subplot in the movie, that gives it the majority of its humor, is
Sebastian's "awakening" of Cecile, yet another virgin Gellar seeks to
destroy (for stealing a boyfriend she blew), which leads to most of the sex
in this film, not to mention the best snippet of popcorn film conversation
I've heard in 1999:
    Cecile: This doesn't taste like iced tea.
    Sebastian: It's from Long Island.
    Unfortunately, the story decides not to rely on the acerbic wit that
newcomer Roger Kumble inserts into his film, but instead on(ominous tones)
ROMANCE.  As the relationship between Sebastain and Annette becomes more
sweet and chick-flick, the movie takes a turn for the worse, ending on a low
note.
    Also, for all movie buffs who think they know the ending from the
trailer: you probably do.
    Predictable to a T, Cruel Intentions is nonetheless and enjoyable
popcorn film.  Maybe it's just the Y-chromosome in me: this film does house
a vast repertoire of sex for an R rating (lesbian kiss, etc.).  Maybe it's
just the fact that I munch popcorn and need a film to munch it in.  But
either way, Cruel Intentions is a fun film to see.

Title
Review for Love & Basketball (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d6f25ebcc3d22783882568c20010bfac?OpenDocument
 Of all of the projects for Spike Lee to attach his name onto, Love and
Basketball may go down as one of the most idiotic.  Lee produced this
Hoop Dreams meets Romeo and Juliet love story and his largest mistake by
far was to hand the position of director over to Gina Prince-Bythewood.
Prince may have made four films, but she still hasn't gotten it quite
right.  And, from the looks of it, she won't be getting it right anytime
soon.
 Love and Basketball concerns Monica Wright (Sanaa Lathan), a basketball
loving girl who wants nothing more than to be the first woman in the
NBA.  Her next door neighbor, Quincy McCall (Omar Epps) is the son of a
NBA player and wants nothing more than to follow in his father's
footsteps and get some booty along the way.  When he realizes (at about
age 18) that the booty he has been wanting all along has been living
next door, he quickly hooks up with her.  Both find themselves going to
USC and both find themselves on the USC basketball teams.
 At this point, you are a half hour into the movie.  The remaining hour
and a half is wasted on the will-they-won't-they as their romance
becomes turbulent, then nonexistent, and then turbulent again.  It is
also wasted on Monica's undying quest to become the first female NBA
player, and the hardships that she must face as a woman who loves
basketball.
 All of this ardent feminism is a great thing, but placed in the inept
hands of screenwriter and director Gina Prince-Bythewood it turns into
an excuse to attempt to further a story about love.  If Love and
Basketball focused on its romantic aspects and removed the failed
attempt to make the story have three plots (Quincy's career, Monica's
career, and Quincy and Monica) then it might just have ended up being
entertaining.  Instead, it ended up being very trite and very tiring.
Add to this already faulty film the fact that it is told in quarters,
three of which take place in the 1980s, and you often end up feeling as
if you are watching the basketball game from hell with retro music on.
 The only things that make this movie even close to bearable are the
excellent performances by its two leads.  Epps, who has been on a good
streak since his role on "ER" takes a low-grade stock character such as
Quincy and makes him into someone we can stand to watch for two hours.
Lathan positively shines as Monica almost making an unwatchable
character into something I can look at for the duration of the film.  If
it weren't for the two of them, I might have been tempted to walk out.
Written and Directed by Gina Prince-Bythewood
Starring Sanaa Lathan, Omar Epps, Alfre Woodard, Dennis Haysbert, Debbi
Morgan, Harry J. Lennix, Kyla Pratt, Glenndon Chatman, James DuMont
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Little Man Tate (1991)
Starring Jodie Foster, Dianne Weist, Adam Hann-Byrd, and Harry Connick, Jr.
     It's been ages since I've seen this film.  I watched it on video when
it first came out, circa 1992 and barely remembered all of it.  I remembered
the little kid getting hit on the head with a globe by Harry Connick, Jr. I
completely forgot about Dianne Weist, and I had a vague memory of Jodie
Foster having something or other to do with it.  But, it was Sunday and I
was bored and it just so happened that The Movie Channel had it on so I
decided to sit back and watch it.  I had nothing better to do.
     Although I am already going senile at a very young age and cannot trust
much of any memories, I do remember thinking that Little Man Tate was a good
film.  I am glad to see that times have not changed that much.
     Little Man Tate follows child prodigy Fred Tate(Adam Hann-Byrd, whose
only other good role came in the form of Ang Lee's The Ice Storm) and
struggling mother Dede Tate(Jodie Foster).  Fred Tate seeks only to have
friends.  Dede Tate is driven by what her son wants.  The third force in
this movie is Jane Grierson (Dianne Weist), a former child prodigy who seeks
to enter into a maternal position as far as Fred is concerned and also to
make sure his intellectual needs are fulfilled.
     The movie is much more psychologically complex however, when you factor
in that Fred has ulcers due to worldly concerns and when you take into light
the director of the movie, Jodie Foster.
     We all know her as the recluse of cinema.  We also may know her as the
runner up for Princess Leia in the original Star Wars trilogy (ironically,
the person who has been often referred to as "the next Jodie Foster",
Natalie Portman, grabbed the female lead in the new Star Wars trilogy).
What most people are not familiar with is that she was in, to a degree, the
position that Fred Tate finds himself in during the film.
     Jodie Foster was able to read by 3, speak fluent French by 14,
graduated Valedictorian a year early from a Private Academy known as Lycee
Francais.  She was managed by her mother, a person who reportedly pushed her
to be in her famous/infamous role as a 13-year-old prostitute in Taxi Driver
while she just wanted to hang out with friends.  Do I sense a very similar
structure when Fred utters the voice-over "All I wanted was for someone to
eat lunch with me?"
     That point aside, the film in and of itself is a basic formula
character drama back when they still made them.  You have conflicts between
characters you care about a tiny bit, tears jerked from the majority of the
audience; tiny bits of comic support placed all over like chocolate jimmies
on Ice Cream.  You have errors here and there, nice cinematography, fine
performances and mediocre directing (yes, Jodie Foster does a better job
than most mainstream drama directors do).  You have some characters that you
wonder about the significance of, Freudian psychology, and events that don't
make any sense as far as the plot is concerned.
     Movies like this are significantly easier to grade with a rubric, such
as stars or letters or ranking out of ten, but I do not use any of these so
I will simply have to say that it is a basically mediocre film.  It is more
a film for people who like Jodie Foster than for people who want to see
actually good films.  It isn't worth spending money over but it isn't worth
skipping, so, using a very trite phrase: you decide.

Title
Review for Me, Myself and I (1992)
Isn't there some saying about avoiding all movies that have a part in them
called `jailbait?'  Or is it that you should avoid casting jailbait on the
basis of their parts?  Well, either way, when you have a movie like Me,
Myself, and I, which starts out by yelling `cocksucker' at the audience and
follows this up with a sequence where we learn of Buddy Arnett (George Segal
's) obsession with laying Lolitas, and then we are lead to believe that this
is supposed to be a comedy, we know that this is probably not going to end
up very funny.
And, like just about everything else in this incredibly predictable rant,
Me, Myself, and I performs exactly as you would expect it to.
Me, Myself, and I follows Crazy Diane/Sane Diane (Jobeth Williams), a
psychotic who believes that numbers are chasing her until she seduces her
next door neighbor, Buddy.  Life is honky dory for a while, and we see a lot
of Sane Diane and then Buddy has to deal with his estranged wife, Jailbait,
and other pains of living.  All of which makes for a cheesy melodrama with a
bit of multiple-personality disorder put in.
The performances are admittedly enjoyable, but the film's pacing is so slow,
it's style so off-Broadway that I feel more like I'm watching What Happened
Was devoid of intellect.  Save me the trouble.
A few moments of humor are interspersed with a weak narrative, good
performers given bad material, and all of the other paradoxes that make a
movie so midlist that it will be marked off of my list, and should never
find its way onto yours.
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Starring Steve Martin, Eddie Murphy, Heather Graham, Christine Baranski, and
Jamie Kennedy
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 In a review of Clue I restated the well-known fact that Hollywood is
unpredictable.  Clue was a good example, but Bowfinger is a perfect one.  As
much as Hollywood doesn't like to admit it, it's a highly touchy group.
Movies that are politically risky are ignored.  Movies that question the
system are feared.  This, by the way, explains Oscar snubs for movies like
The Truman Show, Chasing Amy, Mother Night, Lolita, Smoke Signals, and
countless others.
 As touchy as Hollywood is, it can always surprise with the capability to do
something completely bizarre and unexpected.  Case in point: Bowfinger.
Yeah, it's childish.   Yeah, the jokes are cheap.  But guess what's the nip
of the jokes... Hollywood itself.
 Not since Get Shorty has Hollywood dared to take itself out and beat itself
up.  Its a universal constant that no one wants to admit that they are
hypocrites (the particular breed of person that makes up most of the true
power in Hollywood), and movies like Bowfinger expose the hypocrisy of
Hollywood in a very public way.
 Bowfinger centers around Robert Bowfinger (Steve Martin), failed movie
producer who decides to give it one last go after reading the script for a
movie "Chubby Rain", a highly B-movie science fiction yarn that gets its
title from the fact that the rain becomes chubby as the aliens fall to Earth
encased in it.  Bowfinger decides that he needs superstar Kit Ramsey (Eddie
Murphy) in the film in order to make it work, and, when Kit doesn't want to
be in it, Bowfinger decides to film him without his knowledge.
 He enlists a failed stage actress Carol (Christine Baranski), a crew
composed of illegal immigrants (the funniest moment in the movie comes as
INS does a roost of a field while people are motioned into a van to work on
the movie), an actress from Ohio who knows what you really need to do to get
ahead in Tinsel Town (best described in the single line acceptance speech
for an Emmy winning Oscar telecast "I'm sorry I didn't have to sleep around
to get this part") played by the always fun to watch Heather Graham and a
wannabe cinematographer named Dave (Jamie Kennedy).
 The sad thing about Bowfinger is that, for all of its hard work and
perseverance of making fun of moviemaking, the people in it have such an
obvious allure towards the industry that they ultimately fail at their goal.
There is no incredible sense that you are laughing at Hollywood in general.
You just laugh at Bobby Bowfinger et al.
 It seems particularly ironic, though; that a film that had such perfect
potential for skewering the Hollywood system was ultimately trapped by it.
That, in being both anti-Hollywood and Hollywood at the same time, it comes
out with only good one liners and gags.  And, as we all know, good
one-liners do not a movie make.
 Another particular irony is that, as Bobby Bowfinger is so often the but of
the movie's jokes, Steve Martin seems to be the but of the joke of the
movie.  He seems to not be able to go beyond being a charicature.  Daisy
(Heather Graham) does go beyond her character, but not enough to make up for
the lack of personality that Bobby Bowfinger has.
 Oh well.  These things happen too often and too well.  Such ends up being
the fate of people brave enough to be working against the industry that they
have worked with for so many years.

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
Directed by Lee Tamahori (Mullholland Falls)
Written by David Mamet (The Spanish Prisoner)
Starring Anthony Hopkins (Silence of the Lambs), Alec Baldwin (The Juror),
Elle MacPherson (If Lucy Fell), Harold Perrineau Jr. ("Oz")
What do you get when you combine a bear, a man that may or may not want to
kill another for his wife, and an entrapanuer with a seemingly infinite
wealth of knowledge? Ask me that a month ago and I'd say that I wouldn't see
a movie with that plotline if you paid me. But after a barrage of good
advertising and even better hype, I decided that I'd go see it.
What a surprise.
The movie starts slow, but with that kind of unwritten tension in the air
that only a good writer can accomplish. It picks up speed quickly, spending
maybe half an hour on the intro and character development to the final crash
(due to an in-air collision with a flock of birds) which kills the pilot and
leaves Harold Perrineau Jr. ("Oz"), Alec Baldwin and Anthony Hopkins alive
to fend in the wilderness with a knife and six matches.
Things would go better except for the fact that there is a Kodaik bear, a
mankiller who is stocking them, giving off all of the personality of a
psychopath and making us hate him as much as we could hate any human
villain.
Though the plot is completely made of old movies, this is one that is done
so well that it surpasses any old no-tech thriller that I've ever seen. It
goes into the realm of movies that are made good but have tremendous
potential to be bad. It's worth seeing any day of the week.

Title
Review for Children of a Lesser God (1986)
Directed by Randa Haines (Dance With Me)
Written by Mark Medoff (Play) (Santa Fe) and Hesper Anderson (Grand Isle)
Starring William Hurt (Dark City), Marlee Matlin (The Player), Piper Laurie
(The Faculty)
In my mind there are two types of metaphor movies: those that kick and those
that scream. Those that scream take their metaphors and make them painfully
obvious to the viewer. We can't help but notice them. Those that kick, on
the other hand, have metaphors that are silent and effective. Children of a
Lesser God was a metaphor movie that kicked.
Based on the stage play, Children of a Lesser God is a metaphor movie about
a hearing man's romance with a deaf woman. On the surface, it functions as a
sympathy grabber for the hearing disabled, and a movie we can smile at
because of William Hurt's gallant attempt to help deaf children speak, live
normal lives, and, even, sing (albeit to cheesy songs but in one of the most
fun and touching scenes captured on film). That is the skin deep surface,
which would have been enough to make it a crowd pleaser and would have kept
it from being torn to pieces by the critics.
Add to the movie a second level, a difficult character Sarah (Marlee Matlin,
who one the Best Actress award), the deaf ex-nymphomaniac in love with the
hearing man (William Hurt), who gives a terrific performance and is deaf to
boot. That would make the critics happy. But that's not why I'm happy. No.
I'm happy because, below the surface level of a movie for the deaf lies a
movie for the intelligent.
In a form drawn out of proportion so that it is unrecognizable until you
think, Children of a Lesser God is not about deaf people but about the
difficulties we all face in relationships.
The urge to become joined in a middle ground without the desire to
compromise, only to have your partner do so. It is a movie that drills to
the core of them and somehow finds us. And that's what the critics like me
want, a movie that's a mirror. A mirror that is clearer than everyday life.
And, in Children of a Lesser God, that's what I got.

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
It takes some doing to make a beauty pageant flick that features an
intellectually vapid caper plot while being a slap in the face to
feminism.  When asked (within the movie, I mean) to defend pageantry
from this accusation, Sandra Bullock simply shrugs it off and says,
"Well, they're not all airheads, and I've made some friends."  Forget
the fact that nine out of ten women in the film act like vicious bitches
to Sandra's character -- a New Jersey FBI agent named Gracie Hart -- and
shrug off the fact that each of the contestants is painted to have all
of the intelligence of a Pokemon character on a good day.  Never mind
all that.  Sandra has learned that beauty pageants are really
scholarship contests and really aren't harmful to feminism.
Miss Congeniality starts out with Gracie as a New Jersey kid kicking ass
on the playground and getting the obligatory "ugly duckling" bit when
she slugs a guy to protect a potential boyfriend -- only to be shunned
because she was too tomboyish.  Of course, the ugly duckling grows up to
be an adult tomboy (though a dead sexy one at that).  The portrayal is
stereotypical: frumpy hair, two dates to her name, a punching bag, and a
penchant for pints of Ben and Jerry's.  To her credit, Sandra Bullock
pulls off the deal pretty well, but how she can live with herself after
playing such an odious role is beyond me.  (She gets paid a lot of
money, that's how. -Ed.)
Gracie works at the FBI and, after a sting operation that goes slightly
sour after she saves a Russian mobster from choking, she's placed on a
desk job until a letter from a Unabomber-like terrorist called "The
Citizen" arrives, threatening the Miss United States beauty pageant. 
The horror!  Gracie promptly gets shipped off to Austin, Texas, where,
with the help of pageant consultant (imagine that on your business card)
Vincent (Michael Caine), she is turned into a prim and proper lady who
investigates the pageant by going undercover and becoming fluent in
Ditz.
Of course it isn't only the women in Miss Congeniality that get the
barbs.  All the male FBI agents are painted as ogling idiots, whereas
all of the other men in the story are either gay, androgynous, or
psychotic.  Think of it as Stereotypes for Dummies.  Hell, they even
throw in a finalist being pulled off the stage for admitting her
lesbianism.
To give the devil its due, Miss Congeniality may be just about the most
offensive flick of the year, but it also has something of an acrid wit. 
Bullock is actually watchable (unlike her normal tour de crap), and the
movie does have its share of barbs directed towards beauty queens, but
this is far outweighed by the fact that Miss Congeniality is just plain
nasty.  If you're going to be this offensive in a comedy, you know,
Chris Rock or John Leguizamo offensive, you have to attack the
stereotypes, not embrace them.  And it better be damn funny, too.  And
that Miss Congeniality ain't.
What the hell; if you're at your local multiplex and everything else is
sold out, why not brainwash yourself by revisiting the gender/role
stereotypes that people have been trying to kill for decades and watch
Miss Congeniality.  Or actually use your brain for once and see
something a little more intelligent.  Maybe try the Discovery Channel.
Director: Donald Petrie
Producer: Sandra Bullock
Writer: Marc Lawrence, Katie Ford, Caryn Lucas
Starring: Sandra Bullock, Benjamin Bratt, Michael Caine, William
Shatner, Candice Bergan
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Written, Directed, and Edited by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, and Joshua Leonard
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The Blair Witch Project can be described with many adjectives, one of which
is mildly nauseating. Watching the camera shake and shimmy and other
adjectives beginning with "s" used by William Shatner during Airplane 2, one
cannot help but either get a stomach ache or a headache and wonder why they
left the Alks Seltzer at home. Myself, I spent half of the movie thinking of
the old jingle: "pop, pop, fizz, fizz, oh what a relief it is."
 To describe The Blair Witch Project's plot is simple: three student
filmmakers decide to make a documentary and end up disappearing in the woods
of Burkitsville, Maryland. They spend time arguing and slowly disintegrating
into madness, at the same time being haunted by the Blair witch.
 The key word here is slowly. Although this, by technical definitions, is an
excellent horror movie, it remains as genre as anything else turned out. The
film takes its time getting to the scares, but does not make tension in the
meantime.
 Before I go on my analytical and essayistic diatribe, you should probably
know that The Blair Witch Project is a complete hoax. It is a hoax done so
well that one cannot help but be scared by it (I'll give The Blair Witch
Project that, it actually scared me at a few moments).
 The film, however a well done of a hoax it is, feels boring. It also feels
real.
 Supernatural elements aside, the dialogue, the camerawork, the emotions,
and even the timing: all of these things feel incredibly real to the viewer.
People do not suddenly go insane in real life: it is a slow process. Nor
does terror become complete immediately. The Blair Witch Project, taking its
time, is true to life as it displays the emotions and nature of what people
in that situation would be and feel like.
 This most likely comes from the way that the movie was filmed, from the
complete ad-libbing that makes up the script, and from the fact that the
actors and actresses had very little idea what was going on.
 However, as the film becomes more "realistic", it also becomes more boring.
As much as we would not like to admit it, the thing that attracts us to film
is the escapism from it. Even in ultra-realistic films such as Taxi Driver,
we still feel that bizarre contrast between being complete in the reality
that the movie creates while being separate from it. Our view of realism, of
Hollywood realism, is that of a good orchestral score, background music,
good cinematography, and all of the other technical aspects of filmmaking
that we take for granted. The emotions and reactions of the people may be
completely realistic, but, on some level, we want the fake. We want the
unreal -- and better -- camera angles, lighting, musical accompaniment and
contrived lines that go along with films.
 The Blair Witch Project gets my very lukewarm acceptance as a horror film,
if only because it hits its teen target head on. The teen crowds can go with
their girlfriends or boyfriends and make out (thus saving the need for
motion sickness pills), and they can, if they so wish, be cynical and crack
on the movie. The Blair Witch Project is open for insult in this fashion.
 As far as viewing The Blair Witch Project as a social commentary, I am
giving it a resounding recommendation. The Blair Witch Project, in the most
backhanded way, teaches us that what we truly are searching for in the
movies is not realism, but instead the illusion of it. Much as art is the
illusion of sentience, The Blair Witch Project illustrates the need for the
illusion of reality created by the movies. It illustrates, in a way very
difficult to achieve, the need for the contrived in our lives to make them
interesting.
 Concluding, The Blair Witch Project is oddly haunting, especially in the
aspect that it provides a mirror to our own desires. That it contains,
without script, without musical score, without any of the bonuses we take
for granted, a blistering satire of our own desires to experience not the
real, but the illusion.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To request a review, email MK2K@usa.net

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Written and Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Starring Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise,
Phillip Seymour Hoffman, John C. Reilly, Melora
Walters, Jeremy Blackman, Michael Bowen, William H.
Macy, Phillip Baker Hall, and Melinda Dillon
        In the spring of 1999, a whale beached itself on the
shores of sunny California.  The whale was dead as a
doornail... there was nothing anyone could do about
that.  The question became this: what do we do with
its body.  The State Troopers were in charge of this,
and they decided that the best thing to do would be to
blow it up.  The event was naturally something that
the media decides to drop by for.  In fact, not only
are the TV crews there, but everyone is there.  So the
State Troopers, they rig this big tub of blubber with
several tons of TNT, and wire it to blow.
        Huge pieces of whale fat are flying through the air. 
It's pandemonium.  People are running for their lives.
 The fat is so big, that one piece crushes a nearby
Volkswagen.
        Although no whales fly through the air, another
animal (in both the funniest and most bizarre sequence
I have seen all year) does.  You see, in Magnolia,
writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson would like us to
believe that this kind of thing happens all of the
time.
        The film Magnolia can be described as a series of
loosely interlocked narratives that demonstrate how
utterly surreal life is.  In Magnolia, we have 12 main
characters and 9 interlocking stories.  These stories
all play themselves out over a 24-hour period in the
San Fernando Valley.
        For those of you who immediately think Short Cuts
when I mention this, please don't.  There are two
major differences.  The first is that Short Cuts took
place over a weekend.  The second is that Short Cuts
was boring and drawn out.  Magnolia is as quick and
funny and touching as the stories it tells.
        Anderson handles his film with a steady hand that
this promises to be his best film ever despite its
three hour running time.  It also promises to be his
most bizarre and this is talking about the guy who
directed Hard Eight and Boogie Nights.
        Magnolia features several completely odd sequences an
moments, the first of which is a football-play-like
description of a suicide-turned-homicide (a man jumps
off a roof, only to be shot in the chest on the way
down.).  The second bizarre sequence is when every
different character of the film sings along to the
same song, despite the fact that the song is not
playing on any radio and the characters are all in
different locations.  The third is the crowning
achievement of the film, a series of moments that I
cannot adequately describe nor convey the greatness
of.  To say one thing about the film though, it is the
oddest thing I have seen all year and it kept me up
until 3:00 AM thinking about it.
        The largest question with the ensemble cast of
Magnolia is this: to whom will the academy awards go
to.  Nearly every actor and actress in the film
deserves an award for his or her work.  Basing my
predictions on the love of the Academy for
over-the-top performance, I predict a nomination for
Tom Cruise, who plays a man who makes his money off of
a program called "Seduce and Destroy."  To imagine the
character, picture Fight Club's Tyler Durden when he's
really horny.  Also, begging for an award is Julianne
Moore, who has already garnered two Golden-Globe
nominations for her works in The End of the Affair and
An Ideal Husband.  Moore plays a woman who has fallen
in love with the rich millionaire who she married for
money right while the man is on his deathbed.
        The only thing that Magnolia has to its discredit are
the speeches that Anderson placed in the film.  Every
time that one character opens his mouth, be ready for
a five-minute talk, because sooner or later, that's
what you'll get.
        As always, my top five fills up fast come December,
and this film takes Eyes Wide Shut's place as the
second-best film of the year.  It trails right after
American Beauty, by the length of a pin.
Join epinions, view the reviews, add your trust.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Again comes Randy with the brilliant and perhaps insightful line "Sequels
Suck". But is it true? That is the obvious question. Watching Scream 2 I
pondered over the simple matter, if it was true or if it was a running joke,
a falsity. Was the movie made worse on purpose, a bit of that brilliant
satire that Kevin Williamson showed about a year ago with "Scream", or was
it simply an unavoidable twist of fate.
Were it not for the fact that I respect Williamson so much, and that
Craven's masterful Red Right Hand directed this movie, I would have been
inclined to say Sequels Do Suck. Indeed, the rough draft of the script
sucked (everyone dies, Sidney, Gale, Dewey, Randy, Cotton, and all the new
people you've never heard of.) The hype was mixed, but, going into the
theater I was surprised.
Once again, as has become Williamson's style, a funny and scary opening is
followed by your traditional scary movie pee-break, a twenty to thirty
minute lapse of anything but character development before people get
slashed. And slash away is what Mr. Ghost Face does in this, oh, wait, its
not one of the "S" words.
How, you ask, does that happen when the rule is put down by Randy, the
know-all man of scary movies, that sequels suck? Quite simple, really, it is
both a sequel and a member of a trilogy (there is a running challenge to
find a superior sequel, to which "Empire Strikes Back" is offered, only to
be replied with "Not a sequel, part of a trilogy, planned from the
beginning"). You see, Scream was put out with a script for Scream and a
outline for Scream 2 and Scream 3 (there will probably be, however, a total
of 6 Scream movies.
Of course the fact remains, this sequel is inferior to the original. Sure,
its scarier, but Williamson has been given time to work on his craft of the
horror writing. But with more horror comes less of the comedy (though the
satire stays about the same, even if it is ambiguous).
So how inferior is it? Put Scream at a 10 and Scream 2 is an 8. See it if
you liked the first one. If you didn't, don't bother. If you didn't see the
first one, rent it and then see Scream 2.

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
Starring Julia Roberts, Susan Surrandon, Ed Harris
 Well, I just saw Shakespeare in Love.  That was filed under "S" for superb.
Three guesses what the "S" in Stepmom stood for.
 If you guessed correctly, you have a very good adjective to describe the
utterly boring and idiotic movie by Chris Columbus.  If you haven't guessed
it, you will by the end of the review.
 Stepmom follows Isabel (Roberts), fashion-photographer, stepmom TO BE, and
bitch extrodinaire.  It also follows Tammy (Surrandon): divorced mother,
terminally ill, and, again, bitch extrodinaire.  Both of these characters
are equally worthy of your hate, and both of these characters are supposed
to evoke some sort of sympathy from the viewers.
 Needless to say, they don't.  The rest of the plot is that Tammy, Luke's
(Harris) ex-wife, is dying from cancer and still has the energy to bite the
head off of Isabel, Luke's unlikable girlfriend and later fiancée BUT NEVER
WIFE.  The entire movie takes all the substance of a very badly written poem
or short story and spreads it out like gum onto your shoe into a two hour
long modern version of the rack.
 You don't laugh, you don't cry, you don't feel a thing.  The movie was
written by five writers, all of whom I am sure are nom de plums for monkeys
learning to type, and has nothing to show for the collaborative effort.
That, friends, is Hollywood at its best.  These people are being paid $1000
per screen minute or so and still are unable to turn out a product that
anyone in their right mind would think is anything other than crap.
 Chris Columbus decided to make this film either as a victim of binge
drinking or a bet, either one of them ending in obvious disaster.  Susan
Surrandon, Julia Roberts, Ed Harris, and the two poor children who will be
forced to place Stepmom on their earlier filmographies, all get experience
with fake tears.
 This was a film where my diatribe of picking on the film is more fun that
the film itself, and it is also a film to practice your aim of popcorn
kernels with.  Watching the film, I now understand the mind behind The Mad
Bomber, who placed pipe bombs in movie theatres in New York City during the
1950s.  Believe me, after seeing Stepmom, you will too.
 Of the other unforgivable aspects of the film, besides exploiting cancer as
a sympathy-getter for a badly written role without any hope of sympathy, you
have the simple fact of the title: Stepmom.  Think about this.  Julia
Roberts is the girlfriend, and the fiancée, but never is she the stepmom.
 Also you have the unforgivable mistake, and here comes a spoiler, that you
never actually see Susan Surrandon die.  As with Brandy in I Still Know What
You Did Last Summer, you keep waiting and waiting for the bitch to bite the
dust, but it never happens.  Instead, she tortures you with ten minute long
speeches and a film that feels like the ending of the story at the
beginning.
 I thought I wouldn't find a film with more pseudo-drama than Varsity Blues,
but, on a melodramatic scale of one to ten, Stepmom is a ten.  Yes, if it
happened to me, I would care if it were happening, but as it happens to
them, I just try to stay awake.
 For those who think they know what "S" stands for, it isn't sleepy and it
isn't stupid, but both of these apply.  Neither is it silly or sad or smart
or sassy or savvy.  None of those adjectives apply at all.  It would be
stuck in the middle of bad movies if it didn't try so damn much to be great.
But, aim hi, fall far...

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I was told, when I entered into the business of film criticism, that you
have to find the bad in the good and the good in the bad. That your job is
to be both pessimist and optimist, whatever the situation desires. But, you
know, it's hard to be optimistic about a film where pretty much all of the
theater groans at the end of it and is more fun making jokes about it than
watching it. I suppose, though, that I can say this about ISKWYDLS (or I
Still Know What You Did Last Summer, or ye movie with a title five words too
long): it never once uttered the words "I'll be right back."
After all, it hit every other cliché in the book on its bad attempt at
thrills in Paradise. Those who had sex died, the psychotic liars died, hell,
they even stuck in a witch doctor casting spells on Julie's toothbrush to
make things fun.
This time good old Captain Hook (aka Ben Willis) is alive and well (minus a
hand) and on a tropical island enjoying himself... gutting people. Julie's
there, of course, with her roommate (played by Brandy, my number one pick
for people who should be gutted this year), Brandy's horny boyfriend Tyrell,
and Julie's suitor, Will Benson. You have a psychotic bartender and an
annoying hotel clerk and, by the way did I mention that Julie and co. are
staying in the suites where murders occurred? Writers, can you say "trite"?
Now, as far as horror goes, I have nothing against cliché. Cliché is the
trademark of horror. If it's not cliché, it's either Dark Comedy (Scream,
Scream2) or Noir Horror (Lost Highway, Jacob's Ladder, Se7en). I watch
horror because I'm a violence happy 80s freak, who loves to laugh at the
dumb things or use them as an excuse for a date. Having no date the night I
saw it and therefore being forced to endure this incredibly cheesy movie
with no ability for comic element, and nothing laughable about it, I had to
resort to my own cracks which my neighbors found very annoying because, of
course, they had dates.
I liked the first one, but, Williamson (as said in Scream 2, ironically) is
right. Sequels suck. And, compadres, especially this one.

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
I just can't do it.  I just can't rubber stamp Jerry Maguire as a perfect
romance/sports movie, let sleeping dogs lie, and recant the bash that I
first wrote of it back when it was released.  I'd like to say that I want to
recant and am being stopped by higher journalistic ethics, but that's not
really it.  I just didn't like Jerry Maguire, and can't honestly send anyone
to a film that compromises its own integrity so many times while claiming to
be about integrity, ethics, ideals, and romance.
Jerry Maguire concerns (!you guessed it!) Jerry Maguire (Tom Cruise), a
sports agent who makes Arliss Michaels look like a two-bit hack.  Maguire,
faced with a kid who curses at him, decides to write a mission statement
that states `fewer clients, less money.'  When reality hits, he is fired for
writing this statement (before you think of the conglomerate agency he works
for as evil, remember that he is advocating something directly against
business ethics he is basically kamakazing himself), Jerry makes the sudden
switch back into money-grubbing sports agent.  Of course, a very public
nervous breakdown that caused the mission statement kind of gets in the way
of getting as many clients, so he's left with just two.  And, when one of
these clients drops him due to double talk by another agent, he's left with
linebacker Rod Tidwell (Cuba Gooding Jr) as his only income, no money, and a
single-mother employee Dorothy Boyd (Renee Zellwegger) to support.
>From here on in, the film is about as clear-cut as they come.  Rod triumphs,
Jerry triumphs, Dorothy triumphs and we're left listening to `shelter from
the storm' as the end credits roll.  But how does everyone triumph?  By
directly recanting on every moral stance they've taken, becoming the
money-grabbing schmucks they loathed, and marrying to make medical plans
simpler.  Who are we kidding?  Really?
Yes, Jerry Maguire sweeps you off your feet if your not looking for it,
because Jerry Maguire is inundated with all of those things that sweep
viewers off their feet.  Nice sports scenes, decent sex scenes, memorable
lines, vapid humor, and a soundtrack that you just want to own, but none of
this holds up when placed under even the lightest of scrutiny.  The acting
may be wonderful, but the script is so uncreative and illogical that you
might as well not ever bother.
Then, of course, you consider all of the little pet peeves that can annoy
the hell out of any techhead.  Take the sound mix.  How the hell did an
ex-Rolling Stone editor come out with such a terrible sound mix?  In a
restaurant, when the camera shifts back 5 feet, the sound is almost
completely washed out.  Dorothy, Jerry, and Rod are consistently overlit, so
much so that if this is an artistic technique Crowe is using it to overkill
levels.  What happened with this Cameron Crowe fluke?  Why does this film
exist, and why was it nominated for Best Picture?  Where the hell are
Singles and Almost Famous when you need them?
Yes, some level of Jerry Maguire applies to me.  I'm not a completely
callous critic, immune to all sweet talking movie stars and devoid of a
sense of romance.  Nor am I a football-hating intellectual.  But does this
film complete me?  I don't think so.
Director: Cameron Crowe
Writer: Cameron Crowe
Starring: Tom Cruise, Renee Zellwegger, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Jay Morh
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for My Dog Skip (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/d36db9c5bb0cb6db88256920000ccab7?OpenDocument
        The wise man once said "You can't run through the gauntlet of PACs
without getting somebody on their high horse."  Political Action
Committees -- groups that watch Hollywood second only to watching
Washington -- are so numerous in this jolly land of political
correctness in which we all reside, that nobody ever makes anything
without annoying some PAC.  It is like the Strait of Messia of
politics... sail your ship there, and without the guidance of a goddess,
your Argonauts shall fall into Poseidon's watery deep.
        Nobody survives the gauntlet... no one, that is, except for the
filmmakers of My Dog Skip.
        My Dog Skip is your standard kiddy fare -- trite message, half-decent
acting, something dealing with an animal thrown in, and messages that
hit you like the ten ton anvil falling on a Loony Toons character --
with one massive distinction... My Dog Skip prompts no political
reaction at all.  Try as you might, no PAC can find fault with the film.
        Although standard family values and conservative viewpoints are lauded
throughout My Dog Skip's utterly wholesome, WWII setting, no knee-jerk
liberal reactions are possible.  The SPCA will be utterly pleased that
all animal violence is both off screen and admitted as a terrible
thing.  The NAACP will be pleased that a civil rights subplot was thrown
in.  Women's Rights groups will be pleased that, although the father is
described as "overbearing" the mother still ends up being the one who
does the plumbing while the father cooks the meals.  And, in the brief
moment that hunters are featured, they get to bring down their game and
be characterized as villains at the same time.
        That being said, My Dog Skip still manages to pull a few family-related
heartstrings.  The film is a collection of a few positive life-lesson
subplots (kid gets dog, kid gets friends, kid gets girlfriends), each of
which are so kitschy that (combined with Harry Connick Jr.'s soft
narration) they manage to pull the emotional purse strings enough to get
little kids misty-eyed, and the adults get misty-eyed out of sympathy.
        Yet My Dog Skip, in its attempt to run the PAC gauntlet and please its
target audience at the same time, ends up being a totally forgettable
cinematic effort.  The characters' names slip into the data stream of
memory so quickly that they are revealed as nothing more than archetypes
as you recollect the film (he was the kid, he was the dad, it was the
dog).  The events of the movie take a little longer to leave you, but
they won't clutter it up for too long.
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Will Hunting (new star Matt Damon, from Francis Ford Coppola's "The
Rainmaker") is the epitome of all of our hopes and dreams. A genius, a
charismatic guy, smart and funny. He's also the worst things in today's
society. An orphan, a victim of abuse, out of control, angry, rebellious. He
can solve math equations in his sleep that have baffled the professional
community for years. He also is haunted by abusive foster-parent after
abusive foster-parent.
Combine him with MIT's most brilliant mathematician, a burn-out psychologist
(Robin Williams), a pre-med student (Minnie Driver), and three of the most
over-the-top street boy kids that you can imagine, and you have a poignant,
funny, and touching story to tell.
"Good Will Hunting" is one of those films that leaves you with a smile in
the midst of one of the most brilliant and saddest stories this year.
Between brilliantly written characters and a story that makes sense for
once, with people in it that you can form definite connections to, the
result becomes near perfect. It resides now in my mind and in my heart, and
also occupies the #3 spot for best movies of the year (#1 is LA
Confidential, #2 is As Good as it Gets).
The movie is powered by the best original screenplay (quote me on that one,
Golden Globe and Oscar) of the year: a profanity-laced, smart-talking script
devised by Massachusetts natives Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, not to mention
the razor-sharp direction of the brilliant Gus Van Sant (Drugstore Cowboys,
To Die For). With this they draw you into the world of Will Hunting as he
struggles with his past, present, and future.
The film has Will Hunting proving one of the most devious theorems that the
Math Department of MIT has ever devised, and, in consequence, this proof
becomes his Get out of Jail Free card. One a condition: That he seek
counseling. He tries to screw around with the first few shrinks until one
from the same side of the tracks comes along (played by Robin Williams).
This man has high hopes for Will Hunting, as does everyone, but truly has a
desire to help the lost soul. What follows is a search for himself that you
will never forget.

Title
Review for Deceiver (1997)
Written and Directed by Jonas Pate and Josh Pate
Starring Tim Roth, Chris Penn, Michael Rooker, and Renee Zellwegger
Its becoming pretty trendy to try to surprise the viewer.  It seems like,
every time I turn around, some critic friend of mine is blurbing about "a
twist ending rivaling such-and-such film."  The such-and-such is normally some
not-that-obscure, not-that-old film such as The Usual Suspects, 12 Monkeys,
The Sixth Sense.  My personal favorite would be calling it a "Nowhere Man"
ending, after the short-lived ultraparanoid UPN series about a photographer
whose existence is erased.  At the end of it all, he finds that he was never a
photographer to begin with and that he is the head of the organization he has
been fighting against and created a new identity and memories for himself so
that the security of their conspiracies could be tested.
Deceiver may not be the latest in this trend of trying to trick us, but it
is, like most of them, incredibly easy to predict.  You see, when you've
watched enough movies, you become immune to their tricks.  You see through
them, know the killer ten seconds in from their first facial expressions.
Unlike most of these movies, Deceiver scrapes by on the virtue of being
unpredictable enough that I had some doubt in my mind whether or not I was
correct.  Other than that and the fact that it uses a non-linear narrative
style, there is not much to distinguish Deceiver from your Joe-schmoe mystery
film... the ones where the movie buff can see where its going a mile away.
The plot of Deceiver is relatively simple.  Wayland (Tim Roth) is the only
suspect in the murder of Elizabeth Loftus (Renee Zellweger, in her first
outing since Jerry Maguire).  Wayland is one of those creepy types who happens
to be a violent and insane epileptic with homicidal fantasies and an alcoholic
to boot.  He's a Princeton grad with a 152 IQ and a BA in Psychology.  Against
him are Braxton (Chris Penn) and Kennesaw (Michael Rooker), IQs of 102 and 132
respectively.  Braxton is a former security guard at Wal Mart, Kennesaw a 20-
year vet of the force with a BA in Psych from UNC.  All of this info you get
in the first few minutes.
The murder is grisly; the girl has been sawed in half with different parts of
her body put in different parts of the city.  The motive appears non-existent.
 The only evidence they have is finding Wayland's phone number in her pocket.
The next hour and a half is a bunch of creepy conversation and mind games
related to the murder.
Sure, the dialogue is nicely scripted and writer-directors Jonas and Josh
Pate should get credit for being able to take the interrogation scene and
stretch it to make half the movie work, but the basic fact is that the movie
ends up exactly where you expect it to be.  In the end, there are no real
surprises.
The writers seem to spend their time walking the fine line between a very
good movie and a very bad one, between a film so completely original and so
completely typical that, when all is said and done, the film just kind of gets
on your nerves.  Like most horror movies, it can be enjoyed in a state of mind
where the majority of your brainpower is not actively working, but there is
not much to it beyond that.
The acting and directing is fine.  It is not great and it is not terrible. 
It lies, like the movie does, on the fine line between genius and madness.  Of
note is cinematographer Bill Butler, who manages to handle a semi-noir
lighting fairly well.  But, as far as the movie itself goes, rent 12 Monkeys
instead.  That one will get those cranial juices flowing.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Kiss or Kill (1997)
Rated R for violence, profanity, and sexuality
Written and Directed by Bill Bennett (Two if by Sea)
Starring Frances O'Conner (Love and other Catastrophes) and Matt Day (Love
and other Catastrophes)
 I could write this review with my eyes closed.  If it weren't for all the
typos you would see, that'd actually be a good idea.  What I can tell you is
that, for each of the four times I have seen this film, it has gotten better
and better.
 At first, I rented it on the basis of wonderful PR: a provocative back and
front cover of the video.  The second and third time, I rented it because I
had previously enjoyed it.  This final time, I taped it off of HBO at 1:10
in the morning...  I wanted it that much.
 Kiss or Kill, winner of the Australian Best Picture, Director, Actor, and
Actress awards in 1997, in the story of Niki and Al, a pair of thieves
marking married men, having Niki seduce them and drug them, and then robbing
them as a pair.  Niki is the victim of a childhood memory of her mother
being burnt to death in front of her eyes when she was six.  Al is the
disowned son of a Gold Coast millionaire.  Both lives equally tragic, they
survive with each other.
 When one of their marks dies of an overdoes, they set themselves to run for
Perth, but not before finding a suitcase with a pornographic video in it.
This video implicates Zipper Doyle in a child porn ring, and, somehow, has a
link into Niki's past.  Running for Perth, whoever they meet starts dying,
and they are left with only one option: distrust each other.
 As B-grade of a road movie as this may sound, it is the creme de la creme.
Kiss or Kill's characters are fully developed, it's script tainted with a
dark humor and gifted with a sublime mystery, and it's directing a steel
machine.  Kudos go out to Henry Dagnar, the editor, who does the most
innovative technique in years: cutting up each continuous shot to give the
viewer a "hurried" feeling.
 Niki and Al, on the run from the police, are set into a philosophical
examination of lies and truth.  As they are forced to mistrust each other,
they are forced to re-evaluate their love for one another and what they
thought they knew.  Rather than stage this examination in a quiet suburban
town, as the independent masterpiece Sex, Lies, and Videotape did, Kiss or
Kill uses the mystery of the murders that surround them to propel the story
along.  Everyone is on the run.
 Frances O'Conner and Matt Day, previously seen as friends in Love and Other
Catastrophes, are excellent as the couple on the run.  Should the movie have
been done in America, it very well would have won them an Academy Award.
Frances O'Conner projects exactly what she should: an aura of mystery and
self-distrust, not to mention a distrust of others, accompanied with a naive
intelligence.  She seems innocent, but is not.  Matt Day shows himself as an
angry victim of a father that ignored him.  Not as intelligent as Niki, but
good at masking it, Matt Day is the more practical of the two.
 Also of note are the two policemen on their train, whose names escape me
but who deliver perhaps the best scene of lies in recent times.  This comes
in the form of a breakfast talk about why one of them won't eat bacon, and
seems utterly serious until the end.
 Told in a detached manner, Bill Bennett was and should be recognized for
his brilliance.  He uses almost no lighting throughout the film, yet
persists in using scenes in darkened rooms in order to heighten the shadows
and thus the suspense.  Leaving no music in the film whatsoever, he allows
us to view this as if it were really happening, instead of as it was just
another movie.
 Kiss or Kill was a technical and colorful masterpiece, and deserves every
bit of praise I or anyone else could give it.  Enjoy, people, enjoy.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
 From the producer of Terminator 2 comes... (*gasp*) an expanded version of
the first five minutes of Terminator 2.  You all know the five minutes: the
time where the robots are killing every human being in sight.  Well, that's
basically the entire movie of Virus.
 In Virus, a super-intelligent electronic life form has inhabited first the
space station Mir and then a Russian science ship.  Everybody except for one
person on the science ship goes kaput.  A tug populated by scavenging
psychos happens upon the ship and decides to salvage it, so they reactivate
the power and, in doing so, the psychotic robots. In the immortal words of
"Seinfeld", yada, yada, yada.
 The yada, yada, yada?  The robots try to kill them for the next two hours
while I try to stay awake for the remainder of this boring horror flick.
 In the 80s, the golden age of slasher films, and in the 50s, the golden age
of B-movies, you could watch a horror film and laugh.  I did not laugh once
during this foray into the stupid and unoriginal.  The film is as patched
together as the robots it features: It steals from Relic, Terminator,
Terminator 2, Every Star Trek episode featuring the Borg, etc, etc, etc.
 I'm only glad I'm going to see The Thin Red Line tomorrow.  After this and
Varsity Blues, I'm ready to take a flame-thrower to Hollywood.
 If you haven't seen it, don't.  For those of you who've already made the
mistake that cost them two hours: Who's With Me?!

Title
Review for Kansas City (1996)
Directed by Robert Altman (The Player)
Starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Miranda Richardson, Harry Belafonte, Steve
Buscemi, Dermont Mulroney
    I'll be honest, Kansas City is Robert Altman's worst film.  Normally,
when I open a review with a line like that, I follow it up with an
explanation of how, even though it was his worst film, it still is mediocre.
But, I'll be honest once again, Kansas City isn't even a good film.
    Kansas City follows Blondie (Jennifer Jason Leigh), a desperate wife of
Johnny O'Hara (Mulroney) in her quest to get him back.  Johnny O'Hara is a
thief who robbed a black gambler only to be quickly caught and imprisoned by
Seldom Seen (Belafonte).  Blondie decides to kidnap Caroline (Richardson)
and use her as leverage against her connected husband to have him send in
Italians to free Johnny.
    Now, you're probably thinking what I was thinking.  How the hell does
that turn into a movie two hours long.  The answer, of course, is a series
on unnecessary plot devices and intercut jazz soundtrack.  The jazz
soundtrack, in fact, is the only thing that kept me from turning the video
off and watching Mother Night, my other film for my snowed-in day.
    Like Short Cuts, Kansas City incorporates jazz into the story.  In Short
Cuts it was part of the story.  In Kansas City, it may have well been the
story.  Admittedly, the performances weren't bad, with Miranda Richardson
giving a more-than-convincing performance as the opium-addict politician's
wife.  But there wasn't much of a plot, there wasn't any point, and there
wasn't anything special.
    It doesn't function as thriller, as noir, as drama, as comedy, or as any
other genre you can imagine.  Nor does it deliver the standard excellence of
Robert Altman's normally adept direction.
    Really, folks, what the hell was Robert Altman thinking?

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Written by Roberto Benigni and Vincezo Cerami
Starring Roberto Benigni, Nicolette Bruschi, Giustino Durano, Giorgio
Cantarini, Horst Buchholz
     I've been putting off this review for a long time.  I saw it at
Waterworks Cinemas in Pittsburgh about three weeks ago and haven't gotten
around to reviewing it until now: three days after it won several academy
awards.  Why?  Like with Saving Private Ryan, I have an incredible
difficulty having my words do justice to this film.
     Life is Beautiful centers around Guido (Roberto Benigni), a Jewish
waiter.  The first half, a hilarious and uplifting story, concerns his
wooing of Dora (Nicoltette Bruschi, real-life wife of Benigni), an
upper-class girl engaged to a man she does not love.  The second half, both
terribly sad and terribly joyous, concerns Guido's, Dora's, and their son
Joshua's internment at a death camp during WWII, during which Joshua is told
by his father that `it is all a game' in order to emotionally shield him
from the holocaust.
     In the opening of the movie, Benigni lets his comedic talents shine:
the first scene seems directly derived from the classic comic bit about the
brakes of a car failing, with a twist put in.  As the car speeds through a
village expecting the king and as Benigni tries to wave people out of the
way, they wave back, mistaking him for their ruler.  Very quickly the actual
plot appears, when Dora and Guido meet while they are fixing the car's
brakes at a farm.  Dora has been stung by a wasp on the leg and Guido
gallantly offers to suck the poison out.
     Watching these first scenes, you almost forget that the film's plot
concerns the holocaust.  Schindler's List bombarded you from frame one with
harsh imagery, giving you a generally depressed feeling about it, but Life
is Beautiful opts to take a comedic approach (no small effort) and makes you
feel good instead.  I would think that approach number two is the better one
(not to call judgment on a better film), for Schindler's List drowns you in
pessimism until the end, where as Life is Beautiful gives you a fair mix of
optimism and realistic pessimism.
     The first half showcases brilliant screenwriting as each joke is more
well-placed than the last, and often just as funny.  Benigni is willing to
do kid's humor of broken eggs in a hat, the adult humor of sucking the wasp'
s venom out, and the tongue-in-cheek humor that dots Benigni's conversations
with his uncle (Giustino Durano).  Benigni and Bruschi draw on past
collaboration with The Monster and Johnny Toothpick in order to create a
near-perfect bond between the two.
     When the film hits phase two it seems to take an abrupt turn to the
serious: the third scene you are greeted with has Joshua asking his father
why a sign says `No Jews or Dogs'.  Even then, Guido tries to shield his son
from the world around him by telling him that they just don't want Jews in
their shop or Dogs in their shop, promising to place a sign in his shop
tomorrow that says: `No Spiders or Visgoths.'
     The next day, Guido and Joshua are shipped off to the concentration
camp.  Dora, unwilling to leave her husband, demands to be put on the train
with them.  Even inside of the camp, Guido is unwilling to inform his son
that anything bad is happening.  He tells him instead that the camp is part
of an elaborate game.  The object is to get a thousand points and the winner
gets a real tank.
     Life is Beautiful is a strange contrast to the pessimism often seen in
movies.  For one, you love the characters so much that you want everything
good for them, despite the circumstances.  For two, you are given a positive
message to leave with instead of a negative one.  For three, the movie has
the ability to make you laugh, smile, and cry, both from tears of joy and
grief.  Make sure you see it.  If you can't watch it in theatres, then rent
it when it comes out, but see it.  See it because, as the movie will tell
you, life truly is beautiful

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
Written by Josef Rusnak and Ravel Centeno-Rodreguiz
Based on the novel "Simulacron 3" by Daniel F. Galouye
Starring Craig Berko, Gretchen Mol, Vincent D'Onofrio, Dennis Haysbert, and
Armin Mueller-Stahl
     All right, we know we've reached a new level when every the completely
surreal seems completely predictable.  When the weird is the norm, something
is very, very wrong.  Right now you're saying something along the lines of
"Come on: since when have we been able to predict movies that make no sense
whatsoever?"
     The answer: ever since The Thirteenth Floor.
     Either gifted or cursed (depending on your mindset) with a complex
plot, The Thirteenth Floor is the first movie that the blundering idiot of a
producer Roland Emmerich has turned out that has any plot at all.  The
lesson to be learned from this: be careful not to use to much cooking
sherry, lest you get drunk while eating.  Emmerich, normally playing the
fool as to the lack of plot he gives us, tries instead to give us too much
to be supported by the weak frame of a story that is set up.
     The story, having something to do about playing God, piles onto us a
lot of unnecessary romance, uninteresting intrigue, and piss-poor subplots.
Although the plot is completely surreal and bizarre, it comes off as a mix
and mash between Dark City and The Matrix we are all living in a virtual
reality experiment  where we can never get to a certain location.  In a
foolish attempt to make the story more interesting to us, The Thirteenth
Floor throws in a bit of eXistenZ to boot.  This virtual reality we live in
is a recreational game of sorts which someone is trying to repair.  Then,
perhaps as a personal bit to annoy intelligent viewers, it places in an
idiotic romance.
     The tekkies will hate this film for one simple reason, a flaw in the
story.  The way the characters discover their illusion is travelling to its
end, where they see a grid of green lines.  If the programmers of this
"genius" experiment are intelligent enough to render sight, smell, taste,
touch, and sound, not to mention the consciousness of all of the characters
living inside the machine, then why the hell can't the stick them in an
indefinite loop which will send them to the other side of the simulation?
An easy wrap around?  Sure, the characters would know something was wrong,
but they wouldn't be able to pinpoint it.
     Now that I am finished taking apart its plot I choose to take apart the
acting.  Wait, the acting is fine, but the roles are weak.  Vincent
D'onofrio confirms my suspicions that he is getting all of the creative
roles left by his portrayal as both protagonist and antagonist.  Seriously,
who's he bribing?  Gretchen Mol, who I saw once before in Rounders, gets a
slightly better written role in this one, but still not a great part.  The
movie completely makes waste of Armin Mueller-Stahl.
     Can't someone pass some legislation regarding wasting good actors in
bad roles?
     The one thing that I must mention at the end of this review is for
people who are interested in The Thirteenth Floor but think that Ethernet is
some kind of hospital anesthetic: for people who don't know technology,
people who don't like science fiction, and people who don't have high
standards for film, this film is fine for you.  Although the characters are
underwritten, they will attach onto you like leeches and thus stick with
you.  Although the plot and story are predictable to anyone who spends time
trying to figure them out, the film can be enjoyed by those willing to shut
their minds off.  Just don't expect anything anywhere near as intelligent or
scary as the previews imply.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Written by Mike Myers and Michael McCullers
Starring Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Robert Wagner, Rob Lowe, Seth Green,
Mindy Sterling, Verne Troyer
     I did an article the week before this came out defending parody movies.
In retrospect, I believe I should have picked another time to defend them.
Austin Powers: The Spy who Shagged Me, a thoroughly ridiculous film, falls
victim to the curse of comedies everywhere: the plot becomes a vehicle for
the jokes.
     Early on in the movie, as Austin Powers (Mike Myers) is about to travel
back in time in order to thwart the plans of Dr. Evil (also Mike Myers), he
unearths a major plothole in the movie and tries to bring it up to a Q-like
figure in the movie.  This person playfully intones.  "I suggest you don't
worry about things like that."  Then he turns to the audience and says.
"That goes for you, too."  This kind of laissez-faire attitude towards the
plot is carried on throughout the remainder of the film.  Every plot hole is
ignored, every glitch bypassed with a trite device, and every sense of plot
direction lost.
     For this reason, telling you the plot of the movie is a moot point,
considering that the entire plot doesn't matter at all in relation to the
jokes.  The jokes just pop up out of nowhere.  Some of them are funny, some
of them aren't.  The majority of them just basically take up time.
     A higher percentage of the jokes are funnier than in the first Austin
Powers, but this one has the same tiring, trite humor that James Bond can
pull off but Austin Powers can't.  It has a genius sequence describing a
rather... odd shaped spaceship, a fine part in which "The Jerry Springer
Show" is rather effectively parodied, and a continuation of the highly
demented psychodrama that makes up the relationship between Scott Evil (Seth
Green of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" fame) and Dr. Evil, but the film in and
of itself remains nothing but a vehicle for these jokes to travel in.
     Because these jokes seem just stuck in, you never really get into the
characters (Heather Graham's Felicity Shagwell being the exception, but I
have a thing for that actress and have had a thing for her since Drugstore
Cowboy), so, when the jokes are made, you don't really laugh as much as you
normally would.  If fact, you don't really laugh much at all.  It's more of
a chuckle film.
     In the effort to fit in so many good jokes, the film drags its feet
like a man on the night before his wedding.  It really doesn't want to go.
Add to this list of things that this film lacks: Inertia.  Other things that
it also lacks are characters, good actors, true intelligence, and the
special zing that makes a parody film worthwhile.
     I'm not going to turn around and bash parody films, as I'm sure
everyone else who is giving Austin Powers: The Spy who Shagged Me the
lackluster reviews it deserves will be doing.  Instead, I make the
suggestion that this film would be much, much better as a stand-up comedy
sketch.  In a stand up sketch, you don't really need plot, only direction
and a target, both of which Austin Powers have in abundance.  Myers, an SNL
veteran and a fine stand up comedian, would have done fine with that... but
no.  Instead, I had to sit through 95 minutes of good jokes stuck in a very,
very bad movie.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Directed by Mimi Leder (The Peacemaker)
Written by Bruce Joel Rubin (Jacob's Ladder) and Michael Tolkin (The Player)
Starring Robert Duvall (The Godfather), Tea Leoni (Bad Boys), Elijah Wood
(The Faculty), Vanessa Redgrave (Celebrity), Morgan Freeman (The Shawshank
Redemption), Ron Eldard (The Last Supper), Blair Underwood (Gattaca), Jon
Favreau (Swingers), Maximillian Schell (Vampires), James Cromwell (Titanic)
As a country, we've seen it all for disaster movies. We've seen massive
destruction of the world's cities by aliens (Independence Day). We've seen
volcano's nix the small town and the big city (Dante's Peak and Volcano).
We've seen New York's traffic jammed Holland Tunnel go out from under us
(Daylight). We've seen ships go thrillingly awry in space  TWICE (Apollo 13
and 2001), and comically awry as well (Airplane II : The Sequel) And, of
course, we've seen the worlds most revered ocean liner go down, letting 11
Oscars surface for old Jim (Titanic). And this summer, on the platter for
the American cinema audience, we get to watch planet Earth get nuked, not by
aliens, not by a giant monster (but we get to see New York City get trampled
(Godzilla)!), but by asteroids.
As an action movie, having given away the majority of its plot twists in the
promos, Deep Impact utterly fails. The writers, Michael Tolkin and Bruce
Joel Rubin, veterans of thriller-dramas (The Player and Ghost,
respectively), don't help, but the failure is due mostly to Mimi Leader, the
"ER" vet who, when she shipped herself onto the big screen with The
Peacemaker, started sinking her own career. She can't seem to actually
thrill the audiences for more than a few quick seconds, which are few and
far apart.
But, friends, it did not, like most of the B-rate disasters above (Titanic,
Apollo 13, and 2001 as the exclusion), come out like something put through
the grinder. The movie, through excellent writing and smart plot twists (in
the characters), has a human element rarely seen in the Action genre. This
is a great movie to take your kids too, totally appropriate for all ages, a
good movie for anyone who likes a drama to see, and, if you kind of like
drama and also like a few thrills but can't stand an all out rush, its worth
it too.
Long winded at points as it may be, Deep Impact will probably the best done
disaster movie of the year, and, as long as you can stand about two hours in
the theatre with only about thirty minutes of action, then it is absolutely
worth it.

Title
Review for Doom Generation, The (1995)
Earlier in my many diatribes about the world of celluloid, I have described
my paradigm for grading a film.  The more fodder to which it provides me in
the form of raw insults, one-liners, and pot shots that need to be taken,
then a critic's level of verbosity is directly related to the cinematic
quality of the film.  The higher up the quality ladder a film goes, the more
a critic is forced to resort to oftentimes clichéd praises, such as `great
acting' or the ever-dreadful `best film of the year.'  High enough up into
the quality stratosphere, and the greatest of films initially provide almost
no response.  They're pondered over.  Introductory paragraphs are mulled
over for hours, and philosophical diatribes that earn us insults such as
`elitist prick' ensue.
In case you haven't yet caught on by the ironic tone of that BS introductory
paragraph, I really liked The Doom Generation.  In fact, it was good enough
that the initial response provoked was a sensory overload, and a mere two
words escaping my lips: `Fucked up.'  In the two years since initially
watching this masterpiece of perversion and post-apocalyptical philosophy, I
have come up with other descriptors.  Ironic.  Incredible.  Intelligent.
Sardonic.  Satirical.  Irreverent.  Beautiful.  Homoerotic.  Pensive.  In
fact, this is one of those movies where I can make up an adjective for each
letter of the alphabet to describe The Doom Generation.
Sadly, two of those adjectives happen to be `subversive' and `underground,'
resulting in a generalized lack of awareness as to what The Doom Generation
is.
The Doom Generation, put as simply as possible, is a near-apocalyptic
joyride through the netherworld of Los Angeles that takes pot shots on all
that America considers Holy and makes any ardent lover of cult films want
to bow to director Gregg Araki's greatness.
It starts off at a techno party in the land of wherever, LA, America.
Lights flash, Nine Inch Nails blares, and we are greeted with a title card
that says `A Completely Heterosexual Movie by Gregg Araki.'  Then Amy Blue
(Rose McGowan, whose largest parts have been the female lead in Jawbreaker
and playing Tatum in Scream) says, `fuck.'  Like everyone else in LA, she's
in post-riot mode.  Confused, thinking the end time is nigh but not wanting
to put it into religious terminology, and in a quasi-steady relationship
with Jordan White (James Duval).  Having gone out for a really long time (a
month), Blue and White are about to consummate their relationship in a
really cheap car when Xavier Red (Johnathon Schaech) gets into a fight right
outside, begins stabbing people, and ends up being let inside of their car.
Red, White, and Blue grab a hotel room for the night, Amy keeps being
mistaken for everyone's former girlfriend, and Red and White keep sleeping
with Blue as a way to deal with their homoerotic potential.
If you think it's crazy now, wait until the end of the movie.
One of the few films where complete and utter absurdity doesn't hurt the
plot, The Doom Generation careens down LA freeways with the top down and its
middle finger extended.  If you're able to stand a film that knows no
boundaries, then The Doom Generation is for you.  You will find pearl after
pearl of anarchistic wisdom within Gregg Araki's vision, and laugh after
laugh at the prevalence of bizarre experiences (and the number 666).  But if
you're a conservative who has somehow made it past my mentions of gay sex,
satanic imagery, metal, and a satirizing of American values, than by all
means stay away.  Lock up your children.  Find out if any relatives of Joe
McCarthy are currently in the Senate.  Otherwise, enjoy.
Director: Gregg Araki
Producer: Gregg Araki, Andrea Sperling
Writer: Gregg Araki
Starring: Rose McGowan, James Duvall, Johnathon Schaech
In order to hear about some more messed up movies, join James' mailing list:
http://filmcritic2000.listbot.com/
Short Stuff, reviews of Short Films and Hypermedia:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
That's it.  The nostalgia trip is heading for a long walk off of a short
pier.  I mean, really, who pitched this movie, and how did they pull it
off?  Was it, "Come on, let's revisit those good old days when we were
worried the reds would nuke the crap outta us."  Or, "It's potential
nuclear holocaust... with a heart."  And, if I didn't know the answer to
the question of what moronic producer would buy the rights to the
project (I'll give you a hint: he's also the film's biggest star), I'd
ask that, too.
Thirteen Days, the second film of 2000 to do a number on the
Massachusetts accent (really, you should hear Costner, he sounds like a
drunk New Jerseyite), deals with a time period of 13 days during which
we almost destroyed the world.  No, it's not Crimson Tide, Part 2.  It's
the Cuban Missle Crisis, and it's presented here to us by the incapable
hands of director Roger Donaldson, who gives us such terrors as the
"artistic" blending of black and white and a digitally constructed White
House exterior.  And, spending two-and-a-half hours exploring as few
facets of this story as possible, Roger Donaldson tries to keep us
guessing.  His goofy mind tricks are so incompetent that, at one point
as the film underwent technical difficulties, I had to just yell out,
"So come on, did we all die or what?"
There really isn't much that I can tell you about the events within
Thirteen Days that you can't read in books, but in case you never
attended junior high and think the Cuban Missile Crisis was a bad porno,
here's the story: In 1962, the Soviets began putting nukes in Cuba,
hoping to blow us away.  Forget the fact that we had missiles in Europe
and had similar attack capabilities -- the Soviets could have blown us
away in about five minutes, and, as Americans, we were really pissed off
about this.
Admittedly, the Cuban Missile Crisis was a bit before my time, but come
on, do we have to see the movie?  And even if we have to see the movie,
does it have to be this bad?  Every time a new character is introduced,
they come complete with a subtitle bearing their name and position, and
are then greeted.  It's surprising Bruce Greenwood doesn't wear a
nametag that reads, "Hello, My name is Mr. President."
Dramatic family montages, cheap stock footage, cliched characters,
they're all here.  And, even worse, the film drags on for the
aforementioned 2 1/2 hours, all failing to build even a semblance of
suspense.  Imagine Apollo 13 if it were made really badly -- bad
filmmaking coupled with an ending that you can't change (though
Donaldson actually tries to trick us at many points by interspersing
stock footage of nuclear explosions into the movie, we know better). 
The result is not a reliving of the Cuban Missile Crisis: It's a
sickening exploitation of a historical event.  Don't believe me?  Go to
the movie's web site (see below) and check out the strategic military
exercise, a game in which it's your patriotic responsibility to destroy
all Russian forces.
Director: Roger Donaldson
Producer: Peter O. Almond, Kevin Costner, Armyan Bernstein
Writer: David Self
Starring: Kevin Costner, Bruce Greenwood, Stephen Culp
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Story by Jonathan Lemkin, Alfred Gough, and Miles Millar
Starring Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, Joe Pesci, Chris Rock, and Jet
Li
The equation for the number of new major players in the Lethal Weapon series
is simple.  Take the number that the movie is in the series and add one. 
Hence, Lethal Weapon has two cast members, Lethal Weapon 2 has three, Lethal
Weapon 3 has four, and Lethal Weapon 4 has five.  This time out, the new
addition is that of Chris Rock, who functions as a much less annoying Joe
Pesci and is able to slip easily into the idea of a buddy action-comedy,
despite having never gone into that uncharted territory.
Sure, he's a comedian, and comedians don't normally make a one-time switch to
a buddy-action comedy (in the case of people like Martin Lawrence, it's more
of a permanent move), but the Lethal Weapon series has always been far from
typical.  It practically spawned the buddy action-comedy back in 1987 with its
first outing and has been redefining the genre of its own creation ever
since.
Lethal Weapon 4, like all of the other Lethal Weapon films, is timely.  This
one concerns illegal immigration from China, something that has drastically
increased since Hong Kong was handed over in 1997.  The fall of Hong Kong also
comes into play, but I opt not to give away what little bit of mystery there
is to the plot.  Also in the mix is the fact that Martin Riggs (Mel Gibson) is
facing the prospect of parenthood along with IAD Sergeant Lorna Cole (Rene
Russo).  And, compounding the multiple family problems that Roger Murtaugh
(Danny Glover) already has, his daughter Rianne is going to be a mother but
who's the father?
The characters, already developed over the past 14 years of the saga,
continue to grow and expand in the fourth (and perhaps final) installment. 
Herein lies the separating aspect of the series: as we all know, action movies
are really supposed to have either plot or characters.  Yet, in Lethal Weapon
4 (and all of the other Lethal Weapon films), not only do we have characters
that we know and like, but we have a continuing and ever-expanding dynamic. 
We have a sharply written script.  We have a tightly directed film.  In short,
we have everything we don't expect.
For those who target Lethal Weapon 4 as being formulaic, remember that in
fact they invented the formula.  They are working with, and altering, their
own creation as they go.  As proof of this I offer the dozens of great lines
that pop up throughout the film, each of which would qualify as bad dialogue
did we not know the characters so well as to have their ability to think up
good responses and joke under pressure down to an art.  Also, the standard of
most action movies (grabber sequence, plot development, action sequence,
repeat) was started with Lethal Weapon yet is not always utilized by it. 
Lethal Weapon 4 often blends plot development and action sequences together,
or separates them so little as to never allow the viewer to get bored.
Going with my formula of a positive review, I begin the problems paragraph
with my constant: As always, I have my gripes.  The acting is as bad as it
ever was.  Gibson may be furnished with a great character to work with, but
that does nothing for his thespian abilities.  Chris Rock isn't quite as funny
as he always has been, and this falls to the fault of the writers who tried to
inhibit his native comic genius by making him do the standard bits (i.e. the
"They screw you with" bit that appears in every movie from Lethal Weapon 2
on).  Joe Pesci continues being Joe Pesci an annoying person.  Whether this
is intended or not, it gets on the viewers nerves.
My final complaint comes in the form of the message that it tries to insert. 
I do like my action movies timely, but I don't like them to be political. 
With its overwhelming message about the importance of family, Lethal Weapon 4
serves to waste about twenty minutes of screen time.
Were those twenty minutes cut, we would have had a really great action film
on our hands.  As it is, we have to settle for a pretty good action film.


Title
Review for Crash (1996)
Watching Crash, the recurring thought that popped into my mind was `Damn, I
wonder how these people afford auto insurance.'  I mean, here we have a
movie about people screwing like rabbits while at the same time crashing
cars left and right.  And, although Crash's really made of a lot tougher
stuff than the two of those, they constitute such a large amount of the plot
and curious draw of this safe haven of sadomasochism that the producers used
the quote `sex and car crashes' (ironically, from a review that blasts the
film) to advertise their celluloid psychosexual psychosis.  Leave it to me
to be thinking of auto insurance rates, when a sexy actresses like Deborah
Kara Unger is going at it onscreen.
Crash is the story of James Ballard (James Spader, picking his most
interesting (and perverse) role since Sex, Lies, and Videotape)), a man who
is living in a marriage with a primal curse: his wife, Catherine (Deborah
Kara Unger), cannot reach orgasm.  She loves sex  her habits are downright
nymphomaniacle and the marriage is open-ended  but nothing she can do can
make her reach orgasm.  Her husband makes this both his personal quest and
problem the two wonder constantly about each other's sexual partners, go at
it at least twice a day, and often have sex at the office.  Yet nothing's
quite doing it for Cathy.  She's just not getting her big O.
One day, while driving home from working on a car crash safety commercial,
Ballard has a head-on-collision with Dr. Helen Remmington (Holly Hunter).
Remmington's husband dies, flying through the windshield, and the last thing
Ballard witnesses before he passes out is Remmington ripping open her shirt
and proceeding to begin enjoying herself in the car.
Once out of rehab for the accident, Ballard meets Vaughn (Elias Koteas,
acting just as creepy as he did in Exotica): a man obsessed with the sexual
aspect of the car crash.  Vaughn lives in his car and re-enacts famous auto
accidents for a living, starting us off with an absolutely riveting
performance of James Dean's fatal car crash.  Played with a charismatic
schizophrenia reminiscent of Tyler Durden, Vaughn's the type of person
leading a quieter revolution towards `the recreation of man in a mechanical
form' a world in which the lines between male and female, as well as those
between humanoid and machine, are blurred.  The DOT doesn't like this all
too much, but this openly sexual underground goes far beyond them in staying
hidden.
Most of the rest of the movie is spent developing a love triangle between
Vaughn and Ballard and Catherine yep: get ready for a little good old
homoeroticism or get out.  One particular scene that will cause the
religious right to freak is when Unger vividly describes the taste of semen
to excite Ballard.
One of the few films that could work for both a trechcoat-wearing
theatergoer and a highbrow intellectual at the same time, Crash manages to
simultaneously ask the questions `What makes for a normal relationship?' and
`Have you gotten off yet?' and not, well, crash in the middle.  Yet when it
reaches the end we have solved nothing, proved nothing.  No character
progress has been made, and Cathy still has her little problem.  If I were
less tired and more patient, I might rewatch Crash to try to figure out what
the hell is going on here, but it's late, and I'm ready to simply say what
just about everyone else says when they're done watching Crash: `Boy, that
was one really fucked up movie.'
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
Officially, the new Bond will get back media because the media is the
villain, much like with Natural Born Killers. Unofficially, it still sucks.
But its, you must understand, more classic bond. That's true for all the
bond scripts, predictable with a bunch of one liners. Think of Bond as
Freddy or Jason, with a change for the good, better looks, and a Makarov
pistol instead of a chainsaw or the Edward Sciscorhands motif. You have to
like the classic kind to like any of them. Goldeneye WAS NOT classic bond,
and, in my mind, that made it an inferior sequel because it didn't work with
Sequel mentality.
That isn't to say that "Tomorrow Never Dies" didn't suck. In fact, most
"Bond"'s are only useful because we get a really good song at the beginning
(I.E. "Nobody does it better" in the beginning of "The Spy Who Loved Me").
That and to help along movies that spoof them (Spy Hard and the infamous
lines in Trainspotting: "He's always been lacking in moral fiber."
"He knows a lot about Sean Connery"
"That's hardly a substitute")
You gotta admit the stunts were good, and on the overall the technological
aspect of the movie was as good as any, but the acting, directing, etc. The
parts that make a movie good, sucked. Brosnan's British accent may be real,
but his part of 007 and his silly interactions, combined with his aged looks
make him not play 007 well. The idea that women would THROW themselves at
him just doesn't make sense. But, hey, women are one of life's mysteries.
As for the women in this movie, combined with Price (I'm reasonably sure he
either was once or wishes to be a woman (murder over jealousy, such a
feminine motive)). I don't know WHY anyone wanted to be in this bond film.
They don't get good lines at all, or good names (Wai Lin?? PARIS???) Nothing
compared to Onatop. Oh well, Expect great and you will be disappointed.
Expect nothing and you won't.

Title
Review for Closer You Get, The (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/3390af25a2a02f61882568a50018f2bd?OpenDocument
Starring Nimah Cusack, Sean McGinley, Ian Hart, Ewan Stewart, Ruth
McCabe, Sean McDonagh, Cathleen Bradley, and Deborah Barnett
 In Angela's Ashes, we got the impression that growing up a kid in
Ireland really sucks.  In The Closer You Get, we are made to believe
that Irish adulthood doesn't get much better.
 All right so we don't have to wait till the sequel to see Emily Watson
be cremated and we don't have to sit through two hours and twenty
minutes of a film that make a suicidal lemming seem like a happy chump,
but The Closer You Get isn't exactly a movie that sketches the Irish as
progressing far into their adulthood.  In store for Irish men in
adulthood is a simple life of multiple pints of flat Guinness combined
with a sexual desperation so great that the Irish men take out a want ad
in the Miami Herald.
 Don't worry  The movie is about twenty times better than its plot.
 Despite some initial mulling over the woman at the Post Office over
whether or not to even send the advertisement, the ad does get sent
through and does end up in the Miami Herald.  In between then and the
time when the American women are to arrive (an annual dance at the end
of May), the Irish men predictably find exactly what they were looking
for all along at home.
 So how does this manage to take up 97 minutes?  Well, it's love Irish
style.  As in almost all Irish comedies, we see two very good traits
coupled with one very bad one.  The good traits are a predilection
towards running jokes and a tendency towards a comedy of errors.  The
bad trait is the incredibly slow pace at which small town Celtic
comedies proceed.
 The Closer You Get is one of those movies that is funny as hell when it
tries to make a joke, but it is also one of those movies that goes along
at the speed of a Delaware driver in the Route one corridor of New
Jersey.  As a result, I found myself alternating between two states as I
watched this movie laughing very hard and damn near asleep.
 There are a few scenes in which The Closer You Get really borders on a
cure for insomnia.  There are more scenes in which The Closer You Get is
downright funny.  And, after seeing it, you'll never think of window
shopping the same way again.  But overall, The Closer You Get gets by as
mediocre.
 Thus I pass the same advice to The Closer You Get as I have passed on
to other small town Celtic comedies such as The Matchmaker.  Nice try,
but you would need an intern for a humidor just yet.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
 Why do people do such stupid things?  Why do we marry people we hate,
divorce people we like, and, above all, why the hell would MTV want to try
to be dramatic?
 Yes, you heard my right, Music Television Productions has decided all of a
sudden that there is something serious about gangster rap and N'Sync and
Backstreet Boys and all of these other bubble-gum teeny-bob-wanna-screw-'em
bands.  It's bad enough that the degraded the once moderately intelligent
real world into a cheap soap opera, but, come on, do they have to make
football dramatic?
 Well, I guess someone thought they did, because someone set down to
creating the cheapest possible storyline about a team trying to win their
23rd Division Championships.  And of course the team is helmed by the coach
from hell, played by Jon Voight, displaying all of the collective charm of
Adolph Hitler (we he quiets the audience in the beginning, I swore to God
that he would say "Se Keil").
 Of course they decided to helm the actual cast of the movie with James Van
Der Beek, teen idol and girls' drool tool from "Dawson's Creek".  And he
plays the same moderately innocent idealistic youth.  In Varsity Blues,
being a writer is all he wants and he spends his time reading Kurt Vonnegut.
In "Dawson's Creek", all he wants is to be a director and he spends his time
watching Spielburg.
 As far as storyline goes, there really isn't one.  There really isn't a
plot or a point, either.  But I forgot to tell you: If you're more of a
football fan than a moviegoer, by all means, enjoy the mainstream crap that
Paramount decided to dish you.  I'm not blaming you.  I'm blaming them.
 As more of a movie critic than a football fan, I can say that the only
thing about Varsity Blues that I actually enjoyed were the moderately
well-directed football games.  If they filmed football like that on TV, damn
right I'd be sitting there every Sunday Afternoon and Monday Night.
 But it isn't and I'm not.  Varsity Blues isn't enjoyable to the
non-football fan.  It doesn't even much deliver on the promise of nothing
but "sex and football".  On the James Brundage
how-much-did-they-unnecessarily-screw meter, it scored a 1 out of 10.
 I'm not telling you not to see it due to a lack of redeeming value.  God
knows I love action movies like True Lies and Blade that couldn't care less
about message.  But, for Christ's sake, why do I have to watch a one hour,
forty minute pseudodrama about a sport that should stay on the field and off
the movie set.
 I don't know why people do such stupid things.  I can't offer any answers,
only advice.  And the advice I offer you is direct, simple, and to the
point.  Don't do another stupid thing by paying anything to see "Varsity
Blues".

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Directed by Steven Soderburgh (Sex, Lies, and Videotape)
Starring George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Dennis Farina, and Ving Rhames
 This would be a movie for thanksgiving, because, after seeing Steven
Soderburgh's Elmore Leonard adaptation Out of Sight, I'm read to give
thanks.  I'd like to give thanks that Hollywood is still capable of turning
out a decent character, even if it is based on a book.  I'd like to give
thanks that George Clooney finally lifted his eyes off the ground and looked
into the camera for once.  And I'd really like to give thanks that I saw Out
of Sight, which has more fun than I've gotten from a film since December.
 Out of Sight, a movie that I planned to see in theatres but just got around
to, is one of the funniest crime films I've ever seen, hilarious to the same
point as Get Shorty (another Elmore Leonard adaptation by Scott Frank).  It'
s out of control yet well-plotted, overtly quick yet well paced.  It mixes
and matches story with sentimentality, which, as anyone who hears my daily
gripe about cinema knows, is a rare thing.
 The plot of Out of Sight is as wacky as Get Shorty: The worlds most
prolific bank robber Jack Foley (Clooney) escapes from a Florida prison,
kidnapping a Federal Marshall, Karen (Lopez), while he's at it.  Hiding in
the back truck on Karen's car while a friend (Ving Rhames) drives them to a
second car, they talk about  movies?  An immediate romantic connection is
formed, and we are given a window into a very unique love story.  One half
of Clooney is planning his big score, another half trying to seduce Lopez
while not being arrested by her.
 Although not as complex of a story as Get Shorty was, the tale of Jack
Foley is equally unique and satiric.  Each Elmore Leonard adaptation seems
both vastly different and interestingly the same.  All of them have
criminals as the main characters, all of them have one person so ahead of
the game that you have to try to catch up, yet each of them features a
different satiric target.  Get Shorty picked on Hollywood.  Touch took on
organized religion.  Jackie Brown (based on `Rum Punch') made fun of the
entire game of cops-and-robbers by being two steps ahead.  Out of Sight
takes on your basic romance story with a great twist.
 It opens with one of the smartest bank robberies in cinema history: Jack
walks into a bank, no gun, no weapon, smiles at the teller and informs her
that a partner ahs a gun and is ready to shoot her boss in between the eyes
if she doesn't cooperate.  Of course, it's all a bluff, but Jack charms his
way through a bank robbery unarmed only to have it all screwed up when the
car won't start.
 As I said, I am very thankful that George Clooney didn't blunder over
himself by looking at the ground.  It would have ruined the entire movie if
he acted bashful, which he seems to do without trying, but the man pulls off
a decent performance.  I'm not saying he should get any awards, but it's a
lot better than he normally does.  Jennifer Lopez does likewise, not acting
as helpless as she normally does.  Instead, she gives Karen a unique charm
about her.
 Steven Soderburgh, who first burst onto the scene nine years ago with Sex,
Lies, and Videotape, which really started the second independent revolution
going and jump-started the Sundance film festival, takes the helm of the
studio project that, with Hollywood as it is today, might have ended up a
formula piece were it not for his unique touch.  He does a masterful job of
editing his film, taking the sex scene and having a conversation intercut
and voice-overed.  Although, unlike Get Shorty and Jackie Brown, which had a
flair towards the stedicam and thus towards movement of the camera in
general, you don't get much in the way of that.  The most you'll get besides
the cuts are the occasional pan.  But, hey, Soderburgh pulled his
masterpiece Sex, Lies, and Videotape off hardly moving the camera at all.
 In the end Out of Sight is a pleasing movie on all levels.  Soderburgh
makes it eye candy, writer Scott Frank makes it ear candy, and Lopez and
Clooney make it a plain delight to view.  Definitely worth renting, and, if
any serious competition would come to the Scott B. Smith monopoly on the
Best Adapted Screenplay, this would be it.

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
Written by David E. Kelly and Sean O'Byrne
Starring Russell Crowe, Burt Reynolds, Hank Azaria, Ron Eldard, Colm Meany,
Maury Chaykin, Mary McCormack, Lolita Davidovich, Kevin Durand, Ryan
Northcott, and Rachel Wilson
All right.  I admit it.  After seeing Lake Placid and Austin Powers: The Spy
Who Shagged Me, the concept of a collaboration of David "The Bill Gates of TV"
E. Kelley and M. Jay "Cock" Roach didn't seem like an altogether good idea. 
Revision: it seemed like a terrible idea.  Despite the nice shot in the
preview of the kid rocketing down the ice, when the voice-over said "David E.
Kelley, the writer 'Ally MacBeal' and 'The Practice' and M. Jay Roach, the
director of Austin Powers" I groaned.  I expected it to be so bad that I
brought a book along with me.
A few minutes worth of word of mouth and my book went back in the car.
Unlike most movies that come highly recommended while seeming incredibly
mainstream, Mystery, Alaska did not disappoint me.  It did not annoy me.  It
did not make me cry, but it sure as hell made me laugh.
Mystery, Alaska is the story of a grassroots hockey team that ends up on the
cover of Sports Illustrated because of an article a former town dweller
(Charles Danner, played by Hank Azaria) wrote.  In it, Danner claims that "the
team of Mystery, Alaska has the skill to rival any of the NHL."  This being
American and this movie being Hollywood, the New York Rangers decide to take
the challenge and send up the team as a publicity stunt.
The first thing that will surprise you about Mystery, Alaska, aside from its
incredible scenery and ability to blend toilet humor with intelligence, is the
depth to which each character is explored.  They are all fully dynamic
individuals with background.  They all have their humorous side, they all have
their human side, and they all have their conflicts.  While real life may not
be that interesting or complete, what we the critics like to call this is good
characterization.  It's what lets the hooks penetrate our rocky hides and drag
us into the movie.
To start off with, we have John Biebe (Russell Crowe), the closest thing to a
main character that the movie has.  Biebe has been playing hockey all his
life, is desperately in love with his wife, and is the all-American Alaskan
that we'd expect.  He's even the town sheriff.  Then we have the
aforementioned writer Danner, who only seeks acceptance of the town.  We have,
for partial comedic effect and partial seriousness, Skank (a nickname), played
by Ron Eldard.  Skank gets his name for the obvious reason that he is
promiscuous to the Nth degree.  We have big-bodied, big-hearted Adam "Tree"
Lane (Kevin Durand).  We have the overweight lawyer who only loves hockey
(Maury Chaykin).  The Judge who is initially against inviting the Rangers to
play (Burt Reynolds).  And, this being a small town, the couple that is trying
to go all the way right under their parents noses (Rachel Wilson and Ryan
Northcott).
Although these characters may not be real, and the story is very obviously
not, the movie gives the impression of reality.  Hollywood being the business
of illusions, and the best illusions being the most realistic looking,
Mystery, Alaska does a very good job.
David E. Kelley should be lauded on his ability to sidestep every cliché that
could have found its way into the movie.  The characters aren't stock, the
ending unpredictable, and the laughs often shocking.
But I'm not all great words for Mystery.  It did use the toilet humor a
little too much, and it begins to get on your nerves after about thirty
seconds.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Drive Me Crazy (1999)
Based on the novel "How I Created my Perfect Prom Date" by Todd Strasser
Starring Melissa Joan Hart and Adrian Grenier
The business in which I work is a nasty one.  It is one of politics and of
policies.  Of embargoes and emissaries.  Mostly, however, it is genres and
grading.  When grading a film, a thought brought into the forefront of your
mind is "should I do this on a curve?"  With a genre such as "the teen flick",
something so hack that is seems to conspire towards making critics unhappy,
grading on a curve would make an F an A.  Since there is such a dearth of
great teen flicks, and since the ones that up the curve are few and far
between, I do not grade teen flicks on a curve.  If I were, however, Drive Me
Crazy would still get an "F"
A note to the people in Hollywood: if you are seeking to devise a movie based
on a soundtrack, please be a little less obvious about it.  Use said song to
hype the movie but please don't share the title.  That's just stupid.  The
movies in which popular artist's songs share the name (or share the refrain,
in this case) of the movie are ones that rank right down their with using
"based on a true story" as a tag line (see Patch Adams).  They just don't fly
for me.
Also on the marketing, please put it in the sub-genre that it deserves.  In
this case, Drive Me Crazy was advertised as a teen comedy and ended up being
an oxy-moron: a teen drama.  The drama level in this is akin to watching a
marathon of the worst episodes of "Days of Our Lives."  It isn't worth the
price of the ticket.
The story of Drive Me Crazy is that of ultra-hip girl Nicole Maris (Melissa
Joan Hart), who's would-be boyfriend goes for someone else instead. 
Distraught over this, she goes to next door neighbor Chase Hammond (Adrian
Grenier), who was actually dumped by his girlfriend.  The implied proposition:
go to the centennial dance with me and I'll sleep with you.
I don't care if angry parents email me about encouraging amoral behavior in
teens until New York goes to sleep, but this is the implication in the movie. 
Of course, being Hollywood this is never out-and-out stated, but it is heavily
implied.  The fact that it refuses to paint teens as innocents (like most
PG-13 teen movies do) is Drive Me Crazy's only endearing quality.
Basically, the story goes along in an East-meets-West mentality as beatnik
Chase and socialite Nicole mix, mingle, fall in love, and rehash their days in
junior high.  The all predictably live happily ever after.  The end.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Do Me a Favor (1997)
Written by Timothy Albaugh and Tag Mendillo
Starring Rosanne Arquette and Devon Gummersall
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 I shouldn't have a television within a hundred yards of me.  In fact, I
shouldn't have a television at all.  I shouldn't flip channels, I shouldn't
end up on TMC at 2 AM and discover that there's a movie on that I haven't
watched.  Because, as soon as I start it, I won't be able to flip away.
 The situation is made even worse when you have a movie like Do Me a Favor
(which was called Trading Favors when I watched it), where you have a very
nice and interesting start followed by a quickly disintegrating plot and
suspense.  It's like listening to Ravel's "Bolero" in reverse.
 Do Me a Favor starts off with characters that are mildly interesting, a
nice uncredited cameo by Cuba Gooding, Jr, and a scam in which Alex (Rosanna
Arquette) uses her sexuality to get a brand new BMW from two horny
teenagers.  Taking Lincoln (Devon Gummersall) along for the ride, they begin
pulling scams on convenience stores across the state (they give a cut of the
stolen money to the cashier, who in turn tells the police that Aryans held
the place up, a convenient forgetfulness exists that most stores have video
cameras and would record such a robbery.)
 From there on in the story heads to the road and the quality of the movie
heads due south, right on to the point of no return.  Alex continues pulling
scams, and then is revealed to have the sappy motivation of wanting to
return home to care for a terminally ill mother.  As normal, the once
promising film turns sappy and idiotic.  I have nothing against films with
characters and feelings, but only if those characters and feelings are both
realistic and original, not fake and pulled out of a closet.  Do Me a Favor
contains not one ounce of true originality nor one interesting character.
They only seem interesting at the beginning, when it appears that they will
be different.
 Of course, going along with this motif of being stupid, Lincoln and Alex
fall into a romance and then into a state of quasi-love (she lets him cheat
on her and she's actually married) and then the movie turns into a complete
piece of crap.
 Rosanna Arquette, normally able to give have decent performances, manages
to completely disappoint me.  Devon Gummersall is someone who is definitely
going nowhere in Hollywood, not with his acting abilities.  Everyone else in
the movie seems to immediately sense the bad nature of the film and thus
decides to only recite their lines, making the movie worthy of a Razzie.
 Do Me a Favor does one other thing that I completely hate.  As it nears the
end, it has a "plot twist" that is completely predictable, and, as a result,
makes a long drawn out ending.  This ending seems to try to mimic some
intelligence that the rest of the movie is completely devoid of, but fails
completely.  Instead, like everything else, it merely gets on my nerves.
 I have no problem with endings that actually are intelligent, but endings
like the one in Do Me a Favor make me want to puke.  They are endings that
take forever to finish all in the name of making the movie seem smart.  Some
critics may be willing to give a pity vote to a movie because it ends in
relatively the same fashion that it began, but I won't.  If a movie is like
Do Me a Favor and tries to act smart without having a brain, it will only
annoy me more.
 Please, makers of this film, do me a favor and don't do another one.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
Director David Fincher gave the general public the idea of single-serving
friends in `Fight Club.'  Director Marek Kanievska (captain of the helms of
such cinematic Titantics as Less than Zero) and Canada 3000 introduced to me
the concept of the single serving movie.
Like the single serving friend, the single serving movie is largely
uninteresting, cheap, seemingly less intelligent than you are, and served to
you with a shrink wrapped set of headphones for five Canadian Dollars for
three showings.  On my flight from London to Toronto, I was granted the joy
of a triple whamme: Mission to Mars, Mickey Blue Eyes, and Where the Money
is three films that are highly mediocre at best.
Where the Money is centers around Carol (Linda Fiorentino), a bored
housewife who works at a nursing home, has an on-the-rocks marriage with her
husband Wayne (Dermont Mulroney), and cares for ex-bank robber
extraordinaire Henry (Paul Newman).  Carol wants one more thrill, Wayne's
not getting her rocks off, so she figures she'll try Henry's screws (or
screwing Henry) and maybe even rob an armored car route in the meantime of a
couple of million dollars who knows?
But, if the hackneyed and unoriginal names of the triad running the show are
any indication of the collective imagination of Where the Money Is (and they
are), you know you're not going to get an interesting caper of double
crosses rife with sexual tension a la The Wachowski's Bound.  You're going
to get a mass-marketable caper with a few jokes thrown in and the obligatory
Last Seduction rip off that comes with any time Linda Fiorentino steps onto
the screen.
Whether this is simply the result of a vapid imagination on the part of
screenwriters E. Max Frye, Topper Lilien, and Carroll Cartwright or part of
corporate decisions related to the typecasting of Fiorentino as the perky,
evil seductress you have to root for is both beyond my sphere of knowledge
and irrelevant to the issue: Where the Money Is just ends up too clear cut
for its own good.  The caper itself is predictable, not tense at all, and
this is the absolute high point of the movie.  This, of course, makes Where
the Money Is just like any other rental on the shelves, with all of the
appeal.
Fiorentino, Newman, and Mulroney are all capable performers handed terrible
dialogue to work with (Fiorentino actually says `I won't tell the police,
but I may make you play bingo.') and asked to make it sound musical, and
only their incredible prowess as thespians allows them to pull off a half
decent performance with material that chimps could have typed.  If only the
writers had tried to be original, or at least pick a good film like Bound to
carbon copy, then they would have been much better off.  As it is, Where the
Money is ends up being just another movie I can't recommend.
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
Written by Philip Kaufman and Jean-Claude Carriere
Starring Daniel-Day Lewis (The Last of the Mohicans), Juliette Binoche (The
English Patient), and Lena Olin (Night Falls on Manhattan)
Produced by Saul Zantz (The English Patient)
 When I first watched The Unbearable Lightness of Being, I was dating a poet
who had read and loved the book.  Not wanting to involve myself in reading
the book at that point, I rented the movie instead.  I loved it then and I
love it now, but, at this point in time, I can compare it to the novel by
Milan Kundera.
 The two are both vastly similar and vastly different.  As an adaptation, it
succeeds in transcribing the events of the novel, but does not do as well in
successfully demonstrating its points.
 The Unbearable Lightness of Being focuses on Tomas (Daniel-Day Lewis), a
Don Juanist terrified of commitment and a surgeon at a Prague hospital.  He
is trapped between his platonic and semi-erotic love of Teresa (Academy
Award winner Juliette Binoche), a photographer and his wife and a erotic and
semi-platonic love of Sabina (Lena Olin), a painter and his mistress.
 Teresa is haunted by terrible nightmares and suicidal urges brought on by a
love of Tomas clashing with a hatred of his "lightness" or the ability to
view sex as entertainment and not commitment.  Sabina, on the other hand, is
having to deal with her very first tinges of jealousy as the only man she
may have ever truly loved is now obviously in love with another woman.
 As a necessary subtext, this occurs at the same time as the occupation of
Czechoslovakia by the Soviet Union.
 This is where the book and the movie, a perfect joined atom before, begin
their fission.
 In the book, a major point was a philosophical protest to the occupation of
Czechoslovakia, to the point where the book devotes some one hundred pages
entirely on this subject.  In the movie, it is a subtext and a backdrop.
The few times that it does appear, it does a cameo.
 Those cameos, on the other hand, are so powerful in their own respects that
they would be academy-award cameos.  One such is a magnificent black and
white re-creation of the invasion of Czechoslovakia, which is packed with
all of the emotional content that the one hundred pages of the book could
muster and more.  Kudos to Walter Murch, the cinematographer of the film.
 Following the invasion, Sabina, Tomas, and Teresa emigrate to Geneva,
Switzerland, where they end up in the same predicament that they were in at
the beginning of the film.
 Returning to the part of the story that the film harks on, The Unbearable
Lightness of Being is successfully able to ponder: polygamy or monogamy?  It
also, despite numerous sex scenes and adulterous encounters, paints more
poignantly than any other film the damage that Tomas' "lightness of being"
(polygamy) does to a faithful person.
 Teresa loves Tomas enough, however, not to try to change him.  Instead, she
herself attempts to experience this "lightness of being", trying modeling
for nude photographs by and taking nude photographs of Sabina and a very
unsuccessful adultery with an Engineer.
 Teresa is unable, of course, to feel this lightness, and instead is only
faced with an increasing sadness as she fails again and again.  The sadness
is perfectly transmitted to the screen thanks to Juliette Binoche's
performance.  She was, is, and forever will be one of the actresses that
does good in any role.
 This is not a date movie.  The question laid unto the viewer is too heavy
for a couple in the early stages of their relationship to ponder.  Nor is it
what the other critics say: "The most openly sexual American film in ages."
(Rolling Stone).  Sex was used to advertise it, and, although it plays a
major role, the movie and the book are both about love, not sex.
 As far as the adaptation goes on other methods, there are several things
left out.  Teresa's family, mentioned extensively in the book, is brought up
only once in the movie.  Sabina's affair with a man named Franz is a quick
event in the movie, but a major plot of the book.  Also, the desire to
protest towards freedom is more focused on in the novel.
 This is a movie for those few willing to accept the challenge of an
intellectually stimulating film with a long running time, difficult
philosophical questions, literary references, and political means and
motives.  If you can deal with that, which I KNOW is a lot to ask, then
please pick it up.  Please enjoy this film.  And, should you enjoy the film,
please read the book.

Title
Review for Yom Huledet Same'ach Mar Mograbi (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/544d63411f73b23a882568b1000a8bb1?OpenDocument
Happy Birthday, Mr. Mograbi (1999, NR)
Written, Directed, Produced and Starring Avi Mograbi
 Welcome to the Middle East, a land where you can be blown up at any
second, where you can see the beautiful sights of an extreme desert,
where you can feel hotter than hell, and where you can end up watching
Happy Birthday, Mr. Mograbi.  Happy Birthday, Mr. Mograbi is a film that
is part Mideastern political commentary, part real estate deal gone
awry, and The Blair Witch Project, part II.
 That's right: we've entered the land of the staged documentary.
 Avi Mograbi is a struggling documentary filmmaker.  He has trouble from
a real-estate snafu made years ago that resulted in his lot being 100
meters larger and the adjacent lot being 100 meters smaller.  He has
trouble from a producer who keeps asking him to redo change the focus of
a documentary.  He has trouble from Arabs who wish him to be an inside
man who gets footage Arab ruins in areas of Israel where Arabs are no
longer allowed.  He has trouble with being assigned to capture
pre-celebration footage of the 50th anniversary of Israel a date that
happens to coincide with his 42nd birthday.
 With this much plot, the big surprise of this 77-minute film is that it
ends up being so god-awful boring.  This is due mostly to Avi Mograbi's
desire not only to film everything that happens, but also to film it in
a bizarre method.  He films people and trucks and then plays the footage
backwards.  He uses a Pi-like rig to film himself searching for a
friend.  He hooks up another car in front of his own so that he doesn't
miss a single bit of conversation that occurs.
 Some of this ends up being funny.  Some of this results in hauntingly
comic images (i.e. a parade float rabbit with a gas mask on and a Hebrew
version of the song `Mortal Kombat'), but for the most part this results
in an amazingly slow and nauseating film.  Why is it nauseating?
Simple: the film also uses an 8mm hi-fi to capture several
conversations, and this video camera can make anyone sick to their
stomach.
 This is a film that makes me sick.  This is a film that justifies a
phobia of subtitles.  This is my first Israeli film, and, with the sour
taste it has left in my mouth, I am tempted to make it my last.
A.k.a. Yom Huledet Same'ach Mar Mograbi
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Highlander: Endgame (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c97ebb11df0b98398825694f005571d7?OpenDocument
He is Duncan MacLeod of the clan MacLeod.  He's been pimpin' it since he
was born in the village of Glennfillan in 15somethingsomething, and he
continues to pimp it in modern day.  He is immortal and he cannot die.
Well, I am typing this review up at about 4:20 in the morning, after
having endured the director's cuts of each previous Highlander, watched
a few more episodes of the series, and successfully ransacked my living
space to find my keys.  And, having done all of this, I offer to you
this critic's opinion of Highlander: Endgame.
There was a joke on Mad About You a while back that referred to what the
title of Die Hard 4 would be Die Already.  Going into Highlander:
Endgame, anyone who has endured the three prior films and is still left
standing comes in with the same kind of attitude.  Have the gathering
already and be done with it just don't have us hear either Duncan or
Connor MacLeod introduce themselves one more time we're sick of hearing
it.
This time around, we get a spin off of both the series and the franchise
itself which means we get to meet Connor, Duncan, Duncan's immortal
wife, that 5,000 year old Egyptian not played by Sean Connery (who was
great in the original Highlander) who sometimes guest stars on the show,
the watchers just about everyone is here, and more heads are being lost
than in France circa 1780.
Viewed as a stand-alone film, Highlander: Endgame posses all of the
elements of a straight-to-video action movie.  Cheap special effects
that look cool, weak characters that still pull heartstrings, and a
bunch of actors no one really knows unless you have seen this or that
obscure flick.  And, taking that view, one wonders why the hell I even
had to watch Highlander: Endgame in theatres.
Regardless, due to the fact that I have some responsibility to inform
you and thus empower you to make the decision to not waste $8 to see
Endgame, I should tell you about the plot.  The watchers, who basically
work part-time to keep count of the battle between immortals (I suppose
it pays better than, say, the Army Reserve) run a place called The
Sanctuary, which a psychotic immortal (there's one in every Highlander)
called Kell (Bruce Payne) and his band of immortal cronies raid and
destroy despite the fact that it is on Holy Ground and killing
immortals on Holy Ground is one of those Highlander no-nos.  Once again,
it is up to the Highlander(s) to stop the psycho, and this brings in a
kitschy Sean Connery/Christopher Lambert like relationship between
Connor (Lambert) and Duncan (Adrian Paul) and an even more kitschy
relationship between Faith (one of those aforementioned no-names) and
Duncan, who were once married until Duncan stabbed her in the stomach to
make sure they could be together forever. (Wasn't that the defense of
some murderer a ways back?)
The action sequences are decent, but the effects end up so god-awful
towards the end (such as a terrible face-morph from Duncan's face to
Connor's and back again) that all you can do is cringe.  In fact, the
only good thing you can get out of Highlander: Endgame is watching
obscure Kung Fu actor Donnie Yen kick some ass, and that only lasts
about 30 seconds.
What is really pitiful is that, when all is said and done, Highlander:
Endgame isn't really the end.  There are still more heads to chop off,
and at least two immortals remain on the face of the planet.  Which does
explain (and I say this was about as much rancor as a man anticipating a
root canal) why one of the four former titles -- Highlander: World
Without End -- was changed.
Director: Douglas Aarniokoski
Producer: Peter S. Davis, William Panzer
Writer: Joel Soisson
Starring: Christopher Lambert, Adrian Paul, Bruce Payne
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Speilburg's "Lost World" suffers from lost storyline
Directed by Steven Spielberg
Starring Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore, Jeff Goldblum, Pete Posthelwaite
Thursday, May 22, I go to the UA at Marketfair expecting to reserve a ticket
to "The Lost World"'s first showing tomorrow. What I see surprises me, four
shows at 10, 10:15, 10:30, and 10:45. I promptly buy a ticket for the ten o'
clock showing so I can have my pride as a critic and see what's destined to
be this summer's biggest blockbuster before anyone else. Being the neurotic
that I am, I make sure that I get my seat an hour early in the front row and
center and proceed to take out the book that I brought and read a few
chapters that were assigned as homework.
At Ten O'clock, the movie comes on and I watch attentively, chewing popcorn
and paying attention with my critical eye. The movie opens on Isla Sorna,
part of Les Sinco Mortes (The Five Deaths), eighty-seven miles southwest of
Isla Nublar (The site of the ill-fated "Jurassic Park"). Even though, with
the cinematography, I am sure that the island that this one was filmed on
was the same as the first. The stereotyped British family is relaxing on the
island just before their daughter is bitten by compys (something from the
first novel).
Just as the mother begins her pitiful scream, you see Ian Malcom (played by
Jeff Goldblum) on a background of a jungle in a subway station, heading to
see John Hammond (who wasn't even in the novel). There is a time consuming
cameo by the kids Tim and Lex from the first movie and then a begrudged
confrontation between Hammond's nephew (Arliss Howard). Upon meeting
Hammond, he is told about Site B (Isla Sorna), and also informed that his
girlfriend, Sarah Harding (Julianne Moore), is already on the island.
That, ladies and gentlemen, is all that it takes to start the movie, in
contrast to the hour that "Jurassic Park" took to get into the thrills.
As soon as you are on the island, and for the next hour or so, you are
confronted with original thrills after original thrills, and David Keopp is
actually half-decent as a screenwriter (In my mind, he is the bane of modern
literature). However, in contrast to the first movie, this one has almost no
elements of similarity save a scene involving a trailer, two parent T-rex's
and a vicious attack that defies belief.
For that hour I was truly dazzled as a watcher, getting my pulse as high as
ninety-five beats per minute (was it the movie or was it the fact that it
was so cold in the theater?). For about forty minutes, the T-rex's dominate,
acting so much better than in the first one. But for the last twenty minutes
of that hour, it truly gets fun as the velociraptors wreak total havoc upon
the party of explorers on the island.
Then the movie doesn't take itself seriously at all.
After that mystic hour, you end up seeing the T-rex in San Diego, where the
movie parodies itself and other things such as "Speed", "Godzilla", and
"Speed 2".
The CGI's (Computer Generated Images) are low quality compared to the ILM
standard, verging on a word which, because of the high-school nature of this
publication, I cannot say. The script has almost no dialogue and is the
absolute worst adaptation of a novel that I have ever seen.
I will close with this. "The Lost World" was over-hyped, and not anything
that I expected. It was a movie to see for the laughs but not one to see for
the thrills. I can sum it up in two words: Nothing Special.

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
Written by Sara Parriott, Josann McGibben, and Audrey Wells
Starring Richard Gere, Julia Roberts, Joan Cusack, Christopher Meloni, and
Hector Elizando
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The saying "they don't make them like they used to" should be revised for
movies.  In movies, they make them exactly like they used to.  Thinking back
on the romantic comedies I have seen, all of them have the same basic
formula.  Their characters are pulled out of some antiquated storeroom
reserved for the genre, and then put to use in a simplistic script.  The
lines change.  The specifics of the plot change.  Everything else remains
the same.
 I am not going to say that Runaway Bride is a complete rip of Pretty Woman.
I am not saying that the reunion is a remake in disguise.  What I will say
is that Runaway Bride is exactly what you should expect from a romantic
comedy in the summer: a simple plot, a simple script, and two big names to
guarantee box office revenues.
 Runaway Bride is not as terribly cliché as The Wedding Singer, which had no
originality whatsoever, but it is cliché to the point that the originality
only comes in a few good jokes littered here and there and some nice lines.
The plot is simple: unhappy single columnist for USA TODAY Ike Graham (Gere)
hears about a woman that likes to leave her grooms on the alter named Maggie
Carpenter (Julia Roberts).  He writes a highly antagonistic column about her
and then is fired when an angry letter to the editor contains a list of
inaccuracies that the column contained.  Not to be completely deterred,
Fisher, a freelance photographer doing work for GQ, puts out the offer that
if he gets an accurate scoop on Maggie, then GQ will take the article.
 So, driving a car that no journalist could afford, he heads off to Hale, a
town so stereotypically small town that it would urge bile from most New
Yorkers.  It has a barbershop quartet, a Main street, an Elm street, etc.
Of course, as he gets to know the real Maggie, Ike begins falling in love
with her.
 There are the standard hurdles in the on screen relationship: the initial
hatred of the man, the close-call to breakup caused by the woman at the end,
and the fact that the woman is already in a relationship with someone who is
obviously a jerk.  All of these hurdles are jumped over with Olympic class
skill by veterans of movie relationships (and mutual victims of real life
divorce) Richard Gere and Julia Roberts both adept competitors at the
romantic comedy 50 yard dash.
 At the end, everything turns out fine and dandy.  We are even forced to sit
through credits showing a series of happy couples (including the former
boyfriend of Maggie, who has found true love in a New York tomboy).
 As bitter a diatribe as I myself could go on about how the movies are
always this way, Runaway Bride manages to pull off the same old con that we
have seen a million times before with enough panache that we don't mind
being deprived of our money.  In fact, as with most horribly cliché movies
(see Deep Blue Sea), we will willingly part ways with our money and come out
of the theatre smiling.
 Seeing as this is a reunion of the bunch that gave us Pretty Woman hundreds
of trite romantic comedies ago, we might as well respect the sanctity of
older people who can still cut it (even if they barely scrape by) and submit
to seeing this film.  Enjoy.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
Written, Produced and Directed by Rand Ravich
Starring Charlize Theron, Johnny Depp, and Clea DuVall
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 The end of August comes to us in the dismal form of late-rate movies.  You
know the ones I'm talking about.  These are the ones that studios backed but
bilked out on when they saw the final cut.  They knew they needed a summer
release to recapture the budget, and they knew that the only was to do this
was to stick it in the pack of films being released in late August.  All of
the studios know this trick.  Were I completely conspiracy minded, I would
say that they coordinate their releases in order to give us no choice but to
see crappy movies.
 The Astronaut's Wife is one such movie.
 Unlike the majority of summer films, it has plot.  In fact, it almost
drowns in plot.  What it lacks in is pace.
It does have a pace: ultra slow.  Alfred Hitchcock, a master of suspense,
said that the anticipation is better than the payoff.  Rule of thumb to
horror film makers: do not follow every rule of thumb that Hitchcock put
out.  The fact is that when you have a movie that is all anticipation with
no payoff, you have crap.
The plot of The Astronaut's Wife is that all-American astronaut Spencer
Armacost (Johnny Depp) is possessed by an alien transmission, and the first
thing he does when he gets back to Earth is the most logical: he impregnates
beautiful-all-American schoolteacher and wife Jillian Armacost (Charlize
Theron).  Spencer quits NASA for a corporate job (and yet no one doubts this
guy's sanity until the creepy music comes on???) in New York, where the two
of them pursue their oh-so-happy existence while an alien spawn grows inside
her.
For me, The Astronaut's Wife spells proof-positive that this Second Coming
of horror films is worst than the first.  With the 80s horror films, they at
least were funny to watch.  With the 90s horror films, they take themselves
way too seriously to be funny to watch and result in a complete two hours of
boredom.  We have the same cheesy plot as any 50s B-movie would throw at us.
We have the trademark cliches of the modern breed of B-movie (i.e. Jillian
was once suicidal and now is a position to trade her life to save the world,
can we say The Seventh Sign?).  Yet we lack the ultra-horrible dialogue and
performances that made horror movies of the 80s enjoyable.
As for describing the rest of the movie, I will allow maxims to do my job
for me.
For the performances: "When you can't act, overact."  Everyone does their
jobs as far as acting is concerned and then some.  In fact, one wonders
whether Johnny Depp's is taking acting lessons from Al Gore.
For the cinematography: "Beauty is only skin deep, but ugliness goes all the
way to the bone."  There are a few pretty shots, but they come too little,
too late.  Instead, we get pretty much nothing.
For the special effects: "I can see!  It's a miracle!  Oh, wait, I was
wrong."  The one time that special effects are used appears cool at first
and then takes form so it looks like someone is being attacked by a giant
piece of Jell-O.
Yeah, it's late August.  You can smell it in the air, you can feel it in
your bones, you can see it on the faces of children, and you can tell when
every single movie on the marquee doesn't appeal to you at all but you want
to see one anyway because you have a date.

Title
Review for American Pop (1981)
Last week my film group passed around an open ended question: `Daryl Hannah:
Wax Figure or Blow Up Doll?' and somehow, being the standard wiseass of me,
I wrote `Blow up doll that's been popped once or twice.'  The point: a title
like American Pop is just asking for it.  Bad joke after bad joke can be
made at its expense.  To team this up with popular music  which brings to
mind such thoughts as bubble-gum chewing teenie boppers advocating smacking
girls around if you don't look deeper into the almost transparent lyrics 
just doesn't strike me as a good idea.  Thus it's to Ralph Bakasi's credit
that he's able to pull any part of American Pop off.
Further to the film's detriment is the fact that it follows four generations
of characters through 80 years of popular music, yet the film still manages
to come out massively unscathed and generally feel good kind of like the
people who are now saying Madonna was just a trapped artist back in the 80s
who finally got free when she discovered the magic of trance.
Although you smile at the end of American Pop and have your fun time singing
lyrics to songs you thought you never knew, American Pop doesn't ever really
do much with itself other than be entertaining.  It's serious, it's
moderately intelligent, and it has some of the most interesting soundtrack
selections (i.e. W.W.II intercut with `Sing, Sing, Sing') that you'll ever
hear, but American Pop would neither make its way in the land of live-action
or animation if it didn't have such nice music.  It has weak characters,
cheesy dialogue, and it basically never goes anywhere.  It's seemingly
triumphant ending really isn't, and it's depressing middle really is.
Yet music-fanatics will be hard-pressed to pass this one up, and nostalgia
lovers will get a kick out of this.  Everyone else should stick to singing
in the shower, and avoid American Pop.
James Brundage's mailing list:
http://filmcritic2000.listbot.com/
Short Stuff Short Film Review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
I suppose it has to be one of the sleaziest films I've ever seen. It also
has to be one of the most sexual, and most ambiguous. But since when have
things like that stopped normal American's from having a good time? Doesn't
anyone remember Basic Instinct, which turned an ice pick from a kitchen
utensil to the weapon of choice for murders, or Fatal Attraction, in which
the rabbit being killed became a cultural icon? What about Body of Evidence,
which asked if you could screw someone to death and gave us Madonna to prove
the point?
Wild Things is the newest in the lasting trend of movies intertwining sex,
violence, and mystery in a way we can't help think of as fun. It pits in
Kevin Bacon doing a decent job, Matt Dillon doing his normal great, and Neve
Campbell and Teresa Russell getting good roles early on in their careers. I
won't tell you much, only that there's one plot twist after the next in this
movie that hides a brain behind a bunch of sex and lies (and even a bit of
videotape, too). No one's the good guy, everyone's the bad guy, and you get
to watch a mystery unravel before your eyes while seeing and the sex we've
come to expect from a movie with a threesome in it.
It's controversial. It's something the Christian coalition will hate and the
Vatican will declare a sacrilege, but, by god, it's fun to watch.

Title
Review for Down to You (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/b34a8d3c4beb68100825686f0020fa8d?OpenDocument
Written and Directed by Kris Issacson
Starring Freddie Prinze Jr., Julia Stiles, Selma Blair, Shawn Hatosy,
Zak Orth, Ashton Kutcher
 Down to You was a case of adding insult to injury.
 The injury was having to see this film at all.  I would rather suffer
whiplash in a VW bug than sit through this film again.  The insult was
that all through this film, I had to listen to three annoying teens who
threw popcorn (which often landed on me).
 Down to You is a very cheap romantic comedy about Al (Freddie Prinze
Jr.), a love struck college student, and the object of his affection,
Imogen (Julia Stiles).  Despite two people who have brought at least
bearable teen movies in the past (Prinze with She's All That and Stiles
with 10 Things I Hate About You), these two never end up having either
the chemistry or the humor to keep the majority of audiences engaged for
90 minutes.  In fact, they have all of the chemistry of a couple
eternally plagued with a lack of spark.  For instance, they don't greet
each other with the standard cinema kiss we have come to expect: it's a
hug.  Also, despite the fact that they are both in college and that one
of them does show some talent for promiscuity, they take three months of
dating before they first have sex.  In the words of its target audience:
as if.
 Along the way on our ride down Melodrama Lane (better known as the
film), we have a bizarre cast of supporting characters that might
actually be funny if writer-director Kris Issacson (a man who picked up
humor talents by being the assistant to Barbara Streisand in The Mirror
Has Two Faces) had tried.  We have the porn-star philosopher, Monk (Zak
Orth), the other porn starlet who only wants someone to make her
pancakes (Selma Blair), and the psychedelic drug dealer by the name of
Jim Morrison (Ashton Kutcher).  Each of these could have had great jokes
thrown in, but they never are given the chance.
 The thing that kills the movie the most is actually not its blandness
but its desperate attempts to separate itself from the average teen
movie.  Told in separate voice-overs by Freddie Prinze Jr. and Julia
Stiles, Down to You has the same Nora Ephron feel as you would find in
Sleepless in Seattle.  The entire film feels like it is trying to be
both incredibly 90s and hip and incredibly old-fashioned.  This
combination ends up being the final blow to a very bad movie.
 Outside the theater, I asked some teens about the film.  As expected,
they seemed to think that it was sweet and seemed to get an
extra-special kick out of Jim Morrison.  It looks like I have more
insult added to injury, coming soon to a theatre near you.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Starring Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thorton, Bridget Fonda
Written by Scott B. Smith (Based on his novel)
 Well, it's about time.  Everyone has been bugging me, nagging me, telling
me to see A Simple Plan, and, for weeks on end, I haven't.  In fact, it has
been so long since it first came out that I was about to give up and watch
it when it comes to video.  But, out of the blue, it comes to a relatively
close theatre and I decided to spend a night going to it.  Boy, am I glad
that I did!
 A Simple Plan is, obviously, a film about a simple plan to evenly divide
4.4 million in dirty money among three country folk who stumble upon it in a
plane wreckage.  But, as the tension of sitting on the money until the plane
is found by others and they know the coast is clear, the relationship
between them disintegrates into a complete paranoia.
 I think I can praise this film best by comparing it to others.  Taking it's
cue from Fargo, A Simple Plan makes use of a snowy Minnesota landscape to
portray bleakness, both moral, physical, and emotional.  Taking off of The
Dark Half, it uses crows to provide a subconscious menace to the viewer.
Also, taking off of Very Bad Things, it uses a complete absence of morals to
accentuate their importance.
 This is not to say that this film is a patchwork effort.  It is a
full-fledged original work, taking on the age old theme of easy money and
its difficult consequences, and, like Ramni's The Quick and the Dead,
radically challenging its limits and potentials.  It transforms the genre of
murder mystery into a morality play.  It takes something completely simple,
and shows how the simple plan all too quickly becomes devastatingly complex.
 The film opens and closes lyrically, both with shots of winter and Bridget
Fonda putting books away at her job.  It then quickly switches to some of
the finest single shots of the year (second only to the imagery of a dying
bird in The Thin Red Line) of a fox in a henhouse, as the idiom goes.
 This kind of symbolism runs rampant in the film, but does it in such a
fashion as to not detract from the sublime tension of the mystery set in
front of us.
 The simple plan, hold the money until the plane is found, goes terribly
wrong.  Before you know it, murders are being covered up, alliances are
being made, sides are being taken.  The three friends are quickly divided
and changed into enemies.
 My pick for Best Supporting Actor goes with Billy Bob Thorton, who delivers
the performance of his career as Jacob, saddened younger brother of Paxton's
character.  He has no job, he has no wife, he has no life.  The most
heart-wrenching moments of the film come as Jacob wrestles with his own
concepts of morals and deals with what he has done: played part in three
murders, one of whom is a close friend.
 I stated earlier that, like Very Bad Things, A Simple Plan uses an absence
of morals to illustrate their importance.  This is not quite correct.  There
is a definitive dearth in morals of Paxton's character up until the end (and
what a shocking ending it is!), but morals themselves are clearly the major
item generating tension: not the money.  Greed, however, is the driving
factor of Bridget Fonda, who plays what at first comes off as a devout
housewife of Paxton, only to reveal a greedy, self-absorbed woman when the
beauty is peeled away like the skin of an orange.
 Yet again, as has happened about ten times this year, I am faced with a
film I am able to write a paper on but limited to writing a review.  I can
only urge you to see it for yourself, and enjoy.

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Maybe maybe! It's just a "me" thing. Maybe my view of movies is warped,
changed to a static antipathy by reel after reel after reel, only
relinquished every once in a while. Then again maybe the general view of
movies is an adulteration upon the actual quality of standard: the old weary
critc's question "Do people like good movies or do people like bad movies?"
I always get like this when I have to tell someone something that wouldn't
rather hear. I say this in as light of a way now as I can, like a doctor
over a dead patient. "The Man in the Iron Mask" isnt' worth the price of a
ticket.
The film, which I thought originally would be bad by Rule From the Critic's
Bible #126, An actor never has two critically great movies in a row (of
course that one is crap, but ), started to surprise me right off the bat,
honestly impressing me with a re-do of Versailles, which so many other films
about France failed utterly in accomplishing. It then delved itself into a
rich tapestry of life and made me think, honestly think that the movie would
be the surprise of '98, bringing this terrifying start to a bad year to an
end (although on repute I have heard that the movie "Dark City" is the one
to see if you are interested in breaking the Bad Movie Binge). Then you
brought in the main plot element: The Man in the Iron Mask.
After that it just becomes this dull and repetitious movie, with stupid item
after stupid item. You realize how poor the dialogue is, how sadly done the
movie is, and how bored out of your gourd you are. This takes about an hour
and a half.
But then why, you ask, are so many people coming away from it with a smile
on their face? Because the movie is a feel-good movie with a feel good
ending, and, as cheap as it is it will end up a hit due to the raw star
power of the Oscar-robber DiCaprio, who's new $20 Million a movie salary
matches his power to draw female audiences, should he want, to salivate
pavlovian like over a Banana Split at a Governer's in Maine. Hey, no one
ever said an actor couldn't make two hits in a row (Rule from the Critic's
Bible #127).

Title
Review for Naked Lunch (1991)
Written and Directed by David Cronenberg
Based on the novel by William S. Burroughs
Starring Peter Weller, Judy Davis, Ian Holm, Julian Sands, and Roy Scheider
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Quick, off the top of your head, tell me all you know about this movie.
 If you recalled fondly the line that Nelson said in an episode of "The
Simpsons" after Bart uses a fake ID to get into this film ("I'll tell you
two things wrong with that title"), then you're like most of America.  I
knew a little bit more coming in: that it was based on a novel by William S.
Burroughs that is the quintessence of non-linear narrative and that it was
directed by David Cronenberg.
 On the way out, I know precious little more.
 Naked Lunch is one of those films that is so mind blowing that it is
baffling.  So intelligent that it feels idiotic, and so strange that you
wonder if you took something beforehand and forgot about it.  Yet it was one
of those movies critics loved.
 In the movie Contact, James Woods asks "Why is it always the opinion of the
egghead set that aliens are friendly?"  Although the answer Jodie Foster
gave back was sufficient, it should have been a more callous response:
"Because we don't fear what we don't understand."  However, among the
intellectual set, things go one step further.  Among the intellectual set,
heresy is saying "I don't get it", and thus hidden meanings that weren't
there in the first place are put into books and movies.  The entire business
is subjective, we will not know the metaphors placed into them unless we
know their makers, and thus everyone is afraid to say "you're wrong" about
what the meaning is.
 The unknown doesn't scare us.  Admitting we don't know it scares us.
 Naked Lunch, like so many movies, has no real point to it.  However,
because it is so weird and so out of our heads it is the automatically taken
position of the intellectual set that "if I don't understand it, it must be
good."  Two things come out of this.  The first is the comedy when someone
tries to give an idiotic explanation of what something means in the midst of
ignorance (i.e. the man who thought "The Unbearable Lightness of Being" was
an expose about Bill Clinton).  The second is the tragedy when people keep
their mouths shut, not brave enough to say what is on their mind.
 What is on my mind, and the mind of just about anyone who has seen the
film, is "what the hell?"  You have no idea what is going on in the movie,
and by the end you still have no idea what is going on in the movie.  Yeah,
you've seen a lot of weird sights (the transvestite drug dealer, the
roach-centipede intelligence war, the cannibalistic typewriters), but you're
no closer to understanding what went down than anyone else is.
 There is a word for this, intellectual elite: incomprehensible.  I know
that it is the "I" word and that you're not supposed to say it in class or
conversation, but that's what Naked Lunch is.
 But, you know, what, it isn't just the intellectuals who do this.
 It's everyone else, too.  For more of my ranting and raving, go to see my
review of The Sixth Sense at www.filmfrenzy.com .
 That is, if you're not tired of hearing something that someone has needed
to say for a long, long time.
 Either way, stay away from Naked Lunch.  Movies such as that will only
confuse you.  They will not entertain you and they will not enlighten you.


Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
It's Jackie Chan. You either love him or you hate him. Personally, I love
him. After all, it's this same taste for Jackie Chan as you have for any
kung fu movie, seen chiefly by comic book fans and social misfits, in which
reality is thrown out the window like a ticking bomb that explodes the
moment it has left and the debris that flies in is a brand of dark slapstick
comedy. In other words, he makes people getting beat up look funny.
When you pair him with someone like Chris Tucker, you come up with a bizarre
chemistry seen only once before, when Nick Nolte met with Eddie Murphy for
48 Hours. It just doesn't happen too often that two people can work together
so well on screen. That the both of them can muster enough wit to make
things work.
I suppose you could say it's an east-meets-west story, with a backdrop of
guns and Hong Kong crime family. A few shots here, some street humor there,
some slapstick there. The scenes just make you laugh, chuckle, or smile your
way through the movie until the nice payoff of seeing the mistakes at the
very end DO NOT LEAVE WHEN THE CREDITS START. Those alone Those alone make
the movie worth watching. Of course the rest is just as good, but everybody
has their cup of tea.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Directed by David Fincher (Seven, The Game)
Starring Edward Norton (Primal Fear), Brad Pitt (Seven Years in Tibet), and
Helena Bonham Carter (Wings of the Dove)
Formed correctly, the punch is the perfect exercise.  With the fist clenched
tight, tucked palm up into the armpit, half of the body can be worked.  As the
arm spins itself to meet the opponent with the knuckles each muscle of the arm
exerts nearly equal force.  The proper spin takes the weight of one half of
the body behind it, from the toes to the tongue (which swings in your mouth by
its own accord yet is always in concert with the movement of the rest of your
body), exerting the same amount of force on every fiber of your being.  This
same exercise, able to expend so much energy in a single action, can also
serve numerous psychological functions.  The most popular of these functions
is the release of penned up male hostility.
        Deprived of the "Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance" like
phrasing, this is the message and purpose behind Fight Club.  It is an
organization designed to free the male element of society by allowing them to
release their aggressions in a way that is designed to be relatively
harmless.
The two men behind Fight Club are Jack (Edward Norton), a yuppie insomniac
who has become addicted to self-help groups, and Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), a
man who makes soap and spouts modern day mantras to the common man as well as
works two night jobs.  Jack has spent a year crying his eyes out at support
groups for ailments he doesn't have, a solace shattered by the arrival of
Marla (Helena Bonham Carter), a woman who goes to the support groups "because
they're cheaper than movies and they have free coffee."  Shortly after this
solace is shattered, his condominium is blown up.  Left without a place to
stay, he has a choice: stay with the woman that "were [he] to have a tumor,
its name would be Marla," or stay with Tyler, a single-serving friend (he met
Tyler on an airplane).
Fight Club starts innocently enough.  Tyler and Jack are out in a parking lot
and both experience the first fist fight of their lives.  They do this every
Sunday, their own Sabbath from the pressures of the designer-clothes world. 
After a few weeks, it begins to grow.  Two becomes four.  Four becomes eight. 
Eight becomes sixteen.
When Flight Club hits a certain point, it switches from a recreational
activity to a way of life.  It is the freedom from the repression of society,
and Tyler Durden has become the leader of a terrorist group.  The group is
dedicated, autonomous, and fanatical to its head.
The most amazing thing about Fight Club is that, as you watch the entire
movie unfold in front of your eyes, the rhetoric that Tyler Durden spouts
makes a bizarre sort of sense.  You don't know whether to laugh or to cry at
the pity of the world Fincher creates or whether to start a local chapter.
Fincher, fresh off of the ultra-paranoid The Game, paints a noirish
psychological terror in our minds while making us laugh at the same time.  You
can picture him at the Avid machine, editing away with a sardonic smile on his
face and a cigarette in between his lips.  He proves himself yet again to be
one of the finest directors of thrillers working today.
Brad Pitt goes back to his highly eccentric roots that he honed so well in 12
Monkeys. Edward Norton proves up to the challenge of a role like one he has
never done before and handles it perfectly.  In him, we see a bleak new
portrait of America's urban Everyman, feeling betrayed by a society that he is
at the dregs of.  However, the true crowning achievement acting-wise of the
film is Helena Bonham Carter, who is actually British yet flawlessly takes on
an American role body language and all.  Marla, perhaps the most-well
developed character, gets to have the most fun and it is clear that Carter
enjoys playing her.
Done properly, the punch is the perfect exercise.  Done as it is, Fight Club
is a nearly perfect way to spend two and a half hours.
MovieKritic2000: Reviews for the Generation of a New Millenium
http://www.geocities.com/moviekritic2000/
Help support MK2K, become a member of http://www.epinions.com/.  It's free and
you can post opinions on books, movies, music, travel, software, and just
about anything else under the sun.
To subscribe, email MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To email the critic, email MK2K@usa.net


Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
They're ever-present. Every day goes by and someone cracks a joke about
them. We loathe them more than anything else in the world and there are more
bad jokes about them than the Catholic Church.
They're lawyers. Those three-piece suit wearers of Armani who make upwards
of a hundred dollars an hour. And they're the one sect of society that is
universally hated and takes pride in it.
And, with every novel and every film made out of them, John Grisham makes us
love them.
In the newest, best, and most interesting John Grisham book adapted to the
screen we see a rarity -- a mix of old talent and new talent. Matt Damon
stars as a young, idealistic lawyer tackling an insurance company. He's
mixed with the directorial skills of Francis Ford Coppola ("The Godfather"),
the young talent of Claire Daines (tackling the serious role of a wife being
abused by her husband), of John Voight, and of Danny DeVito).
So what is it that John Grisham chooses to tackle in his moral crusade to
give lawyers a good name? The lawyers that have a bad name: the ambulance
chasing, insurance-settlement getting lawyers that make the word "schiester"
what it is.
The film makes you love a character that does just that for a living,
explaining all of the things which we wonder about (such as why in the hell
they drool when the sirens blare, anyway?). It has him going into law school
to change the world, to be a complete idealist, and tackles the subject of
recognition of your place in life.
What's the best thing about this new film? The classic realism that Francis
Ford Coppala has always shown (with the exception of "Dracula", of course).
In this film, he reasserts his mastery over the American Silver Screen. A
sure-fire winner, and a definite Oscar Contender for this year. See it if
you're in need for a good dose of idealism.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Written by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio
Based on the novel by Michael Crichton
Starring Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Peter Coyote, Live
Schrieber, and Queen Latifah
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Sphere is one of those movies I hate to review more than I hate to watch.
On one hand, you have the numerous good aspects of the film (top notch cast,
etc.).  On the other hand, you have a plot that can't be passed off in the
world of celluloid.
 Based on the novel by Michael Crichton, Sphere concerns a team called the
ULF team (Unknown Life Form).  These people, hand picked by Norman Johnson
(Dustin Hoffman) during the cold war, are a team designed to make contact
with alien life.  On it are a mathmatician (Samuel L. Jackson), an
astrophysicist (Live Schrieber), a biologist (Sharon Stone), and a shrink
who didn't take the whole thing seriously and picked people to be at each
other's throats (Dustin Hoffman).
 All of these people are sent one thousand feet under the surface of the
ocean, where they begin getting on each others nerves.
 What's worse, when they discover a sphere of unknown origin in a spaceship
that turns out to be an American spacecraft from the future, strange things
start happening.  Killer jellyfish giant squid.... extra copies of "20,000
Leagues under the Sea", oh my!
 To make a long story short, they start being killed off one by one until
there's pretty much no one left, at which point the story takes a turn for
the worse.  The movie becomes a mind exercise, which I didn't care about but
most people do.
 The fact about Sphere is that it is too true to the book.  It has reached
that point when the book has outlasted its usefulness in the adaptation, if
only because the book was a favorite among geeks like me who could grasp the
ideas set forth in it and not the average moron.
 The really disappointing thing about the straight adaptation of the book is
that the characters in the book (and, by extension, the movie), are as flat
and contrived as science fiction characters usually are.  They are
completely predictable, rarely fun to watch, and never engaging.  The
performances are fine considering, but the script inhibits four great actors
into roles they can do nothing with.
 A lesson can be learned by Sphere: don't make sci-fi mass market.  Any
movie that, half an hour in, is using deductive logic as a way to make
suspense will not make most people in college or high school frightened.
Nor will all of those shots at everyone reacting ultra-slowly to any given
situation make them seem like evil characters.  In short, Norman Johnson
never can become Norman Bates.
 Abyss fans will be pleased by the two film's similarities, but please don't
even bother calling it a rip off.  "Sphere" was written long before Abyss
came out, and thus, if anything, Abyss was a rip of the book "Sphere", not
visa-versa.
 However, Sphere the movie is a stylistic rip off of Abyss, using eerie
orchestrals and slow camera pans in order to tell the audience to be scared.
It takes every trick in the book of undersea filmmaking to try to make
Sphere interesting to the mainstream.
The fact remains that this is the modern world and sci-fi happens to be out.
Sure, The Matrix was a home run hit, but Sphere isn't that kind of sci-fi.
It's sci-fi the way sci-fi used to be done niche market.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Starring: Bruce Willis, Ben Affleck, Steve Buscemi, Liv Tyler, Billy Bob
Thorton
The last time we saw Bruce Willis in front of the camera riding the binge
trend of apocalypse movies was in 1995, with the bizarre, twisted Terry
Gilliam saga of a virus and a time travel paradox "12 Monkeys". Having just
finished it as I type these words, I think back with longing to better, more
original apocalypse films, where the disasters were not simply aliens or
rocks in the sky, as happens in this movie. However, perhaps Bruce is the
good luck charm both to apocalypse drama AND summer action films, having
worked wonders in a tricky role with "12 Monkeys" and, in my mind, bringing
a much better light onto this summers finest action film. Not to say that
any day of the week I'd rather rent 12 Monkeys than this, or watch "The
Rock" (the last GOOD action flick that Jerry Bruckheimer came out with).
Deep Impact had the drama, but got an F on the action and the comedy. And,
let's be honest, not many people actually GO to the movie for the drama.
It's really all how on the edge of the seat you are.
In Armageddon, director Michael Bay (The Rock), takes us on a thrill ride
that, in this summer (with a SERIOUS dearth of films where we can just go
out there and enjoy watching it), is actually fun. I'll be the first to
admit its brainlessness, but I'll also be the first in line for its quirky
humor (who other than Jerry Bruckheimer would cast Steve Buscemi as a serial
rapist in one movie (Con Air), and a twisted genius with a sense of humor in
the next (Quote: The Rubix Cube, easy. All of its easy I've got a
double-doctorate from MIT at 22, you know why I do this job: cause they let
me work with explosives).), its fine thrills (both on and off the ground),
and its cute but fun characters you can't help like.
Most people try too much in the apocalypse film. Looking back (and I've seen
just about every apocalypse film this decade, and most of them from the last
one), I find only one or two that I liked all around. So few contain JUST
the right amount of drama, JUST the right amount of action, and JUST the
right amount of humor to create a film truly worth seeing.
Three come to mind, Gilliam's "12 Monkeys", Sonnenfield's "Men in Black"
(besides it being too short, it WAS a good film), and "Armageddon". No
matter what your summer priority is, see this one.

Title
Review for Searching for Bobby Fischer (1993)
They should really let writers direct more often. Sure, they aren't trained
for it all the time, but it has a good track record. Take David Keopp
(writer of the infamous The Lost World), the bane of modern literature when
not directing, but able to turn out a stylish character drama and thriller
when he is (The Trigger Effect). Then take a look at the independent world.
Quentin Tarantino, and Steven Sodorberg (Sex, Lies, and Videotape) to name a
couple. Oh, yeah, Plesantville, let's not forget that one. And, of course,
we have Steven Zallian, who turned out Awakenings and Schlindler's List,
directing the family drama Searching for Bobby Fischer.
A family at its roots, the film follows the true story of chess prodigy Josh
Waitzkin, a kind New York youth who teaches himself to play chess by
watching other play in the park and rises to become the national youth
champion. A story like this would have generated the money alone, but,
unlike some of his counterparts in studio cinema, Steven Zallian has never
been content for a mediocre money-maker film. He brings in the element of
family drama strongly showing how the relationship between father and son is
torn apart and brought together by the game.
Zallian's pen leaves no character is left untouched, even the villains in
the film are stikingly human. The chess teacher is brought in as the man who
pushes Josh but still loves him. Lawrence Fishburne is the Central Park
chessplayer who unconditionally cares for the boy. Joan Allen portrays the
mother who only wants her son to remain decent, and cares more about him
than the game itself.
The remarkable human element isn't what surprised me about this film, it was
it's ability to do so without sacrificing any of the interest in the story,
which moves quickly through the 1:50 long film. Face it, people, writers
just do better when a like mind handles their project. After all, he turned
out his own film and I have only one complaint: the little kid can't
pronouce an "s" worth crap.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Llyod, Frank Oz,
Ray Park, and Ahmed Best
     Seeing as I've been turning in about two reviews a week for several
weeks now, there is no possible way I could have been standing in line all
this time. No, I was smart about the affair. I found the best sound systems
in the theatres outside of the city and then reserved a ticket. Opening day,
I was surprised to find that there were still seats available, but that is
another story. No, I'm not a Star Wars fanatic, and no, I didn't make
lightsaber noises when I was stick fighting as a kid, but I like the
trilogy.
     I've heard the hype by the people and I've heard the hype by the
critics. Although I am not a Star Wars fanatic, I have had my own obsession
about the movie that proves the 2nd Rule of the Critics Bible: Time,
formerly measured in years, is now measured in movies. I mean who (besides
the people CNN hand-picked to say they didn't) didn't know that May 19, 1999
was the day?
     Let's face facts, Star Wars has always been an event. It was an event
22 years ago when it came out, it is an event today when it attempts to
break $200 million in the first weekend by enforcing a very strict embargo
on passes. Star Wars was an event in box office records, always has been and
always will be. It was also always an event in special effects, which it is
now only by bulk. It was also always a story. In the case of The Phantom
Menace, however, the story is its weak point.
     People have said that the weak point of George Lucas is that he has
lost his touch directing. He hasn't. People have said that the weak point of
George Lucas is that he can no longer think little. He can't, but that's not
his mistake. His weak point in The Phantom Menace was threefold: he didn't
hire someone to help him write the script, he didn't know when to stop with
the Special Effects, and he didn't find a better coach for his actors.
     I will tell you first, before I begin my ripping of the bad, that The
Phantom Menace is by far the most fun I have had at the movies since The
Matrix, and is a fine adventure film.
     Taking the bad points down, the script for The Phantom Menace displays
the bad dialogue that adventure films are infamous for. It isn't terrible,
but its dialogue that gets on your nerves. Star Wars creates good
characters, but The Phantom Menace seems to gain a few bad ones in the need
for comic relief. A perfect example is Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), an
annoying computer-generated creature that seems to serve no other purpose
than to annoy adults. Good characters include the young Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman), Obi Wan Kenobi (Ewan
McGregor), and Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson). Following my normal suit, I
really love the central villain of the film, the already infamous Darth Maul
(Ray Park). Yoda (Frank Oz) is the funny little guy he's always been.
Another annoying tidbit about the script is that it is completely
predictable.
     The special effects are best described in a Fruedian slip that I said
on the way out: "The sloppy effects aren't as special as I expected them to
be." The Phantom Menace represents a new era of film: one where the line
between animation and live action is irrevocably blurred. One must remember
that, in the field of special effects, blurred lines are exactly what we
loathe. The animation is impressive in the fact that they were able to
successfully incorporate as much as they did, but the special effects (which
will, despite my vehement protests, win the 2000 Award for Best Special
Effects) were highly inferior to the rather reserved and very innovative
effects used in The Matrix.
     As far as the actors go, I hated the kid. I am extraordinarily glad
that he is not, to my knowledge, signed on for the next one. If I have to
stand through one more forced "Yippee" being uttered from the little boys
lips, I will boycott Star Wars movies. Ewan McGregor, normally an excellent
actor, does a fine job of his physical acting but fails utterly in his
attempts to control his voice. He seems not to be able to decide whether he
wants a British accent, a Scottish accent, or an American accent. Natalie
Portman pulls her weight and then some, but, as I compare her performance in
1994's Leon (known in America as The Professional) and her role in 1995's
Heat, I can only think of an ironic comparison. Her transition between
character-driven stories without lavish sets and huge special effects to the
world of computer animation and eight week dress designs is one of going to
the dark side. Liam Neeson is a great Jedi Knight, and the only actor about
which I have no problem.
     To laud the film, I will say that I had a great amount of fun. The
battle scenes are a treat for the eyes, the chase scenes something to be
praised on their energy (they are high-octane while not using fossil fuels).
Lucas does an excellent job of setting up the film for his next one. Despite
what others may think, it resembles his other films only peripherally. It is
neither Star Wars, nor Empire Strikes Back, nor Return of the Jedi. Nor is
it a mixture of the three. It is, instead, a film of its own. However,
unlike the trilogy, of which each film can stand on its own, The Phantom
Menace relies on the support of the other three. They are a tripod that
surrounds the movie.
     The plot, to wrap up, is a very simple one. A planet is facing invasion
and trade embargo. Two Jedi's are sent to negotiate, which sparks a
conflict. Good and evil face of over the span of two hours, of which one
hour is used to set up parts II and III. They enlist the help of aliens for
impressive battle scenes and eventually, as always, good wins with a shadow
of evil in the wings waiting for the sequel. I still have no idea what the
title means.
     It's enjoyable. It is a landmark. It is Star Wars, and this is the year
of The Phantom Menace. If you are going to see it, my review will mean
nothing to you. If you're not, than my review does nothing either. The very
few people who are up in the air, I am giving it my blessing, albeit
somewhat reluctantly.

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Did you ever feel, if only for a second, that your entire world was
redefined? Everything changes in one instant and, although the change may be
gone in the next, you are never the same. For that instant, in the complete
weirdness of the moment, you feel your entire world collapse as everything
is questioned. Truth, lies, God, life, death, reality (with Lynch,
especially reality). Your entire world doesn't feel right even if it is.
That's what Lost Highway does to you, gives you that queasy feeling in your
stomach, instantly altering everything we ever knew and ever suspected.
Nothing is true, and nothing is false. Reality means nothing. Who you are
means  nothing.
This is a conclusion that, along with other things, took me watching it four
times to realize.
Does is sound utterly and irrevocably insane to you? Well, it is. Without a
single doubt, the weirdest of the upwards of a thousand movies that I have
seen (of course I'm still trying to find where in the hell I can rent
Eraserhead).
The story is as complex (if not more) than I've made it out to be. It begins
in a small room, with a tenor sax (Fred, played by Bill Pullman), smoking on
a cigarette when his buzzer rings. He presses it and someone tells him "Dick
Laurant is Dead"
Things get weirder. His wife is cheating on him, there is a man looking like
a vampire able to be in two places at once, and time has absolutely no
meaning. Don't make the mistake of thinking this is some sci-fi movie,
either. It fits the bill of a rarity, something that only one person has
pulled off more than once (David Lynch being that one person), a Nightmare
World movie. The weirdest and most interesting type of movie because they go
where others never will. I'd tell you more, but this one's so screwed up
that you'll have to see it on your own. A forewarning, though, the movie has
about as much profanity as JFK, as much sex as Showgirls, and as much
violence as Platoon.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Rounders has a good poker face, but a light two pair behind it.
A review of Rounders by James Brundage
Clichés. They exist in our everyday lives in the form of platitudes and in
our everyday situations in the form of idiosyncratic events. In movies,
clichés exist simply as cliches. The single word covers whatever we've seen
before, or rather seen before so many times its trite. I guess my definition
of cliché, however, is warped by how many movies I've seen.
To any normal viewer walking into Rounders, they'll come out with a smile on
their face. They may come out knowing more about poker, too. They also will
come out with a slightly funny look on their face because of the highly
technical talk and barrage of New York City slang. A good example is the
title, which, for all people who are probably wondering what on earth it
means, a rounder is street slang for a card shark good enough to make it his
or her living.
But then comes the movie buff. The movie buff, he'll look at the film and
he'll see right through it like an actual Rounder reading a player's hand
without looking at it. He'll see what lurks behind the sharp, well-acting
eyes of such stars as Matt Damon, (Good Will Hunting, Saving Private Ryan)
Edward Nortan (The People vs. Larry Flynt), John Malkovich (In the Line of
Fire) , who, don't get me wrong, did great jobs in their part. He'll hear
the lines that seem so average. He'll spend his two odd hours enjoying the
movie for the poker, but not for the film itself.
It's not that the film is bad. It's a two pair. But, problem is, it had to
go down charted waters to go into the uncharted ones. It's enjoyable. It's
fun. You may come out feeling like you won, you may come out feeling like
you lost. I guess the point is this : seeing Rounders is like playing poker.
If you only play part of the time, you'll have fun. If you're a pro, it's
simply taking care of business.

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
Halloween : The Boogeyman don't scare me.
Someone once told me it was the most successful independent film of all
time. Someone else told me that it revolutionized horror. Yet another told
me it created horror (HELLO, Psycho?). Personally, I don't see what the big
deal is all about. There are movies that I just can't stand. That their even
being created mystifies me. Halloween was such a film.
Like all of the horror movies that you and I, the babies and the people who
lived through the 80s dealt with, it has the same basic plot: Psycho escaped
from institution has fun stabbing/gutting/strangling/decapitating (based
upon film) the victims of his killing spree.
 Like most horror movies, it could have been good for a laugh. But no. Trust
John Carpenter (director) to give us a film that takes itself so seriously
that you just can't laugh at it. All you can do is sit there with that
glazed look in your eyes.
I am truly sorry it was made. If it wasn't, there would be no horror genre
(for mass market), and we would be out some of the worst films of all time.
Granted, the Scream franchise would be gone too, but I could live with that.
I'm sorry if you already saw it. I'm sorry if you want to see it. Please, I
implore you, don't waste your time.

Title
Review for To Die for (1994)
Starring Nicole Kidman, Matt Dillon, Joaquin Phoenix, Casey Affleck, Illeana
Douglas, Alison Folland, Dan Hedaya, Wayne Knight, and Kurtwood Smith
     Recently, the media has come to the quiet little town that I live in.
One of the things I liked about moving here was that, for all intensive
purposes, it was a land of the free.  Free of loan-sharks, litigation
lawyers.  Free of pickpockets, car jackers, and murders.  But most of all,
it was free of media.  Every time that I have experienced the media, they
have done something akin to biting the hand that feeds them.
     I am not altogether free to fight back and call the media a bunch of
jackals due to the fact that I am a member of it myself.  I am, however,
free to do a retrospective of a movie that does what I cannot: bites back.
     This movie is To Die For.  Forget all that you hear about Oliver
Stone's cult-classic Natural Born Killers being the media satire to end all
media satires.  Compared to To Die For, Natural Born Killers is child's
play.
     Natural Born Killers was clumsy.  Sure, it hit the media.  But, while
setting the media in its sights it took a number of innocent bystanders with
it.  It took on violent movies; violent television, I Love Lucy, romance,
and all of that crap that we really don't want to see all mixed together.
Natural Born Killers is a cleaver.  To Die For is a scalpel.
     From frame one, To Die For takes out one thing and one thing only: the
media.  The first thing we bear witness to is a hoard of reporters rushing
through a graveyard to the funeral of Larry Maretto (Matt Dillon), a man who
his "weather girl" wife Suzanne Stone (Nicole Kidman) is suspected of
murdering.  As the reporters all rush to be the first, we see one of them
fall.  He is trampled as the others rush right over him.
     Then we see Suzanne address us directly, taking on the need to do
everything on television.  Our first real introduction to the character, we
see from her first words that she has about as much intelligence as her dog
Walter.  From then on in, we get one simple thing: a pure, vengeful media
satire.
     The plot of the movie is that the girl that does the local weather in
Little Hope, Connecticut has had her husband killed.  Why?  Reason number
one, she wants fame and he doesn't care for it.  Reason number two, she
knows that killing him will get her a little attention.  Attention is
basically all she wants.  As Suzanne is fond of saying, nothings worth doing
if people aren't watching.
     Suzanne, a pampered girl who's never been told no, decides to kill her
husband and enlists the help of three juvenile delinquents to do it.
There's Jimmy Emmett (Joquain Phoenix), who she seduces with her body, Lydia
Mertz (Alison Folland), who she seduces with dreams of Hollywood, and Russel
Hines (Casey Affleck), who she seduces with money and some new CDs.
Controlling them perfectly like pawns on a chessboard, she sets them in
place to do her dirty work, all the while trying to end up famous.
     To Die For doesn't just use a great plot to propel it into the position
of the best media satire to date... it enlists a great sense of dark comedy
to make us laugh at how unbelievably stupid Suzanne is.  It gives us a great
set of memorable characters.  The traditionalist husband (Larry Maretto
(Matt Dillon)).  The father in law with mob connections (Dan Hedaya).  The
incestuous father (Kurtwood Smith).  The ice-skating idiot sister (Illeana
Douglas).
     It also gives us one of the best styles of storytelling.  Gus Van Sant
takes his camera in and takes the media out from the inside, filming the
movie as if it were a PBS documentary.  He edits in interviews with
    Jimmy and Janice Maretto (Douglas).  Shows us a talk show where the two
families share their sides of the stories.  Contrasts this with the dark
story told by a sociopath Suzanne.  He ends us with a bang.
     In one of the best shots ever, he shows us the one girl who hopes to be
famous getting to tell her story and getting her dream.  It has her being
put into split-screen after split-screen... until you get the sensation that
she is everywhere.
     To Die For takes the media out back and beats it to death, keeping a
smile on everyone's face all the time.  For people like me, who are fed up
with the spiel that the networks keep handing down to us, this is a movie
for you to enjoy.

Title
Review for Girlfight (2000)
You can take the girl out of the fight, but can you take the fight out of
the girl?  Well, as all of those overcoming-the-odds,
beating-the-hell-out-of-the-adversary movies of recent and past would have
us believe, no.  Instead, you can channel it, make it into a focused rage
that is capable of winning matches and perhaps even capturing a viewer's
interest for a few hours.
While Girlfight may result in a general sense of control and the winning of
a few matches on the behalf of this female boxer Diana (Michelle Rodregiuz),
it does not capture our interest.  In fact, this two-hour movie feels like a
three hour movie, has almost no character development to boot, and has all
of the clichéd cinematography and director that makes me wonder if these
cinematic craftsmen learned their trade off of a crackerjack box.
In the beginning of Girlfight, Diana goes into duke-out mode after a girl
sleeps with a guy that a friend of hers wants.  This apparently has been her
fourth fight of the semester, and the principle wants her act cleaned up or,
of course, it's expulsion.
Before I go on with my singular-minded tirade of why one should avoid
Girlfight at all costs, let me ask an open-ended question: how many times
have we seen this before?  Really.  Isn't this the formula for a
boxing/overcoming troubles movie: person A is really angry, gets threatened,
gets ship shape, and we all live happily ever after?
This formula is basically the path that Girlfight follows to the most
clichéd ending ever: slow motion hugging with a freeze frame and a
high-grain shot.  Gimme a break or break someone's neck, please.  How this
film got the Grand Jury at Sundance is beyond me.
Girlfight does have its nice points, however.  There is a fascinating
relationship between Diana and her father (Paul Cauldron) and Rodregiuz does
a wonderful job of expressing the trials and triumphs female boxing.  Yet
this relationship could stand a lot more development instead of the schlock
treatment it gets (only one scene actually affects you).
To it's credit, Girlfight goes the Raging Bull method in boxing matches,
have each fight be a quieter, well-photographed routine instead of having
each punch by a slap across the face by Thor's hammer.
But all of this doesn't get over the fact that Girlfight really never goes
anywhere.  When the parental conflict is resolved, the little steam that
Girlfight was running on runs dry, and you still end up being subjected to
two boring boxing matches and a helluva lot of psuedodrama before this dog
of a film finishes.  And, when the two hours are over, the only thing you'll
get out of watching Girlfight is a headache and an enjoyable period of
mutual complaints with your friends, and unless that's your idea of a
pleasant evening, neither is Girlfight.
Director: Karyn Kusama
Producer: Sarah Green, Martha Griffin, Maggie Renzi
Writer: Karyn Kusama
Starring: Michelle Rodriguez, Jaime Tirelli, Paul Calderon, Santiago
Douglas, Ray Santiago, Elisa Bocanegra, Shannon Walker Williams
Short Stuff short film review:
http://www.othercinema.com/~jbrundage/

Title
Review for Even Cowgirls Get the Blues (1993)
Written and Directed by Gus Van Sant (Psycho)
Starring Uma Thurman (Pulp Fiction) as Sissy Hankshaw, Lorainne Bracco
(Medicine Man), Keanu Reeves (Speed)
Good serious movies, by their nature, have to have some element of comedy in
them. Whether it be satire, irony, or downright slapstick humor, they
distract us from the serious nature of the story until we don't know what
has happened and end up missing the movie and characters when they end. Of
course, you ask, how could a movie with a title like Even Cowgirls Get the
Blues be funny at all, let alone serious at the same time? The answer: a
beautiful adaptation by Gus Van Sant (who also directs) and a fine
performance by Uma Thurman.
In the movie, based on the novel by Tom Robbins, Uma Thurman plays Sissy
Hankshaw, the world's best hitchhiker because she has the world's largest
thumbs (expressed perfectly in the line, "The Lord God made me to direct
traffic."). She has no job most of the time but, when she works, is the
model for the Dew Mist feminine hygiene spray. On one modeling assignment
her travels takes her to a beauty ranch whose cowgirls are lesbians (without
a political agenda! A non-stereotyped Hollywood, at last!). Upon coming to
the ranch she finds love with the ringleader Bonanza Jellybean (Rain
Phoenix).
Trapped in the same world all of us are, trying to find love, fit in, and
get along, she believes that her happiness has been found with these
cowgirls, but sadness is just as likely to hit there as anywhere else, and,
as the title goes, Even Cowgirls get the Blues.
As just about everything Gus Van Sant does is, the film is excellent as a
metaphor movie. In addition, it keeps an interesting intelligence to the
cowgirls, all of whom are endowed with a wisdom that surpasses most
people's. Like Drugstore Cowboy (1989), Gus Van Sant's other fairly surreal
foray, it's inaccessible to the average viewer because of its trippy nature
and political riskiness (Drugstore Cowboy was a film about a crew of dope
fiends, Even Cowgirls Get the Blues is a film about lesbians that can offend
it's target group.) If you can actually get past the oddities, though, it's
one of the funniest films you'll ever see, but one that will leave you
wishing that cowgirls didn't have to get the blues.

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Written by Tom Lazurus and Rick Ramage
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, and Jonathan Pryce
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 I've got a thing about horror movies I hate 'em.  Almost every horror film
put in front of me comes off with a review filled with complete disgust at
its plotless nature and its annoying dialogue.  Even more than horror films,
however, I hate movies about the end of the world.  Imagine my surprise when
Stigmata was neither.
 Although horror is the closest place to put Stigmata, it actually lies in
the category of religious drama.  Thankfully, the film has nothing to do
with the end of the world.  What it has to do with is the end of the
Catholic Church via a gospel according to Christ that is delivered in the
form of a possessed Frankie Paige (Arquette).
 It has all of the elements required of a film to appeal to the mainstream:
suspense,  a cool soundtrack, a good-looking actress and an actor that your
date will think is sweet because of the Irish accent.  Yet something lurks
beyond this.  Something is hidden in the folds of what appears on the
surface to be a complete idiocy of a mainstream film.
 The film features, although laying it on thick at numerous times, an
anti-Catholic church political agenda.  It spends half of its time scaring
most of us with a mystery and a few Exorcist rip offs, and the rest of the
time involving us with a conspiracy concerning the covering up of the Christ
Gospel (as the movie calls it).
 Luckily, the people to whom which this will hit too close to home will
probably not be found in a movie theatre for a film already declared a
sacrilege.  As many Lenny Bruce-esque jokes as I could prattle off in the
next few paragraphs, I will refrain from doing so for the fact that, at
least in this case, I do not want to offend anyone.
 The film has an incredibly dark and stylish feel to it, befitting of the
better half of MTV directors who made the transition to film.  A sad
offshoot of this industrial feel is that they felt the need to pick
Pittsburgh as their locale -- a city which no rickety subways that is in
general about as dark as Mickey Mouse (although, to its credit, it is highly
industrial).  Glossy effects are used, but not overused.  A techno
soundtrack and a heavy percussion score marks the film's suspenseful half
while allowing just enough time for our brains to contemplate what is
happening.
 One of the things that is scary as a society came in an ad-libbed review a
friend gave me of The Blair Witch Project: "It made you think, and that was
scary."  Although this was highly ambiguous as to whether the fact that you
thought during a horror film was scary or the thoughts you were having were
scary, Stigmata barks up the same tree.  It makes you think.  The thoughts
you think are downright terrifying, the distrusts in Catholicism are as vast
and as paranoid as anything Chris Carter thought up for "The X-Files."  At
the same time, however, Stigmata leaves you in such a way as to examine the
role of God and faith and the church in life, a subject too many of us spend
too little time thinking on.
 With this final couplet I end my review,
 It's sad when Hollywood's more pious than you.

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
Written and Directed by Peter Berg (Chicago Hope)
Starring:
 Christian Slater (Pump Up The Volume) as Robert Boyd
 Cameron Diaz (The Last Supper) as Laura Garrety
 Daniel Stern (City Slickers) as Adam Barkow
 Jeanne Tripplehorn (The Firm) as Lois Barkow
 Jon Favreau (Swingers) as Kyle Fisher
 Jeremy Piven (Grosse Pointe Blank) as Michael Berkow
 Leland Orser (Alien: Resurrection) as Charles Moore
Very Bad Things marks the new level in dark comedy, the twisted and bizarre
level in which nothing is sacred.  To hell with PC, to hell with morals and
decency and not witnessing gore: Very Bad Things shows everything.  That
said, don't see it on a full stomach.  That said, make it a point to see
Peter Berg's Very Bad Things next weekend.
Very Bad Things is the blackest black comedy since Curdled, and the most
intelligent since The Last Supper, and the most fun independent film to
watch since Reservoir Dogs.  The movie functions on three levels: one
sublimely funny as we watch the world go into complete chaos around five men
and their attempt to cover up the accidental death of a Las Vegas
prostitute, and the not-so-accidental death of a hotel security guard.  The
second level is a Hitchcock-level psychological thriller that tracks
everyone's descent into insanity as they all struggle to cover up the
murders.  Level three, ironically, is a moral message in the midst of this
immoral and psychotic world: all wrongdoers are punished for their sins.
The film follows five men (Christian Slater, Daniel Stern, Jon Favreau,
Jeremy Piven, and Leland Orser) on Jon Favreau's Vegas bachelor party.
Christian Slater, the ringleader of the group, hires a hooker for Jon
Favreau's last night of freedom and Jeremy Piven, whoops, kills her.  When a
hotel security guard comes up to investigate the noise, Christian Slater
kills him too.  They all agree to cover up the murders, bury the bodies in
the desert, and act like it never happened.  But, sadly, Daniel Stern has
one too many morals for that.
What follows is everyone's collapse into complete insanity as they try to
cover up the two murders, then try to cover up a third murder, then a
fourth, fifth, sixth  well, you get the point.
The actors do their finest in the serious parts of the movie.  Most notably
Daniel Stern, who has always shied from serious roles, adeptly handles the
only truly moral character in the movie.  Also (my personal favorite of the
movie), is Christian Slater, an anti-Semite psychotic who is so deeply
involved with self help that just isn't working.
The film's creativity is truly shown with it's ability to make anything
funny: cocaine, anti-Semitism, car crashes, murders, burial practices,
minivans, wives, kids, the handicapped, the paralyzed, telethons, oral sex,
and power tools, just to name a few.  There's nothing this film won't -- and
doesn't target.  And, friends, it hits the bullseye every time.
It's not a movie for the weak of heart, the weak of stomach, or the weak of
morals (don't get any ideas, folks), but it is the movie for anyone who
doesn't meet those criterion.  See it for the dark comedy, see it for the
thrills, see it for the morals.  By God, indulge yourself: see it for the
Very Bad Things.
The Movie Critic's Heaven
http://members.tripod.com/~criticsheaven/

Title
Review for Bobby G. Can't Swim (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage .
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d68b6c487567e5be882568b10009e801?OpenDocument
Written and Directed by John-Luke Montias
Starring John-Luke Montias and Susan Mitchell
 Having just watched probably the worst single-man-show I had ever seen
(Happy Birthday, Mr. Mograbi), I walked into the theatre for Bobby G.
Can't Swim with the same queasy trepidation of Jodie Foster sitting in
front of Hannibal the Cannibal in Silence of the Lambs.  Another one-man
show awaited me, this one in a genre (the street movie) that is overdone
at the best.
 Sitting in the theatre, still aching for Pepto-Bismol after Mograbi's
shaky camerawork, I began to compose my negative review in advance.  I
began to figure out insults that I could pass off later on.  This
process occupied my mind for almost five minutes, at which point the
thoroughly excellent and surprising Bobby G. Cant' Swim came on the
screen and made me vow yet again to save coming up with snide wise ass
comments until after I have watched the movie.
 Bobby G. Can't Swim is the story of Bobby Grace (John-Luke Montias), a
street pusher who may be able to make the deal of his lifetime sell a
key of cocaine to a bunch of out-of-town yuppies at a tremendous
markup.  Of course, several things go wrong with this simple plan and
Bobby G. ends up fighting for his life.
 Admittedly, Bobby G. loses a point for originality in plot, but therein
lies the film's only flaw.  Instead of having a street movie that waxes
philosophical about how hard the street life is or that simply curses
and shoots people, Bobby G. Can't Swim opts for adopting a strong case
of gallows humor.
Bobby is a small time sucker who is constantly getting taken advantage
of (i.e. he ends up getting a collector's bowling ball for a few grams
of cocaine), and what little moral fiber Bobby has makes him so
endearing to the viewer that it is impossible to take your eyes off the
character.  This is aided by the fact that John-Luke Montias tailor-made
the part to himself and tended bar in the area in which the film takes
place.  Susan Mitchell, who plays Bobby's hooker-girlfriend, shines as
much as a gritty New York hooker can shine.
 Despite his proficiency with actors and his background in acting,
Montias cannot and will not ever be described as an actor's director.
This backhand that several critics use to excuse a director's lack of
technical proficiency has no place in a review of Bobby G. Can't Swim
due to the fact that the film is extremely well made.  The camera is
infused with the energy of the street, and Montias captures New York
City perfectly.
 The script sidesteps almost every cliché in the genre.  It never
mentions the Mafioso.  It never deals with racist themes.  It never
paints its characters in black and white.  The only cliché that it does
not sidestep is its ending.  Somewhere along the line, the script forces
itself into a narrative cul-de-sac and we end up with a predictable
final scene.  Yet this is virtually the only problem, and the ending is
not so terrible as to spoil the rest of the film.  All in all Bobby G.
Can't Swim is a film worth time and money in every way, shape, and form
it's a boisterous, exhilarating ride worth paying for.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
Written by Kerry Ehrin, Zak Penn, and Audrey Wells
Starring Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Andy Dick, Joely Fisher, and
Dabney Coleman
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Its a sad state of affairs when Republicans and Democrats can get along
better than rival movie studios.  Nine times out of ten, republicans and
democrats can't sit in the same room without yelling, yet, with at least
some bipartisan cooperation, they can churn out a good law every once in a
while.
 Movie studios, on the other hand, refuse to collaborate even when it would
be in there best interests.  Case in point: Inspector Gadget and Wild Wild
West.
 Inspector Gadget is the latest in a string of cartoon adaptations that
generally annoy me.  This one, however, would have been a lot better under
the command of Barry Sonnefield.  Sonnfield decided to do Wild Wild West, a
movie with no plot, no fine performances, and a focus on action. Novice
director David Kellogg got to do inspector Gadget, a film that has plot, has
performances, and has a focus on comedy.  It just lacks that particular
thing called timing.
 Where as Wild Wild West never made me laugh, Inspector Gadget irked out a
few (by definition, I laughed exactly three times during the movie).
However, Inspector Gadget's wet behind the ears director David Kellogg just
couldn't handle a movie of Inspector Gadget's plot... and that's not a lot
to ask.
 Of course, I can't get my wish and Inspector Gadget WASN'T done by Barry
Sonnfield, so instead I had to sit through the hour and a half of Disney
crap.
 Inspector Gadget tells the story of John Brown (Matthew Broderick), who
gets a serious injury while trying to stop Claw (Rupert Everett, the fun
part of the movie) from getting away with robbery and murder.  He becomes
the experimental prototype of a new form of cybernetic police officer known
as Inspector Gadget, and gets to fulfill his dream of becoming a supercop.
Of course he has a love interest, Brenda (Joely Fisher).  Of course he has a
car that talks back to him (can we say LOVE BUG?).
 Basically, Claw creates a duplicate evil Gadget (also played by Broderick,
who has versatility even in as flat a role as Inspector Gadget offers him)
who tries to destroy Riverdale and, from then in, the movie is completely
cliche and predictable.
 Of the several annoyances I have over this film, three rank high on my
list.  The first is that all of the great actors are given terrible roles.
Rupert Everett, Andy Dick, Mathew Broderick.  These are three people able to
pass off a joke in a Nazi Death Camp (along with Roberto Benigni), but the
writers don't give them a single chance.  Two, the cartoon wasn't that good
to begin with (I spent a good portion of my youth watching its ilk), and the
movie was worse than the cartoon, and three, it decided that it was going to
rename the city Riverdale.
 The movie is obviously filmed in Pittsburgh, a city that truly shines out
in the film, yet the writers decided to set the movie in Riverdale.  Hello?
What does that do if everyone notices the city as Pittsburgh?  Of course,
I'm only saying this because I live near the burgh and for some reason the
steel city grows on you (kinda like New Jersey), but I still think it's a
crock.  A lot more people would have been happy if they moved it to
Pittsburgh, but NO!
 It doesn't matter, anyway.  Even if they moved the location to Pittsburgh,
the movie would have still sucked.  It just should have been done with the
touch of Sonnfield, not some idiot still reading a camera manual.

Title
Review for Chef! (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c84aaa4bdefe1885882568b1000b1e14?OpenDocument
 It is bad enough when you have a ninety-minute film that feels like two
hours, but when you have a 61-minute film that feels like two hours, you
know you're in trouble.  Such is the case with Chef!, a disorganized
documentary probing the injustices in the society of Cameroon.
 Chef! is a film that uses a personal narrative to tell us three things
that we already know: that lynching isn't a good idea, that patriarchal
marriages suck eggs, and that dictatorships are unjust institutions.
These three things add up to another simple general impression: that you
can't get any sort of justice in the society of Cameroon.
 Were Chef! a straight forward narrative film, I would bash it for
meandering its way to a stopping point (note: not an end, this film does
not end).  As a documentary, I must be slightly more creative and state
that the film is disorganized.  Each type of injustice takes about
twenty minutes of time and has no sort of transition into the next
injustice.  A good documentary should flow like an academic
conversation, and Chef! has all of the controlled flow of a series of
CNN factoids.
 Chef! serves to somewhat redeem itself by having a nice flow inside of
each subsection.  The subjects are captured and edited well, so that,
when all is said and done, a sense of moribund comedy resounds around
the society of Cameroon.  Sadly, these `jokes' are mostly unintentional,
and are come too little too late to save a documentary that has no
concept of pacing or organization.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Price Above Rubies, A (1998)
Ok. When I reviewed Kundun, I reached the conclusion that I needed the raw
thrill of ripping a movie to shreds in my bare hands. As almost an answer to
my prayers, a movie comes along that can do just that... well, kindof. I
can't really rip *A Price Above Rubies*, since it wasn't actually a terrible
movie. Instead it was a movie that is, in my modern apotheosis of a negative
utopia, a rarity: a movie neither good nor bad, the place between substance
and shadow that does not quite reside in "The Twilight Zone".
So I am sitting down and now pondering which to write: the good review or
the bad review, each a definite possibility, and the decision is reached:
heads for good, tails for bad. But alas, the coins are upstairs and I am a
lazy bum. So I guess I write option C: the mediocre review. The movie really
wasn't either.
So we go into transcendence of both of the places...
1. A land of substance. On one hand, this was a film, like *Schindler's
List*, that demonstrated the difficulties of being Jewish. Like anything
Spike Lee turns out, it resounds as a fine ethnic film. It has metaphors, it
has symbolism, it has memories, hallucinations, dreams, all of which are
good points for the art film. It has plot, it has characters. It has a
people that you care about. A strong human element. And, it has my often
pick of Women's Lib, which, in this case, rubs off rather nicely. ++++.
2. A land of shadow. Of course there is the bad, and each point has a
counterpoint. The characters, although you care about them, happen to be
shades of gray. There are really no villains in this film about an Orthodox
Jewish woman who has a life out of control and a strong inner fire. There's
a boredom rate that insomniacs envy. There's a narrow target audience, and
an even smaller group of people that will come out smiling. And, to top it
off, there is something which *Schindler's List* gave off, but in a nicer
way: controversy. From Yiddish cursing to challenging a religion that has
been pretty much left alone by the film industry (if not aided) since WWII,
and a graphic display of all sorts of sin, it just leaves you seeing the
black, the white, and the gray. ----.
And that's what this film is: the black and the white and the gray. It's a
coin with three sides, and I'm sorry, but I don't have all the answers. I'm
not you. I liked it, but didn't love it. My advice for your decision: flip a
coin.
http://members.tripod.com/~criticsheaven/

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
Starring Ewan McGregor, Ewen Bremner, Jonny Lee Miller, Kevin McKidd, Robert
Carlyle, and Kelly MacDonald
     Choose life.  Choose a job.  Choose a starter home.  Choose dental
insurance, lisure wear and matching luggage.  Choose your future.  But why
would you want to do a thing like that?
     Thus begins (with severe editing) Trainspotting, the film that took
Britian and didn't even dent America.  Why it didn't take America is still a
mystery to me.  I think, perhaps it was too liberal for those conservative
wankers.  But then I remember, I dunna know a soul who cares about shite
like that.  Perchance it was too funny for those with a stick up the'r arse.
Then I remember that it was made by the brits, who classicly have a stick up
the'r arse.
     Then methinks its just that the bloody wankers can't see past a bunch
of Scottish slang.
     Yes, that would be the reason that I've just sounded like I've took a
few too many pints down at the pub.  The fact is that, between having a
British director (Danny Boyle), a Scottish writer (John Hodge) and being
based on a novel that could serve as a dictionary for Scottish slang (Irvine
Welsh's "Trainspotting"), Trainspotting doesn't hold much appeal for the
average moviegoer.
     But, you know what?  I don't particularily like the average moviegoer.
Why?  The average moviegoer is someone who makes a lot of money for a lot of
bad movies and then makes the penny-pushing tight-arses at the studio come
out with even more bad movies, which, for me, are like the trials of Job.
     The fact is that Trainspotting is one of the finest British films I
have seen n ages, and I see a lot of British films.  Trainspotting takes us
on a wild ride with five heroin adicts as they go on and off the drug and
then make a deal that may make them rich.  In particular, it follows Mark
"Rent-boy" Renton (Ewan McGreggor), a full-time heroin adict who spends the
first half of the movie taking us on a drug ride funnier than any Cheech and
Chong film and then spends the second half of the film making us actually
realize the massive mistake he has made by getting on heroin in the first
place.
     In the first half, we get pleanty of jokes and some plot development as
Renton and his four mates (Spud (Ewen Bremmer), Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller),
Tommy (Kevin McKidd), and Franco (Robert Carlyle)) spend there time
basically going out on the town of Edinburgh.  They spend their days getting
high and their nights at the pub.  Sick Boy and Renton decide to quit
heroin, and, in order to celebrate, they go out on the town where Renton
falls in love (or at least slleps with) with a wonderful piece of jailbait
named Diane (Kelly MacDonald's breakout role).  At the same time we get to
see two other sex scenes turn to crap (literally and figuratively) as
everything possible goes wrong with them.
     The hour and a half movie pretty much equally divides us between making
us laugh and making us step back and look at the tatterred landscape that
remains of what was once a promising life.  It paints the portrait of a
character who, if he ever had native morals, has lost them a long time ago
and now only lives for the moment.
     Not for the weak of mind, heart, stomach, or any other bodily organ,
Trainspotting is about the most liberal film you will ever find on drugs.
It shows both the good and the bad about heroin... giving it a fair trail
and still executing it.  Not for conservatives, not for people who can't get
past the huge Scottish accent that hangs over the movie like a thick fog,
Trainspotting is a film for that one other group: independent film fans.
You guys, please, watch, enjoy, get the message and give a message (through
your money) so that they make more movies like it.

Title
Review for Citizen Ruth (1996)
Written by Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor
Starring Laura Dern, Swoosie Kurtz, Mary Kay Place, Kurtwood Smith, Kelly
Preston, M.C. Gainey, Alicia Witt, and Burt Reynolds
     Look, I know I'm going to get flamed after this, and anyone with a
militant opinion one way or the other about the issue should know that I
really don't care.  So don't waste your time.  That said, down to the review
of one of the most controversial movies I have seen in a while.
     I just got off of a Laura Dern trip.  First, I completed David Lynch's
Wild at Heart.  Then, I immediately popped in Blue Velvet, another
Lynch/Dern collaboration.  Afterwards, I took a brief respite from the
serious in the form of the dark comedy Curdled.  Then, this morning I
checked my TV guide and saw that Citizen Ruth was on TMC so I decided to go
back on my Laura Dern trip.  So, dutifully taking my clicker, I changed to
channel 18 and was greeted by the little dog hyping a feature presentation
and then got down to watching my third Laura Dern movie in two days, Citizen
Ruth.
     Citizen Ruth, like Blue Velvet, is a dark satire.  One of them takes on
a relatively safe subject, small towns, in a relatively unsafe way.  Citizen
Ruth takes on the least safe subject that it can find, abortion, and does it
in the most unsafe way possible.
     Before you start steaming at your computer as your own personal
opinions on the subject come to the surface, let me say this to placate you:
Citizen Ruth does not take a side.  Or, rather, it is equally fair to both.
The fairness that Citizen Ruth displays, however, is in taking each side out
back and beating it with a stick.
     Citizen Ruth follows Ruth Stoops (Laura Dern), a huffer by inclination
that has been charged with criminally endangering her fetus.  Now, here
starts the offensive part: the judge has made an offer to reduce the charges
if she decides to get an abortion.  While in jail awaiting trial, a group of
rabid pro-lifers called the "baby savers" (with the centerpiece players
being Kurtwood Smith, Mary Kay Place, and Burt Reynolds) bail her out and
decide to make sure that she has the baby (mainly motivated not even out of
a concern for the baby but because they want to take the judge and hang him
out to dry.)
    These people are the stereotypes.  They are Republicans, owning a
mortgaged house and having two kids (one a rebellious slut (Alicia Witt)
underneath their nose).  The husband works, the wife does not.  The son
makes model planes.  The husband has a wandering eye.  They sing praises to
Christ until the cows come home.
     Ruth, of course, is the complete antithesis of them.  She wants to
watch a TV which they don't have.  She wants to party, which is, of course,
a sin.  And, in order to avoid going to jail, she wants to have an abortion.
So they send her to an anti-abortion clinic where caring is supposed to be
the doctrine but it ends up being more like complete hatred.
     When you're starting to really get the point about how hypocritical the
anti-abortion people are being, you then get to see the pro-choicers
skewered like a shiskabob.  Ruth ends up being kicked out of the pro-lifer's
home and into the hands of a self-proclaimed "spy in the war", Diane
(Swoosie Kurtz).  Diane, Democrat to the bone, has been playing as if she
hates abortion so she could go undercover and get inside information to
sabotage the baby savers plans.  Can you say "psycho?"
     Diane is a lesbian, pagan, new-age fanatic who wants nothing more than
to make sure that Ruth gets the abortion.  She calls in Harlan (M.C.
Gainey), ex-special forces commando that makes absolutely sure the
pro-lifers don't disturb their well-laid plans.
     As the debate increases much like a cold war, money is laid down on the
table.  The pro-lifers start by offering $15,000.  The pro-choicers
counterbid.  Ruth, feeling like she has won the lottery, is ecstatic.
     Now most of you with strong opinions are probably going for your
shotguns trying to find where I and the people who made this film lived.
Please, leave us alone.  As I said, Citizen Ruth never really speculates on
whether abortion is right or wrong it only states that when you take an
opinion too strongly, things go wrong.
     Look at it!  You have a group of people saying that they want to save
the baby that don't care anything about the baby!  In the other corner, you
have a group saying that they want to save the woman that doesn't care
anything about the woman!  The message Citizen Ruth displays is for all of
the disillusioned souls who have gotten caught up so much in the war over
right and wrong that they have forgotten right and wrong in and of
themselves.
     The movie ends up being laughable thanks to the excellent performance
by Dern, who shines through as always and doesn't make the mistake of trying
to make Ruth nice.  Were Ruth a nice person, the story would lose its point,
and no one would want that.
     The film is bitterly ironic to the end, as shown in the fact that both
sides, professing endlessly to care about Ruth, are too busy shouting each
other down to notice that she's gone.  Oh, well.
     For anyone with or without a militant opinion, this movie should show
you why you should not possess it.  It is a movie with a political motive, a
satiric means, and a wonderful end.  I'd say enjoy, but it's not quite the
right word.

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
Finally, a well done piece of cinema! To see it this year is like finding an
oasis in the desert and drinking your full, a refreshing experience. As of
this point, I could and still can count the serious Oscar contenders on my
hands and feet, and "Seven Years in Tibet" ranks among them.
Brad Pitt actually surprised me (although the accent was a little poor),
with his wonderful portrayal of mountain climber Heinrich Harrer, a man who
left his home to climb the ninth highest mountain in the world, and ended up
having everything he ever knew changed. He turns on the charm for the camera
and for the film, actually making you perfectly connect with this different
character in them midst of World War II.
As is all-too-much used but timeless, a major theme of the movie is changing
of ideals from imperialistic to anti-imperialistic, placing the viewpoint of
Harrar among that of Oscar Schindler (although "Schindler's List" was by far
a greater movie). Also thrown in to put him next to the greats is his hate
of nationalistic pride, a trait exhibited by Count Almasy in "The English
Patient".
For those of you who think I am beginning to downplay the movie, make no
mistake : this is the best film of the year so far (With possible future
exceptions being "Boogie Nights", "Les Miserables" and "Titanic"., which,
with "Contact", would make up this years nominees.). Its characters deeply
move you, you fall in love with the Tibetan landscape, and it enters into
your mind and heart like few movies can.
Not made for the mass market, if you are someone looking for a load of fun
at the movies, then go see "I know what you did last summer". If you're
looking for a masterwork of modern cinema, see "Seven Years in Tibet".

Title
Review for Down with America (1997)
Starring Peter Roach, Meri Stevens, Joe Kaczkowski, Robb Sherman, and Kevin
Flowers
 I don't box with kid gloves.  I don't play nice, I'm not a nice guy, and I
never, ever, go easy on a film.  I consider it to be a breech of some sort
of code of ethics for a movie critic.   However, I do some favors, and these
often come in the form of points that I hand to certain groups due to the
artistic bravery.  Rigormortis, the production company that has been my
prime example of how money does not need to motivate filmmaking, gets
several of these points each time.
 I still, however, will not go easy on them.
 They recently sent me a VHS copy of their Down with America trilogy (which
begins, quite wittily, with a disclaimer that they are not trying to
undermine America with the making of this film.) and I decided to spend an
hour of my day watching it.
 In the famous lines of many martyrs, I have no regrets.
 Well, I do have some regrets, but that is not the point in the previous
sentence.  The point of it was that Down with America was a film that, from
a critical standpoint, did not entirely disappoint me.  Sure, the risky use
of VHS instead of Super 8mm or 16mm was a pain, and the natural light was
one of the most annoying things about public access films, but the movie
itself was fairly enjoyable.
 Down with America concerns a government agent, needless murder, and a book
containing everything from the Unabomber's Manifesto to the 1995 Apple
Computer Profit Report.  Like the previous films of Rigormortis that I have
reviewed, it displays an off-kilter humor and intelligence it succeeds in
making me laugh where countless studio films fail.
 The best way to see this film would be as a parody of the countless
conspiracy films that we have been drowned in since the paranoia of the 80s.
A dying movement from the day they started, these paranoid `thrillers' had
the government always covering up something and had the same favorite word:
`Roswell.'
 In Down with America, the line `Roswell' is highly absent.
 With an about ten minute running time, Down with America effortlessly
sidesteps every cliché that the conspiracy films fell into, makes jokes at
them at the same time, and provides us with funny and memorable characters.
Again, I have seen movies that have gone on two hours with characters I
couldn't care less about.
 The film, as previously stated, concerns a Federal Agent (Peter Roach), an
obsessed librarian (Meri Stevens), a Mystery Man (Joe Kaczkowski), and two
people obsessed with silence in the library (Robb Sherman, Kevin Flowers).
The plot: a book containing the secrets of all anarchists is hidden in A
PUBLIC LIBRARY where it can be viewed by all.
 From there we go into a delightful parody.  The Federal Agent claims his
sovereign right to alter the truth, the librarian goes on a diatribe about
the sanctity of books.  We spend our time laughing at fairly idiotic jokes
that are performed much too well considering the lack of coaching of the
cast.
 Although the actors and actresses are in small roles and give a whole new
meaning to `no-name', it ends up being the no-name people who do a good job,
delivering better performances as comic villains than half the crap that
Hollywood turns out.
 For once, I don't have a URL that I know offhand to give you as to where to
locate the film online.  I can only say that you should find my previous
reviews of L'Auto and Les X-Files and look up the Rigormortis Productions
site in and of itself.  It's almost as much fun as the film.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
Written by Alex Proyas, Lem Dobbs, and David S. Goyer
Staring Rufus Sewell, Jennifer Connelly, Kiefer Sutherland, William Hurt,
Ian Richardson, and Richard O'Brien.
     This is the fifth time I have watched Dark City.  Four times I have
watched it on video rentals, the fifth time I watched it on a DVD, the
format that I've been hearing good things about for several months now.  I
paid $24.99 to buy the DVD, about $10-$15 more than I would have spent on a
videocassette.  As far as format goes, it was worth it.  From frame one,
picture is deeper and sound is clearer.  Well, enough about telling the
world about the Dark City DVD - a vast enhancement over the VHS version -
let's talk about the movie Dark City.
     Dark City is about, well, a dark city.  It is dark on the psychological
level: the world presented in front of you is one of prostitutes, serial
killers, and things that go bump in the night.  It is also dark on the
physical level: no one can remember clearly the last time they saw the light
of day.  As far as the darkness of the film itself: it is a devastatingly
beautiful film noir, filled with all the jazz and mystery that we have come
to expect from the incredibly interesting style of filmmaking.
     Alex Proyas' first cinematic effort since the tragic death of Brandon
Lee on the set of The Crow, this presents us with a radically different
world than the shoot-em-up that The Crow was.  In Dark City, we follow John
Murdoch (Rufus Sewell), a man with scant memories and the ability to Tune,
or alter physical reality with his mind.  Murdoch awakes at midnight in a
city where time seems to stop for several hours.  He is in a hotel room with
a bloody knife and the dead body of a prostitute.  On his trial are a race
of beings called "The Strangers", who also posses this telekinetic ability.
 The Strangers are a dying race that controls Dark City, replacing people's
memories in order to discern what makes a person human.  They are, in their
own way, searching for the soul.
     Murdoch does soul-searching of his own, trying to find who he was, or
was supposed to be.  Desperately trying to evade the psychotic and utterly
terrifying Strangers.  Dr. Daniel Poe Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland) is trying
to aid him, trying to help him understand an ability that he can hardly
fathom, while at the same time being forced by the Strangers to help them in
their zoo of humanity.  Emma Murdoch (Jennifer Connelly), his wife, is a
jazz singer utterly convinced that her husband is innocent.  Inspector
Bumstead (William Hurt) is the cop trying to make sense of a crime that
leads to a conspiracy more complex than the JFK assassination.
     Dark City is propelled forward at the speed of a Tokyo bullet train
thanks to one of the most original plots and screenplays in ages, the first
in a pattern of cross-genre works (this one sci-fi, Mystery, and Film Noir)
that had among its newest members the excellent action film The Matrix.  The
ferocious pace displayed in the movie grabs everyone at frame one and keeps
them until the end, and kicks the suspense in with a wonderful score and a
terrific jazz and techno soundtrack.
     It is a foray into the surreal: let you be warned about that.  However,
unlike most ambiguous and surreal movies, such as Lynch's Lost Highway, it
gives you answers in a way that you can understand.  Not only does it give
you answers in an easy to understand format, but it compels you with
characters that you like, that you find unique.  It is careful not to put
you a step ahead or behind Murdoch as he unravels the mystery of Dark City,
as he tries to escape from the bizarre and frightening world that constantly
surrounds him.
     See it, sci-fi fans.  See it, those who liked The Crow.  See it,
friends of mystery and of film noir.  Hell, if your just someone tired of
the same-old, same-old that Hollywood dishes out, see it.  But, any way you
cut it, see this movie.

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
Starring Bill Pullman, Bridget Fonda, Oliver Platt, Brendan Gleeson, and
Betty White
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 No one, and I mean no one, hates horror movies more than I do.  As a genre,
the horror movie was doomed from the beginning.  Seeing that the genre is an
offshoot of Halloween, I shouldn't have to say more, but I will.  It is, as
a whole, the lowest of the low for screenwriters (I'm not counting porn).
It is the point where a director realizes that he will never do a good movie
no matter how adeptly he handles his camera.  It is the point at which an
actress realizes the true currency of Hollywood, which lies somewhere around
the upper middle chest.
 Yet, when you see people like David E. Kelley, Bridget Fonda, and Oliver
Platt signing on to a horror movie, you have to wonder.
 So I started reading the reviews.  The previews didn't excite me at all, in
fact, they tempted sleep, but whenever the critic at Time jokingly called
the film "Ally McBite", I was hooked.
 Although the imdb registers Lake Placid as a horror/comedy, its comedy to
the bone.  Not only is it comedy, but it's the kind of sublimely funny humor
that comes in the form of every horror movie.  Like Scream, Lake Placid
knows that the horror movie never was and never will be original, and
embraces this fact.  And, in embracing this, decides to make fun of the
genre as a whole by adding in off-kilter humor.  Lake Placid gives you no
unexpected twists as far as plot is concerned but every twist it can as far
as humor is concerned.
 For instance, you have Betty White finally breaking the typecasting of a
nice, demure old lady that she got into while on "Golden Girls", when she
plays the hermit-by-the-lake from hell.  One of my personal favorite moments
in the movie is when she says, "If I had a dick, Sheriff, this is when I'd
tell you to suck it."
 You also have the overweight sheriff that is suspicious of anyone not from
his own town, the scorned woman in Maine on assignment from a boss that left
her for a coworker, the man who worships crocodiles in short, every age-old
character need for a horror film, which is its main marketing ploy.
 Lake Placid may be funny, but it isn't as funny as all of us would like.
To pick on something, and I mean really pick on something, you've got to
know it to the bone.  Kevin Williamson, a child of the 80s, knows horror
movies front and back and thus was able to make Scream, Scream 2, and I Know
What You Did Last Summer highly intelligent spoofs of horror movies that
already existed and do some really brilliant satire.  Although Lake Placid
is funny, it is nowhere near as satiric as Scream was.
 Lake Placid does not derive its jokes from the formulas of horror movies.
It does not take its chances to pick on Jaws, Jaws 2, or Alligator.  It
doesn't make the characters go out of their typecasted shells as Scream did.
Instead, it puts them in different shells: those of a dark comedy.
 Admittedly, I laughed during this film.  I enjoyed this film, but the
question of recommending this film remains.  As a horror movie, it is just
as good as anything else yeah, that bad.  As a comedy, it is a little bit
below par.  So, although Lake Placid may be funny and enjoyable, your money
would be better spent by renting Scream again.
To subscribe for free movie reviews send a blank email to
MK2K-subscribe@listbot.com
To unsubscribe from this list, send a blank email to
MK2K-ubsubscribe@listbot.com
If you would like to see a movie reviewed, please email me at MK2K@usa.net

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/3bc21da0ff283afb08256867005e860a?OpenDocument
Written by James Mangold, Lisa Loomer, and Anne Hamilton Phelan
Starring Winona Ryder, Angelina Jolie, Clea DuVall, Brittany Murphy,
Elizabeth Moss, Whoopi Goldberg, and Vanessa Redgrave
 As near as I can tell, the 60s were about being crazy.  Whether it was
being crazy while fighting communists in Vietnam, or being crazy while
burning bras, or being crazy while marching on Washington, the 60s
resounded with insanity.  So what better way to tell the story of the
60s than from within the walls of a mental ward known as Claymoore?
Hence is the promise given to us in the ads of Girl, Interrupted.
 In the reality, the 60s are little more than a backdrop, an added
boo-hoo to an already lengthy list of depression.  The decade is briefly
touched upon.  It is only mentioned in the sense of the possibility of
someone being drafted for the Vietnam War.
 The rest of the movie is basically a One Flew Over the Cookoo's Nest in
an all-female ward.
 Unlike One Flew Over the Cookoo's Nest, which focused very strongly on
patients rights, Girl, Interrupted gets stuck in the same crisis as its
protagonist (Suzanne, played by Winona Ryder): it is unable to decide
what to do with itself.
 Stuck inside of Claymoore, we have an all-female cast of characters
that range from the ultra-bizarre to the downright surreal.  We have
Borderline Personality Suzanne, Sociopath Lisa (Angelina Jolie),
Compulsive Liar Georgina (Clea DuVall), Chicken-Fetishist Daisy
(Brittany Murphy), and half-burned Polly (Elizabeth Moss).  Add to this
bit roles by Whoopi Goldberg as a much more fun Nurse Ratchett and
Vanessa Redgrave as a psychiatrist rumored to have same-sex tendencies,
and you have the makings of a great comedy with mild touches of
seriousness.  However, Girl, Interrupted's director James Mangold (Cop
Land) never quite figures that out.  Instead, he vacillates between
making a movie that takes itself too seriously and a movie that doesn't
take itself seriously at all.
 Regardless, Mangold is able to pull off the difficult task of making an
insane-asylum movie that does not feel overwhelmingly political.  As a
result of its ability to not meddle in patients rights or politics,
Girl, Interrupted ends up being beyond the highly bearable that it could
have ended up as.  Going out on a limb, I will state that the film is
even moderately enjoyable.
 Angelina Jolie works wonders in her role as a sociopath, giving a
performance that makes you absolutely believe in the amorality of her
character.  Winona Ryder, on the other hand, proves that she and Keanu
Reeves would make a great couple, for they both have about the same
amount of thespian ability.  Clea DuVall once again proves to be a
darling up-and-comer.
 Despite these mixed performances (a bad main role and a great
supporting cast), Girl, Interrupted still results in being an incredibly
unfocused film.  This may be due to the fact that the film springs from
Suzanne's journal, which she describes as "the litter of her mind."  In
the end of it all, this is what hurts the film the most.  Coming out of
the theatre, you feel like Suzanne coming out of Claymoore: confused,
slightly empty, and mixed up.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Clue (1985)
Written and Directed by Jonathan Lynn
Story by Jonathan Lynn and John Landis
Based on the board game by Anthony E. Pratt
Starring Eileen Brennan, Tim Curry, Madeline Kahn, Christopher Llyod,
Michael McKean, Martin Mull, Lesley Ann Warren, Colleen Camp, and Lee Ving
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Yesterday I was in a chatroom.  This is the 90s, the information age, and
not at all an abnormal experience.  When inside chatrooms, as we all well
know, everyone talks past each other.  One could say that the chatroom is
the ultimate proof of Mark Twain's thesis "there are no conversations, only
intersecting monologues."
 My personal monologue concerned the nature of movies.  The people around me
persisted at chatting away on which movie was good or bad, as they normally
do, with no progress being made towards agreement.
 At about 7:40 EST, something inside me cracked.
 LOOK, I said, THE TRUTH OF THE MATTER IS THAT MOVIES SUCK.  THEY HAVE
ALWAYS SUCKED, THEY WILL ALWAYS SUCK, BUT EVERY ONCE IN A WHILE ALONG COMES
A GREAT MOVIE THAT GIVES US HOPE TO CONTINUE.
 I am not going to say that Clue is that movie.  No.  What I am going to say
is that this is an example of that fact that, no matter how predictable each
individual movie may be, movies as a whole are a completely wild and
unpredictable animal.
 A proof of this thesis is the movie Clue.  A studio movie by the two
producers that inspired the book "Hit & Run", Peter Guber and Jon Peters
(the ones so annoying that Barry Levinson's contract with Rain Man
explicitly said that they be barred from the set), Clue is something quite
different from what we associate with studios.  For one, it is a dark
comedy.  For two, it has a script with dialogue that jumps off the page.
For three, it's postmodern and satiric.
 Clue takes place during the McCarthy era of the 50s where the red scare was
in full effect and the Cold War was heating up in Korea.  Six people, all
under an alias, come to the house of Mr. Body (Lee Ving) at the behest of
the butler Wadsworth (Tim Curry).  In the bunch are a Senator's wife, Mrs.
Peacock (Eileen Brennan), a black widow killer, Mrs. White (Madeline Kahn),
a World Health Organization ex-psychiatrist who got friendly with his lady
patients, Professor Plum (Christopher Llyod), a homosexual, Mr. Green
(Michael McKean), a war profiteer, Colonel Mustard (Martin Mull), and a lady
pimp, Ms. Scarlet (Lesley Ann Warren).  All of them are locked in a mansion
and given the opportunity to stop the blackmailing or kill the blackmailer.
Thus because a series of murders and perhaps the funniest spoof of
parlor-mysteries ever done.
 As each of a bunch of supporting cast and visitors die (the maid, the cop,
the singing telegram girl, the cook, and the motorist), the seven become
increasingly paranoid and increasingly funny.  Sure, sometimes it resorts to
completely childish humor (i.e. the sexy woman says "search me", the man
proceeds to feel her up), but the film works incredibly well.  As repressed
as the McCarthy era was, several jokes are made at its expense as well as
using several plays on words and a heavy use of dramatic irony.  An example
is when a beatnik comes to the door and has a quick snippet of conversation
with the entire terrified bunch.
 "The time of Armageddon is near." he says.
 "You ain't just Whistilin' Dixie."  retorts the tart Miss Scarlet.
 "Our lives are in danger, ya beatnik!" yells Mrs. Peacock as she slams the
door on his face.
 Admittedly not the most intelligent movie of all time, Clue remains a bit
of childish fun.  A low-grade dark comedy and a high-grade spoof, it is
worthy spending a couple of hours with.
